INTERNATIONAL  SPACE  STATION 

RESEARCH  BENEFITS 

S.  HRG.  109–1086 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND SPACE 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  20,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

61–670 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  SPACE 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Ranking 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 20, 2005  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson  ............................................................

WITNESSES 

Fincke, Lt. Colonel Mike, Active Duty Astronaut, NASA  ....................................
Readdy, William F., Associate Administrator for Space Operations, NASA 
......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Ross, Dr. Howard, Deputy Chief Scientist, NASA  ................................................
Smith, Marcia S., Senior Analyst, Congressional Research Service 
...................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sutton, Jeffrey P., M.D., Ph.D., Director, National Space Biomedical Research 
Institute (NSBRI)  .................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Weber,  Mary  Ellen,  Ph.D.,  Vice  President,  University  of  Texas,  Southwest 
Medical Center  .....................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response to written questions submitted to William F. Readdy by: 

Hon. Byron L. Dorgan  ......................................................................................
Hon. Kay Bailey Hutchison  .............................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
2 

11 
3 
6 
12 
23 
25 

42 
43 

36 
39 

63 

69 
63 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

INTERNATIONAL  SPACE  STATION 

RESEARCH  BENEFITS 

WEDNESDAY,  APRIL  20,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND SPACE, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Kay  Bailey 
Hutchison, Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

The CHAIRMAN. I am told that Senator Nelson will be here brief-
ly,  but  we  all  need  to  try  to  stay  as  close  to  on  time  as  possible. 
I  want  to  welcome  our  distinguished  panel  and  say  that  I  am 
very  pleased  to  be  chairing  my  first  hearing  as  Chairman  of  the 
Science  and  Space  Subcommittee.  We  have  chosen  as  the  subject 
of our first hearing the tremendous scientific potential represented 
by  the  International  Space  Station  and  its  position  as  one  of  the 
leading  elements  of  the  President’s  new  Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration. 

The  journey,  of  course,  begins  where  we  are  now.  And  we  have 
to  make  sure  that  we  have  a  strong  foundation  for  the  journey 
ahead.  We  all  look  forward  to  having  the  Space  Shuttle  return  to 
flight  next  month  and  to  continue  the  assembly  and  utilization  of 
the  Space  Station.  In  fact,  our  next  hearing  is  going  to  focus  more 
on the prospects for future Space Shuttle operations. 

I  have  made  my  concerns  known  regarding  the  possibility  of  an 
extended  hiatus  between  the  time  when  the  Shuttle  is  currently 
planned to be retired from service and the availability of a certified 
replacement crew launch vehicle. I think we cannot allow that kind 
of  hiatus.  Right  now  it  is  estimated  to  be  5  years.  I  think  that  is 
a national security threat to our country. And so I intend to pursue 
everything  that  I  can  to  assure  that  we  look  at  ways  to  shorten 
that timeframe. 

Second, I am committed to ensuring that the investment we have 
made  as  a  nation  in  the  International  Space  Station  is  rewarded 
to  the  greatest  extent  possible  by  fulfilling  the  purposes  for  which 
it  is  designed.  I  think  it  is  important  that  we  not  just  say  this  is 
a  tool  for  the  Moon  and  Mars  exploration-related  research.  I  think 
the  facility  is  capable  of  doing  so  much  more  for  our  Nation  and 
for the world. I think we need to come back and look at the original 
purpose  of  the  Space  Station  which  was  for  scientific,  industrial, 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

engineering  disciplines  as  well  as  Earth  observation  and  sup-
porting future exploration possibilities. 

So, I want to go back to the original concept of the Space Station 
and  look  for  all  of  the  ways  that  we  can  fully  utilize  it.  And  one 
of  the  things  I  want  to  talk  to  you  about  today  is  other  scientific 
value  that  we  might  be  able  to  gain  from  experimentation  aboard 
the  Space  Station.  So,  we  are  looking  today  at  the  current  state  of 
planning for the International Space Station and also on the poten-
tial  and  the  vital  scientific  research  aboard  this  unique  inter-
national laboratory. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  all  of  you.  We  assembled  you  be-
cause  we  think  you  are  the  ones  who  can  shed  the  most  light  on 
ISS  research  plans.  So,  we’re  looking  forward  to  having  this  testi-
mony as the basis for our re-authorization of NASA this year with 
the full capabilities of the International Space Station as one of key 
elements of the NASA re-authorization. 

So,  with  that  let  me  say,  I  am  very  pleased  that  my  ranking 
member is the only one of us in the Senate who has been to space, 
since  John  Glenn  left.  And  I  am  so  pleased  that  you  are  my  rank-
ing  member.  We  do  have  a  complete  meshing  of  commitment  and 
ideas  and  visions  for  the  future  of  NASA.  And  you  will  see  a  rein-
vigorated  subcommittee  that  is  overseeing  and  working  with  the 
leaders  at  NASA  to  fully  utilize  our  capabilities  and  make  sure 
that our investment is not wasted. 

So, thank you very much for being here. And I would like to turn 
it  to  my  ranking  member,  Senator  Nelson,  for  any  statement  he 
might wish to make. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator  NELSON.  Madam  Chair,  some  of  my  critics  were  hoping 

that I was taking a one-way trip. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  Senator  Nelson,  I  was  going  to  say  that 
your lateness would not be tolerated if you were still an astronaut, 
but since you are a Senator we are used to it. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  So,  I  know  you—I  know  you  had  a  good  reason 

to be somewhere else. Do you have any comments? 

Senator NELSON. Just a couple. Kay and I are both excited about 
the  new  NASA  Administrator.  And  that  he  has  a  vision  and  that 
he really is a rocket scientist. And that science is important to him. 
And  that  part  of  our  problem  in  the  past  is  that  there  was  an  at-
mosphere  that  pervaded  NASA  that  did  not  encourage  two-way 
communication. And thus, we saw the destruction of Challenger in 
1986 because they were not listening to the people on the line. And 
again  18  years  later  that  information  from  the  bottom  was  not 
flowing  up.  And  we  think  that  the  new  Administrator  has  a  sensi-
tivity to that and we think that is going to be very good. 

And we also think that he is committed to a balanced space pro-
gram;  manned  and  unmanned.  And  that  in  the  human  space  pro-
grams  a  major  component  is  the  International  Space  Station.  And 
the  value  that  holds  not  only  for  us  in  the  development  of  tech-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

nologies and in the furtherance of science but also what it does for 
our relations with other countries that will participate with us. 

So,  the  Chair  and  I  are  absolutely  linked  on  all  of  this.  And  it 
is  my  privilege  to  serve  as  the  Democratic  leader  of  this  sub-
committee with my Chair, because we are of one mind. And we are 
also  of  one  mind  that  space  is  not  a  partisan  subject.  Space  is  a 
subject  that  we  can  gather  and  have  our  differences  over  policy 
issues,  but  it  has  nothing  to  do  with  ideology  and  it  has  nothing 
to do with partisanship. 

And  so  I  am  looking  forward  to  your  leadership  and  looking  for-

ward to the work of this Space Subcommittee. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Thank you, Senator Nelson. The first 
panel  is  Mr.  William  Readdy,  Associate  Administrator  for  the 
Space  Operations  Mission  Directorate  at  NASA.  You  will  be  the 
only  one  giving  testimony,  I  understand,  but  you  are  accompanied 
by Dr. Howard Ross, the Deputy Chief Scientist at NASA and Lieu-
tenant  Colonel  Mike  Fincke,  Active  Duty  Astronaut  at  NASA,  of 
course. And we welcome all three of you. 

Mr. Readdy. 

STATEMENT OF WILLIAM F. READDY, 

ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR FOR SPACE OPERATIONS, NASA 
Mr. READDY. Thank you, Madam Chairman and Senator Nelson, 
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  this  morning. 
With  your  indulgence,  given  your  commentary  I’d  like  to  digress  a 
little  bit.  I  just  got  off  a  plane  from  Florida.  I  was  at  the  Design 
Certification  Review  for  the  Space  Shuttle,  for  return  to  flight. 
Now, that in and of itself is just another milestone that we’re com-
pleting, but I have you to thank for this. 

When  the  new  Administrator  came  onboard,  he  told  us  exactly 
what  his  priorities  were  and  they  were  return  to  flight;  build  the 
International Space Station; honor our international commitments; 
and to reduce the gap of human space flight capability. 

When  he  was  informed  that  we  were  having  the  Design  Certifi-
cation  Review  yesterday,  he  got  on  the  plane  Monday  night,  came 
down  and  sat  through  the  entire  thing.  I  have  to  tell  you  that  his 
questions were piercing, and it showed a total grasp of the informa-
tion  that  was  being  presented.  I  think  he  was  impressed  with  the 
technical depth that we went into. But he also had some questions 
of his own as you might expect, as he was coming up to speed with 
where we have been in the last two and a half years. 

But  we  have  you  all  to  thank  for  that,  because  sitting  in  this 
chair  8  days  ago,  if  you  can  believe  that,  8  days  ago  Dr.  Michael 
Griffin was here at his confirmation hearing. As you urged, his con-
firmation process happened very expeditiously. Probably as expedi-
tiously  as  anyone  can  remember.  He  was  on  the  job  on  Thursday 
where he spelled out those same priorities. 

And  I’m  pleased  to  tell  you  that  he  was  able  to  come  to  the  De-
sign  Certification  Review,  because  of  his  expeditious  confirmation. 
And I think it points to the wisdom of his selection by the Adminis-
tration  as  the  nominee  and  now  the  appointee  as  the  11th  NASA 
Administrator. 

With me, as you mentioned, is Dr. Howard Ross, who’s the Dep-
uty Chief Scientist here at NASA. I think he has become renowned 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

for  his  ability  to  communicate  the  benefits  of  International  Space 
Station and the science that’s performed. 

Quite  obviously  Colonel  Mike  Fincke  who  just  returned  from  6 
months  onboard  that  magnificent  International  Space  Station  and 
unfortunately  was  removed  from  the  planet  Earth  for  the  birth  of 
his little daughter, Tarali, I guess who’s now about 10 months old. 
But  it’s  an  indication  that  life  goes  on.  It’s  also  an  indication  that 
this is not about us sitting here at this table. This is about the fu-
ture. This is about the legacy for our Nation in space. 

Those benefits that you discussed, they’re industrial, engineering 
and  certainly  science  that  will  accrue  from  that  laboratory  that 
we’re building up in space will be significant and both of these gen-
tleman  will  be  able  to  expand  somewhat  on  that  here  in  the  testi-
mony. 

Immediately  after  Dr.  Griffin  came  onboard,  that  very  evening, 
we launched Expedition 11 to the International Space Station. The 
crew  of  Sergei  Krikalev,  as  the  Russian  Commander  who  was  also 
onboard the very first expedition to International Space Station as 
they turned on the lights and started setting up shop onboard. 

It’s  been  1,630  days  of  continuous  human  presence  onboard  the 
International Space Station. And now jointly we have five crewmen 
onboard;  three  from  Expedition  11  and  the  visiting  crew  member 
from  Italy,  Roberto  Vittori.  The  science  officer  and  flight  engineer 
for this increment is John Phillips from NASA. 

So, we have five crewmen onboard. I’ll be leaving on Saturday for 
Russia to assist at the deorbit landing/return of Expedition 10 after 
their  highly  successful  6-month  increment  onboard  International 
Space  Station.  Commander  Leroy  Chiao  and  his  flight  engineer, 
and  Soyuz  pilot,  Salizhan  Sharipov,  are  coming  home  on  Sunday. 
Now last year President Bush gave us a very bold challenge and 
Vision.  Those  priorities,  I  think,  are  what  we’re  here  to  talk  about 
today.  Obviously,  return  to  flight  of  the  Space  Shuttle  is  essential 
to continue assembly of International Space Station, to help realize 
those  goals.  That’s  part  of  a  stepping  stone  strategy  to  go  beyond 
low–Earth orbit and back to the Moon and beyond. Quite obviously 
it’s  very  important  for  us  to  continue  that  effort.  No  one  certainly 
foresaw  the  tragedy  that  occurred  on  February  1,  2003.  The  Space 
Station  at  this  moment  is  half  built.  The  other  half  is  at  the  Ken-
nedy Space Center with the exception of the Columbus module; it’s 
still over in Europe, yet to be delivered. But half of the Space Sta-
tion  is  already  the  size  of  a  jumbo  jet  orbiting  the  Earth  every  90 
minutes. And right now it just happens to be the brightest morning 
star in the sky. 

It  is  a  magnificent  piece  of  engineering  prowess,  demonstrating 
our ability to assembly large structures in space that we’ll certainly 
need  in  the  future.  But  it  is  only  half  built.  At  the  moment,  as 
Colonel  Mike  Fincke  will  tell  you,  it  is  having  to  rely  exclusively 
on  Progress  vehicles  for  resupply.  We  had  to  scale  the  crew  back 
from three to two, which we have done here for the last several in-
crements. We’re looking forward to Shuttle return to flight, also to 
return  the  crew  size  to  three.  Then  as  we  increase  the  capability 
of the Space Station to enhance that all the way up to six. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

The  very  character  of  exploration  really  counts  on  the  ability  to 
observe.  There  are  no  better  observers  than  humans.  I  think  Dr. 
Ross will talk a little bit more about that. 

Our ability to do other things, as you mentioned, the daily oper-
ations  that  will  allow  us  to  go  from  hours  away  from  this  planet, 
which is International Space Station at 240 nautical miles, to days 
away  from  the  planet;  the  Moon,  the  lunar  surface,  which  is  still 
in  Earth  orbit.  Then  make  the  leap  beyond  that  to  hundreds  and 
hundreds of days away from this planet, which requires an incred-
ible sophistication and reliability in the systems that we must oper-
ate  for  life  support,  for  example;  for  autonomous  operations.  All  of 
which,  I  think,  have  been  demonstrated  at  least  initially  here  on-
board  International  Space  Station.  One  of  the  things  that  they 
have demonstrated is we have a lot to learn. We’ve got a long way 
to  go  before  we  would  consider  regenerative  life  support  systems 
carefree. 

As  you’ve  seen  and  Mike  can  attest  the  Elektron,  which  gen-
erates oxygen for the Space Station, requires an incredible amount 
of  tender  loving  care  and  maintenance  to  keep  in  operation.  That 
clearly  isn’t  acceptable  when  you’re  on  the  lunar  surface  nor  when 
you’re hundreds of days away from home en route to Mars. 

This  Space  Station  is  also  critical  to  understanding  some  of  the 
challenges  that  we  have  in  human  health.  He  can  also  attest  to 
some of the ravages of long duration space flight and what it takes 
in  terms  of  counter  measures  to  maintain  your  health  such  that 
you could function when you return to a gravity field. 

I  remember  sending  him  a  note  after  he  passed,  I  guess  about 
a  month  on  orbit.  I  flew  three  times,  so  I  had  28  days  of  space 
flight experience. In his rookie flight, by the way, in his first month 
he’d  already  surpassed  me  and  was  going  even  further  down  the 
road having performed four space walks in his 6-month increment. 
So, we’re building a tremendous amount of experience that we will 
need as we go into the next decade of exploration. 

The gathering of knowledge and validating our research is some-
thing  Dr.  Ross  can  talk  to.  But  that’s  vital.  To  exploit,  to  reap  the 
science  benefit  of  that  research  platform  that  we  have  to  continue 
assembly  so  that  we  can  put  an  increased  crew  aboard  is,  obvi-
ously, one of our goals. 

The closed-loop life support, as I mentioned earlier, is one of the 
things that will enable that to happen. It will enable us to go from 
a  crew  size  of  three,  ultimately  to  six,  in  addition  to  some  addi-
tional habitable volume. As you know spin-offs often occur from the 
technologies  that  we  build  intended  for  space.  For  example,  the 
water  processing  assembly;  that’s  part  of  the  Regenerative  Life 
Support  System.  That’s  being  used  right  now,  fielded  by  Hamilton 
Standard, who’s our contractor, to purify water in Iraq and in some 
of  the  tsunami-ravaged  areas  of  the  world.  The  ability  to  take 
spoiled  water,  the  ability  to  take  brackish  water,  polluted  water 
and  turn  it  in  to  potable  water  is  something  that  is  of  immediate 
benefit  here  on  this  planet.  We,  obviously,  are  hoping  to  fly  that 
here in the near term. 

International  Space  Station  as  you  also  mentioned  is  very,  very 
important  for  turning  the  swords  to  plowshares  and  international 
cooperation. Who would have thought that a decade or so ago that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

the  Russians  would  be  our  stalwart  partners  in  this  endeavor? 
That  when  the  Columbia  tragedy  occurred,  that  they  would  be 
there and provide the crew transport to and from and the resupply 
necessary  to  continue  Space  Station  operations  as  well  as  to  pre-
serve  the  Space  Station  in  an  assembly-ready  configuration  for 
when  the  Shuttle  does  return  to  flight.  And  we  have  great  plans 
for Space Station utilization as we build that second half. 

Inspiring  the  next  generation  is,  obviously,  one  of  NASA’s  mis-
sions. Inspiring my children, your children, Mike’s children all over 
the world. That is something that they have taken on, I think, with 
vigor  onboard  the  International  Space  Station.  They  talk  routinely 
to school children around the world. They have a Earth Knowledge 
Acquired by Middle School Students, (EarthKAM) which allows the 
schools  all  over  to  command  pictures  to  be  taken  from  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  for  scientific  purposes  and  the  study  of  ge-
ography. One that I think I enjoyed, and my children certainly did, 
while  Mike  Fincke  was  onboard,  was  ‘‘Saturday  Morning  Science.’’ 
The  ability  to  stimulate  interest  in  science  by  performing  experi-
ments in the unique environment of microgravity. Finally, Senator 
Nelson,  as  you  know  the,  ‘‘The  PESTO  Experiment,’’  where  dwarf 
wheat  was  cultivated  on  the  Space  Station  and  the  outreach  that 
that had was significant. 

In  terms  of  the  Vision,  obviously,  the  first  step  is  returning  the 
Shuttle to safe flight and we’re about that. We’re milestone driven. 
And  having  completed  the  Design  Certification  Review,  that’s  one 
more milestone that we have completed toward returning to flight. 
And  we  think  next  month  we  can  begin  getting  the  Space  Station 
assembled and honoring our international commitments. 

I’d like to thank you for the opportunity to testify before you this 
morning.  My  two  colleagues  and  I  will  be  pleased  to  take  your 
questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Readdy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM F. READDY, 

ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR FOR SPACE OPERATIONS, NASA 

Madam Chairwoman and members of the Subcommittee, thank you for the oppor-
tunity to appear before you today to discuss the benefits of the International Space 
Station. 

On  January  14,  2004,  President  George  W.  Bush  announced  the  Vision  for  Space 
Exploration. The President’s directive gave NASA a new and historic focus and clear 
objectives. The fundamental goal of this directive for the Nation’s space exploration 
program is ‘‘. . . to advance U.S. scientific, security, and economic interests through 
a  robust  space  exploration  program.’’  In  issuing  this  directive,  the  President  com-
mitted the Nation to a journey of exploring the solar system and beyond, returning 
humans to the Moon, and sending robots and ultimately humans to Mars and other 
destinations. He challenged us to establish new and innovative programs to enhance 
our  understanding  of  the  planets,  to  ask  new  questions,  and  to  answer  questions 
as old as humankind. 

Returning the Space Shuttle to flight and completing the International Space Sta-
tion are the first steps in the Vision for Space Exploration, a stepping stone strategy 
toward new exploration goals. Using the Station to study human endurance in space 
and to test new technologies and techniques, NASA will prepare for the longer jour-
neys to the Moon, Mars and beyond. 

Today marks the 1,630th day of continuous human presence on the International 
Space  Station.  That  is  11  international  crews  and  over  four  years  of  research,  dis-
covery and experience in orbit. I am here today to tell you that NASA is progressing 
towards making the Vision a reality. 

Just a few days ago NASA passed another important milestone for the Space Sta-
tion. Expedition 11, Commander Sergei Krikalev and Flight Engineer John Phillips, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

docked to the Station this past Sunday to begin their six month stay onboard. Euro-
pean Space Agency astronaut Roberto Vittori traveled with them to the Station, and 
will return with the Expedition 10 crew, Commander Leroy Chiao and Flight Engi-
neer Salizhan Sharipov. Chiao, Salizhan and Vittori will return home next Sunday, 
April 24. The Expedition 10 crew spent 191 days onboard the Station. 

In  addition,  the  Space  Shuttle  is  in  final  preparations  to  fly  again  next  month. 
Our return to flight also positions us to return to station assembly. NASA will com-
plete  the  International  Space  Station  by  the  end  of  the  decade  and  meet  its  obliga-
tions to our international partners. 

NASA  will  utilize  the  ISS  to  perform  the  necessary  research  and  testing  to  help 
fulfill our exploration objectives. The very character of exploration and discovery be-
gins  with  the  ability  to  observe.  We  send  humans  into  space  because  they  are  our 
best  tools  for  observation.  Crews  on  the  International  Space  Station  have  gained 
firsthand knowledge of space-based life and they are bringing that information back 
to all of us. 

While  we  can  to  some  extent  simulate  living  conditions  in  space  here  on  the 
ground, there is no substitute for experience in the actual space environment. Sim-
ply  put,  to  learn  how  to  live  in  space,  we  must  live  in  space.  Every  experiment, 
every  spacewalk,  every  repair  and  every  piece  of  hardware  assembled  teaches  us 
something new. A full time human presence aboard the ISS offers us a tremendous 
opportunity to study human survival in the hostile environment of space and assess 
how  to  overcome  the  technology  hurdles  to  human  exploration  beyond  Earth  orbit. 
Assembly and Transportation 

The  development  of  ISS  elements  and  systems  is  virtually  complete;  only  the  as-
sembly  process  remains.  The  return  to  Space  Shuttle  operations  means  that  NASA 
can once again begin construction work on the International Space Station. The first 
two Space Shuttle flights will focus on carrying cargo to the Station and testing new 
techniques for Orbiter repair. Following those two flights, the crew of STS–115 will 
restart  the  assembly  of  the  International  Space  Station  by  carrying  truss  elements 
to  orbit.  From  there,  already  completed  Station  elements  will  be  sent  into  orbit  on 
the  Space  Shuttle.  The  assembly  sequence  will  complete  the  Station  as  efficiently 
and economically as possible, and with the minimum number of Shuttle flights nec-
essary.  As  we  make  progress  on  construction  of  the  Station,  we  will  also  work  to-
wards increasing the number of crew onboard to three members as soon as possible 
and working towards a six-person crew capability. 

The  President’s  Commission  on  Implementation  of  U.S.  Space  Exploration  Policy 
recommended  that  ‘‘. . . NASA  recognize  and  implement  a  far  larger  presence  of 
private industry in space operations with the specific goal of allowing private indus-
try  to  assume  the  primary  role  of  providing  services  to  NASA,  and  most  imme-
diately  in  accessing  low-Earth  orbit.’’  Consistent  with  this  recommendation,  NASA 
is seeking to acquire commercial services as soon as practical and affordable to ful-
fill  its  transportation  requirements  for  cargo  to  and  from  the  ISS.  NASA  is  devel-
oping  a  Request  for  Proposal  (RFP)  to  be  released  in  2005.  The  RFP  will  seek  to 
develop  an  initial  operating  capability  for  commercial  services  for  cargo  transpor-
tation to the ISS as soon as practical and affordable. NASA will also utilize partner 
capabilities for cargo transportation. The European Automated Transfer Vehicle will 
make its first visit to the ISS in 2006. The Japanese H2A Transfer Vehicle will also 
visit the ISS by the end of the decade. 
Operational Experience 

The  International  Space  Station  is  more  than  just  a  science  laboratory.  The  Sta-
tion  is  critical  to  understanding  human  health,  system  performance  and  logistical 
support in the real environment of space. 

Moreover, operating the Station with a limited re-supply capability has taught us 
much  about  how  NASA  might  plan  missions  to  more  distant  destinations  where 
cargo  re-supply  options  are  limited.  In  any  risky  venture,  experience  and  practice 
are  vital.  A  mission  to  Mars  will  take  at  least  6  months  in  one-way  transit;  our 
Space Station crews experience that duration of exposure during each of their stays. 
Through  the  process  of  building  and  living  on  the  Station,  NASA  has  learned  the 
following, all of which are vital to exploration: 

• Assembly  of  Large  Structures—Example:  Automated  and  manual  docking  with 

various vehicles, including those built by other countries. 

• Extensive Extravehicular Activity—Example: Performance of two types of Space 

Suits. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

physiological adaptation. 

• Behavior of Crews—Examples: A range of crew sizes (two, three, and eventually 
six),  genders,  ethnicities,  citizenship,  and  lengths  of  time  in  space—in  various 
stages of ISS assembly/capabilities. 
• Responses  to  Situations  That  Threaten  Mission  and/or  Life-Examples:  solar 
storms;  loss  of  gyroscope;  Elektron  oxygen  generator  malfunctions;  gradual  de-
pressurization episodes; water usage restrictions. 
• Health  Maintenance  of  Crew—Examples:  nutrition;  sleep;  exercise;  human 
• Long-Term  System  and  Subsystem  Performance  and  Maintenance—Example: 
Environmental Control and Life Support Systems built in various combinations 
of systems from various nations. 
• Practice of Operational Medicine—Example: majority of crew take some medica-
tion in flight; we and they rely on telemedicine and monitoring with limited on-
board supplies and capabilities. 
• Training  for  Long-Term  Missions—Examples:  efficacy  of  preflight  versus  on-
• Emergency  Awareness  and  Preparedness—Examples:  Depressurization  Alarms 

board training; skills versus task training. 

and Repairs; Fire Alarms and Drills. 

ISS Research: Knowledge Gathering and Validation 

U.S. research activities aboard the Station will be focused to support the new ex-
ploration goals, with an emphasis on understanding how the space environment af-
fects  astronaut  health  and  capabilities,  and  on  developing  appropriate  counter-
measures  to  mitigate  health  concerns.  We  will  also  use  the  Station  to  develop  and 
demonstrate improved life support systems and medical care. 

Human  space  flight  research  to  date  has  identified  a  series  of  significant  threats 
to  human  health  associated  with  space  travel.  These  health  risks  include  bone  loss 
and  muscle  atrophy;  radiation  exposure;  and  changes  to  fluid  balances  and  blood 
pressure  regulation.  These  changes  may  represent  significant  challenges  on  return 
to  gravity  and  are  of  particular  concern  for  future  space  travelers  who  will  travel 
beyond access to Earth-based medical care. Behavioral and human performance con-
cerns  also  exist.  NASA’s  focused  research  program  accelerates  the  evaluation  of  re-
mediation methods for crew health problems and enables a better understanding of 
the requirements for health care systems for providing medical care during long du-
ration human space exploration. 

For  example,  NASA  is  using  portable  ultrasound  equipment  in  new  ways  on  the 
Space  Station  that  are  already  translating  to  use  back  on  Earth.  Ultrasound  is  a 
fast  and  safe  method  to  diagnose  conditions  inside  the  body.  It  uses  sound  waves 
to  gain  information  about  medical  conditions  ranging  from  gallbladder  disease  to 
kidney  stones.  What  we  are  testing  is  a  way  to  monitor  and  diagnose  patients  re-
motely  by  non-specialists  working  with  an  expert  on  Earth.  Through  such  an  ap-
proach,  portable  ultrasound  machines  can  also  be  used  to  extend  medical  care  into 
challenging  areas  such  as  remote  rural  or  military  locations.  The  remote  procedure 
already has been tested on members of the Detroit Red Wings of the National Hock-
ey  League.  The  Red  Wings  conducted  a  test  of  these  techniques  to  diagnose  player 
injuries  in  the  team’s  locker  room  rather  than  transporting  athletes  to  a  local  hos-
pital for an X-ray, CT or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). 

Among the most vital technological systems for any future space exploration mis-
sion  is  the  life  support  system  that  must  provide  space  travelers  with  a  controlled 
Earth-like  environment  within  the  hostile  environment  of  space.  Any  planned  mis-
sion  beyond  Low  Earth  orbit  will  need  to  include  a  system  for  recycling  water  and 
air  that  is  both  very  reliable  and  highly  efficient.  The  ISS  research  program  will 
test critical technologies in the design of such a closed-loop type system. 

NASA research also benefits those of us here on Earth. One of the most important 
needs for the ISS is access to clean water. The Marshall Space Flight Center is cur-
rently  developing  a  Water  Processor  Assembly  (WPA)  as  part  of  the  US  Enhanced 
Crew  Life  Support  System.  This  system  will  reclaim  waste  waters  from  fuel  cells, 
from urine, from oral hygiene and hand washing, and by condensing humidity from 
the air. It will produce recycled water that will be cleaner than what we drink pres-
ently  on  Earth.  Fresh  water  is  an  exceedingly  scarce  commodity  in  many  locations 
around the world and the U.S. Now, the same technology we are using to build the 
WPA  is  being  used  to  develop  recycling  systems  for  humanitarian  purposes  in  na-
tions  lacking  a  reliable  water  supply,  such  as  those  Asian  countries  affected  by  the 
December 2004 tsunami. A source of clean, inexpensive and readily available water 
is just as important here on Earth as it is on the ISS, and as it will be on the Moon 
or the journey to Mars. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Future  crews  going  to  the  Moon  or  Mars  will  need  to  be  self-sufficient.  Access  to 
clean  water  is  just  one  thing  they  will  need  in  their  journeys  beyond  Low  Earth 
orbit.  Others  include  monitoring  and  recycling  air,  waste  sterilization  procedures, 
longer  shelf  life  for  food  products  and  renewable  food  sources.  These  applications 
can  be  tested  on  the  ISS  before  we  apply  them  to  longer  trips  to  the  Moon  and 
Mars. After all, it is better to learn 240 miles up than 240,000 miles out. 

During long-duration missions in space and on planetary surfaces, crews must be 
able to live and work productively in safe and habitable environments. Performance 
of  tasks  by  isolated  crew—individual  and  teams—must  be  efficient,  teachable,  and 
reliable. These processes yield potential Earth benefits as well, including: 

• Advances in emergency habitat and shelter deployment for a wide range of pur-
poses (e.g. natural disaster, war refugee relief, temporary emergency safe haven 
for rescue crews.) 
• Evaluation  and  design  of  self-contained,  remote,  and  hazardous  environments. 
• New  clinical  methods  for  human  reaction  and  interaction  in  isolated  and  con-
• Advancement  for  process  controls,  tele-operations,  and  robotic  systems  develop-
• Human performance modeling applies to the medical community’s enhanced re-
• Identification, measurement, analysis, mitigation and tracking of programmatic 

habilitation and therapeutic practices. 

fined environments. 

ment. 

risks. 

The International Space Station and Exploration 

Led  by  the  Exploration  Systems  Mission  Directorate,  NASA  is  currently  in  the 
process  of  focusing  and  prioritizing  International  Space  Station  research  and  tech-
nology development efforts on areas that best contribute to the Vision for Space Ex-
ploration.  Through  rigorous  examination  by  technical  and  program  managers  at 
Headquarters  and  NASA  field  centers,  we  have  identified  22  areas  of  research  and 
technology  that  can  take  advantage  of  the  Station  as  a  testbed  to  reduce  the  risk 
associated with future human exploration missions. The Station will specifically con-
tribute  to  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  in  areas  such  as:  testing  and  validating 
performance of closed loop life support systems; testing and validating both pharma-
ceuticals  and  new  exercise  systems  to  maintain  astronaut  health,  and;  dem-
onstrating  technologies  necessary  for  future  space  systems  such  as  thermal  control, 
power generation, and management of cryogenic fuels in space. 

In  order  to  best  utilize  limited  resources,  NASA  is  phasing  out  some  activities 
that  do  not  directly  support  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  and  reallocating  re-
sources  to  the  higher  priority  areas.  The  Agency  is  emphasizing  applied  research 
and  technology  development  in  the  following  areas:  space  radiation  health  and 
shielding, advanced environment control and monitoring, advanced Extra Vehicular 
Activities  suits  and  tools,  human  health  and  countermeasures,  advanced  life  sup-
port,  and  space  human  factors  and  behavioral  health.  NASA’s  highest  priorities  for 
research  on  the  Station  have  been  identified  as  medical  research  with  human  sub-
jects  and  microgravity  validation  of  environmental  control  and  life  support  tech-
nologies. 

NASA  also  currently  has  a  Space  Shuttle  Program/International  Space  Station 
(SSP/ISS) Scenario Study underway to examine alternate scenarios for the SSP and 
ISS as first steps to the Vision for Space Exploration. The study has been providing 
assessments  that  will  support  decision  making  for  research,  engineering,  inter-
national  and  fiscal  considerations.  Two  cycles  have  already  been  completed.  The 
third cycle involves assessment of specific scenarios for US exploration research mis-
sion requirements. It is currently in the final stages of being documented for review 
and decision by Agency leadership. 

NASA  also  studied  long-term  plans  for  Station  utilization.  In  2003,  the  Agency 
began  to  look  at  how  it  might  turn  some  of  the  tactical  operations  of  the  Station 
research  management  over  to  a  consortium.  Because  of  the  realignment  of  Station 
science  and  research  to  focus  its  activities  to  support  the  Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration,  the  Agency  chose  not  to  further  develop  those  plans.  However,  NASA  has 
retained  all  of  the  studies  and  guidelines  for  use  should  it  decide  to  move  in  that 
direction in the future. 
International Partnership 

The  International  Space  Station  is  a  cooperative  effort.  International  crews  work 
together daily—not just to keep the Station running, but to perform groundbreaking 
research.  Joint  research  activities  include  the  completion  of  a  record-breaking  31- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

day experiment called PromISS–3 that utilized the Microgravity Sciences Glovebox, 
a  sealed  laboratory  with  built-in  gloves  for  conducting  experiments  in  space.  Inter-
national  crews  have  also  worked  together  to  deploy  a  microsatellite  during  a 
spacewalk, install research equipment onboard the Station, perform medical experi-
ments and test on orbit systems. They also work together to inspire the next genera-
tion of explorers through programs such as: 

dents to talk by amateur radio with ISS crewmembers. 

• Amateur  Radio  on  the  ISS  (ARISS)—an  international  project  that  allows  stu-
• Earth Knowledge Acquired by Middle School Students (EarthKAM)—allows stu-
dents  to  control  a  digital  camera  mounted  in  a  window  on  the  Station;  photos 
are  available  on  the  Internet  for  viewing  and  study  by  students  around  the 
world. 
• High School Students United with NASA to Create Hardware (HUNCH)—High 
school  students  build  training  hardware  that  meets  a  specific  need  in  NASA’s 
Space Station payload training program. 

At  the  recent  International  Space  Station  Partnership  Heads  of  Agency  (HOA) 
meeting  on  January  26,  2005,  the  Partners  reviewed  the  status  of  ongoing  Space 
Station  operations  and  NASA’s  plans  for  Space  Shuttle  return  to  flight.  The  part-
ners  reaffirmed  their  agencies’  commitment  to  meet  their  ISS  obligations;  to  com-
plete  Station  assembly  by  the  end  of  the  decade;  and  to  use  and  further  evolve  the 
ISS  in  a  manner  that  meets  their  research  and  exploration  objectives.  Our  Space 
Station partnership is strong, as demonstrated by the fact that Space Station oper-
ations and research have continued without interruption throughout our significant 
preparations for return to flight. 

The  Station  is  preparing  us  for  future  human  exploration  in  many  ways.  It  is  an 
exploration research and technology test bed. It is a platform that represents an un-
precedented accomplishment for space engineering and on orbit assembly of unique 
and complex spacecraft. The Station is a model of space operations, linking mission 
control  centers  on  three  continents  to  sustain  24/7  space  flight  on-orbit  operations 
by  an  international  team  speaking  several  different  languages.  Perhaps  the  most 
significant  contribution  of  the  ISS  is  that  it  is  a  foundation  for  international  part-
nerships  and  alliances  between  governments,  industry,  and  academia  in  space  ex-
ploration.  In  this  regard,  the  ISS  was  assembled  on  orbit  with  modules  and  other 
elements  from  Canada,  Russia  and  the  U.S.  that  were  never  connected  on  the 
ground. Additional elements from Europe and Japan will join the on-orbit structure 
when assembly resumes. The success of the assembly is a tribute to the engineering 
excellence and successful cooperation of the international team. 

As  the  United  States  implements  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration,  the  Adminis-
tration recognizes the value of effective cooperation with Russia to further our space 
exploration  goals.  At  the  same  time,  we  have  to  appropriately  reflect  U.S.  non-
proliferation  policy  and  objectives  in  our  relationship  with  Russia.  The  Administra-
tion is thus interested in seeking a balanced approach that continues to protect our 
nonproliferation  goals  while  advancing  potential  U.S.  cooperation  with  Russia  on 
the Vision for Space Exploration. Such a balanced approach must consider the Iran 
Nonproliferation  Act  of  2000  (INA),  which  currently  complicates  cooperation  with 
Russia on the International Space Station, and will also have an adverse impact on 
cooperation  with  Russia  on  our  future  space  exploration  efforts  related  to  human 
space  flight.  To  that  end,  the  Administration  looks  forward  to  working  with  Con-
gress  to  ensure  that  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  is  able  to  succeed  while  re-
maining  fully  consistent  with  broader  U.S.  national  security  and  nonproliferation 
goals. 
Summary 

As stated at the beginning of my testimony, returning the Space Shuttle to flight 
and completing the International Space Station are the first steps in the Vision for 
Space  Exploration,  a  stepping  stone  strategy  toward  new  exploration  goals.  Using 
the  Station  to  study  human  endurance  in  space  and  to  test  new  technologies  and 
techniques,  NASA  will  prepare  for  the  longer  journeys  to  the  moon,  Mars  and  be-
yond. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today,  and  I  look  forward  to  responding 

to any questions you may have. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  We  have  been  out  of  our 
Space  Shuttle  now  for  2  years.  And  I  wanted  to  ask  you  what  you 
have learned that might tell us what would happen if we were out 
for  a  longer  period  of  time,  about  our  ability  to  send  people  up  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

the numbers that we would want for our own experimentation and 
research;  as  well  as  the  maintenance  of  the  Station.  How  has  that 
2-year hiatus been for us and what have we learned from it? 

Mr.  READDY.  I’d  like  to  start  out  and  then  I’ll  defer  to  Colonel 

Mike Fincke who has firsthand experience and can fill it in. 

For  starters,  we  did  have  to  decrew  to  two  from  the  three  that 
we  had  onboard,  because  the  logistics  simply  would  not  permit  us 
to  continue  to  supply  them  with  food  and  water  and  other  spare 
parts necessary to maintain the International Space Station during 
the  hiatus.  So,  we  were  living  literally  from  one  Progress  resupply 
vehicle to the next. 

So,  that  was  a  severe  impact.  But  out  of  those  necessities  comes 
some ingenuity and inventiveness on the part of the ground teams 
that  we  had.  Not  only  from  the  science  perspective  but  certainly 
from an operational perspective. Not only the TsUP, the flight con-
trol  center  in  Moscow  but  also  the  flight  control  center  there  in 
Houston,  and  the  experimental  Payload  Control  Center  there  in 
Huntsville. 

They all got together and they were able to kind of form a virtual 
third  crew  member  by  performing  an  awful  lot  of  those  tasks  from 
the  ground;  doing  an  awful  lot  of  replanning,  off-loading  the  crew 
members so that whereas before we thought with three crew you’d 
have  perhaps  the  equivalent  of  a  half  crew  member  devoted  to 
science.  Here  with  two  crew  you  had  the  equivalent  of  half  a  crew 
member devoted to science, which showed that we could adapt and 
do  a  much  better  job  when  forced  to,  of  utilizing  crew  time  more 
effectively for those things that they must do uniquely onboard the 
International Space Station. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Could  that  be  sustained  over  a  longer  period  of 

time, that kind of efficiency? 

Mr. READDY. Well, I’ll defer to Mike. 
The first thing, though, is we started out with a sufficiency of lo-
gistics  and  we  started  eating  into  that  until  we  were  barely  suffi-
cient from expedition to expedition, as you remember. I’m sure you 
and your colleagues read in the newspaper about we’re waiting for 
the  next  Progress  for  spare  parts;  we’re  waiting  for  the  next 
Progress for water, for food, or whatever. 

So,  that  kept  us  right  on  the  edge  and  we  could  not  do  science 
re-supply, for example. We had extremely limited down mass avail-
able  to  be  able  to  perform  science  operations.  And  we  were  living 
from  the  residual  amount  of  supplies  that  we  had  onboard  the 
Space Station before. 

So, Mike? 

STATEMENT OF LT. COLONEL MIKE FINCKE, 

ACTIVE DUTY ASTRONAUT, NASA 

Colonel FINCKE. It’s a huge honor and pleasure to be here today. 
Thank  you  for  the  invitation.  Six  months  in  flight  and  aboard  the 
beautiful,  amazing  International  Space  Station  was  a  big  honor 
and  I’m  glad  to  have  a  chance  to  share  it  a  little  bit  today  and 
what we’ve learned. 

With  only  two  people  it  was  kind  of  tough.  We  had  to  maintain 
the Space Station. They threw in a couple extra space walks for us 
and  even  so  we  were  able  to  with  the  ingenuity,  and  working  to-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

gether  with  the  outstanding  team  in  Houston  and  Huntsville,  Ala-
bama, we were able to get a lot of work done. We were able to get 
a strong science program and it was pretty amazing. 

We also became self sufficient. We learned how to fix things like 
our  space  suits,  and  the  oxygen  generator.  We  need  to  know  how 
to  do  those  things  for  the  Moon.  With  these  efficiencies  and  with 
this new teamwork and ways that we figured things out on our ex-
pedition and what Leroy and Salizhan have done in Expedition 10, 
when  we  get  another  person  aboard  the  Space  Station  and  even 
more, we’re going to be able to do a heck of a lot more science. And 
I’m looking forward to that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  you  think  that  after  this  experience  that 
working  toward  six  is  still  the  right  goal  or  do  you  think  that  you 
can do major things with fewer than six crew? 

Mr.  READDY.  I  think  we  could  do  major  things  with  two  crew  as 
Mike pointed out; three crew, obviously, more and six is our objec-
tive.  When  we  get  the  Shuttle  flying  again,  it’s  amazing  the  dif-
ference  that  makes  in  terms  of  logistics;  just  the  routine  things. 
The first two flights in addition to being test flights of the modifica-
tions  that  we’ve  made  here  during  the  interval  on  the  return  to 
flight,  also  are  logistics.  The  intent  is  to  have  an  over-sufficiency 
of  supplies  onboard  to  restock  the  science  and  to  build  back  to 
three permanent crew members. 

As we put Regenerative Life Support onboard, as we increase the 
habitable  volume,  of  course,  we  do  expect  to  get  to  six  crew  mem-
bers.  Part  of  that  is  in  addition  to  the  science  and  technology  that 
we’ll  be  pioneering  on  International  Space  Station,  the  other  thing 
that we must do is in order to learn how to live and work in space 
and live and work in space for long periods of time, you must actu-
ally  live  and  work  in  space  for  long  periods  of  time.  That  means 
that  we  need  a  large  number  of  crew  members  so  that  we  can  un-
derstand that. 

At this point in terms of exercise and other things that the crew 
needs, it’s still very empirical how to decide exactly how much time 
you must devote to keep crew members healthy. Through the resis-
tive exercise, we think we have found something that it is more ef-
ficient  in  terms  of  maintaining  muscle  mass  and  bone  mass  over 
long periods of time. Maybe Dr. Ross would like to comment? 

STATEMENT OF DR. HOWARD ROSS, 

DEPUTY CHIEF SCIENTIST, NASA 

Dr.  ROSS.  The  medical  benefits  that  we  continue  to  learn  on  the 
International  Space  Station  contribute  broadly  back  here  on  Earth 
as  well.  From  the  Space  Station  experience  so  far  we’ve  been  able 
to  determine  how  much  bone  loss  takes  place.  Something  we  had 
a sense of before, but for the first time we have good statistics. And 
in addition, we know where that bone loss is taking place. 

We’re  using  equipment  such  as  ultrasound  equipment  in  ways 
that  it  was  never  envisioned  here  on  Earth  to  use.  And  that  par-
ticular  equipment  that  Colonel  Fincke  used  in  orbit,  in  fact,  has 
shown  some  really  promising  applications  both  in  space  so  that 
there  would  be  less  mass  required,  safer  and  more  portable  equip-
ment.  And  he  can  comment  here  about  the  Earth  applications  of 
that particular device. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Colonel  FINCKE.  Yes.  So,  I’m  not  an  ultrasonographer,  but  with 
the help of tele-medicine, having a specialist on the ground talk me 
through  it,  I  only  had  a  few  hours  of  training  on  the  machine—I 
was able to take clinical quality images of our bones and our inter-
nal organs with the ultrasound machine. 

So,  for  the  first  time  we  were  able  to  image  our  bones,  because 
we have bone loss and we were able to see that with clinical qual-
ity images. 

The  same  techniques  can  be  applied  directly  to  rural  medicine. 
That  way  you  don’t  need  the  doctor  out  in  the  field  you  just  need 
a  technician  and  then  talk  to  the  doctor  in  a  big  city.  In  addition 
to  rural  medicine  it’s  valuable  for  the  military  and  we’ve  even 
started  working  it  with  sports  teams.  I  think  the  Detroit  Red 
Wings had a chance to practice some of these things. So, there’s di-
rect application with our experience with ultrasound. 

The CHAIRMAN. Are you able, from all the observations you have 
had with people in space and the bone loss, to remedy some of that 
to  build  it  back  in  the  areas  where  you  are  losing  the  most?  And 
has that come from the research in space? 

Mr. READDY. Go ahead. 
Dr.  ROSS.  One  of  the  things  we’ve  learned  is  that  you  cannot  al-
ways count on what we knew or thought would work on Earth. We 
really do need to test them in space on the International Space Sta-
tion. We have, in fact, through the work done to date improved the 
exercise regimens that the crew goes through so that the bone loss 
that  is  experienced  is  mitigated  substantially  by  what  we  have 
learned.  Same  thing  from  nutrition.  We  know  how  important  im-
proved nutrition is for a crew up there. 

In the future we plan to use some of the techniques or test some 
of the techniques that we have developed on orbit for use on Earth 
to treat osteoporotic people. That’s particularly the drugs that they 
can take, the bisphosphonates that in fact should mitigate some of 
this, but we need to test it in space. We’ve found over and over that 
space continues to surprise us. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  would  like  to  ask  you,  Dr.  Ross,  what  other 
areas of scientific research do you see as possible if we unleash the 
Space Station to its full potential? 

Dr.  ROSS.  Well,  let  me  talk  more  generally  then  about  the  bene-
fits  of  Space  Station,  to  put  it  in  a  context  of  the  full  benefits  of 
human space flight. Just give me a brief moment to digress. 

Yesterday we recalled the events from 10 years ago with the Fed-
eral Building in Oklahoma City. Few people know that NASA tech-
nology  was  used  in  the  rescue  and  recovery  efforts  by  fire  fighters 
and  other  emergency  workers  that  could  very  quickly  use  some  of 
the  devices  that  came  from  Shuttle  technology  to  cut  through  ca-
bles, cut through steel. And it helped with the rescue and recovery. 
The  same  was  true  at  the  World  Trade  Center  recovery  efforts; 
the  same  technology  got  used.  Furthermore,  the  safety  of  the  food 
that each of us eats, the system that’s used to assure its safety was 
developed  by  NASA  and  was  adopted  only  five  or  six  years  ago  by 
the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  and  the  United  States  Depart-
ment  of  Agriculture.  And  we  watched  national  salmonella 
incidences go way down. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

So, it’s from that legacy that we build on what the Space Station 
is now capable of. And it is a broad sweep of things. We just talked 
about  ultrasound.  There  was  an  experiment  on  the  Station  called, 
‘‘FOOT’’  and  the  principal  investigator  from  the  Cleveland  Clinic 
Foundation,  Dr.  Peter  Cavanagh,  has  said  it  is  giving  him  insight 
into  the  role  of  exercise  in  treating  osteoporosis  for  both  on  orbit 
and  on  Earth.  And  I  want  to  be  clear:  The  bone  loss  that  occurs 
in  crew  is  roughly  ten  times  the  rate  that  occurs  here  on  Earth. 
So, it’s quite a serious problem. 

Much  of  our  work  with  plants  in  space  has  spun  off  back  here 
on  Earth.  As  far  as  the  future  science,  there  is  certainly 
human—— 

The CHAIRMAN. What do you mean plants? 
Dr.  ROSS.  I’m  sorry.  Agriculture.  There  was  an  experiment—— 
The CHAIRMAN. You mean a better quality of more resistant type 

strain? 

Dr.  ROSS.  One  of  the  reasons  we  would  like  to  grow  plants  in 
orbit  is  to  help  with  the  life  support  system  so  that  as  part  of  the 
regenerative  of  life  support  system,  we  have  the  carbon  dioxide 
taken  up  by  the  plants  and  return  oxygen,  if  you  will.  In  addition 
there  are  psychological  benefits  simply  to  watch  something  grow 
other than your own hair when you’re in space. Furthermore, it can 
be a food source. But it’s been difficult in the past in space to grow 
plants  correctly.  We  on  the  Space  Station,  for  the  first  time,  are 
able to do that quite well. 

The  principal  investigator,  Gary  Stutte  from  in  Florida  in  fact, 
was  able  to  spin  off  benefits  for  new  growth  media  that  are  used 
to  help  nurture  agriculture  here  on  Earth.  New  sensors  for  meas-
uring  soil  moisture,  oxygen  sensors,  the  commercial  companies 
have  picked  up.  Research  communities  and  soil  physics  are  using 
his  work.  Even  people  trying  to  look  at  the  effects  of  climate 
change  are  using  some  of  the  models  that  got  developed  from  that 
experiment.  So,  the  simple  subject  of,  ‘‘Can  we  grow  a  plant  in 
space?’’ has in fact let us back here benefit quite substantially. 

The CHAIRMAN. I am going to finish this and then go to the next 
round. We are taking longer in our rounds, but Colonel Fincke, you 
are  a  member  of  the  American  Geological  Society.  And  I  wondered 
if  that  would  be  an  area  for  scientific  research  on  the  Space  Sta-
tion? 

It’s  not  ever  mentioned  in  any  of  the  NASA  material,  but  it 
seems  that  if  we  are  going  to  use  what  we  learn  on  the  Moon  to 
prepare  to  go  to  Mars  that  taking  some  of  the  matter  from  the 
Moon and looking at it in the Space Station might have some bene-
fits. Is there a research path there? 

Colonel FINCKE. Yes. And first and foremost we’ve been using the 
Space Station to look at our own beautiful planet. I took 21,000 pic-
tures  in  my  spare  time.  We  have  a  beautiful  planet.  But  when  we 
go  to  the  Moon,  the  Moon  is  incredible  with  its  amount  of  re-
sources.  It  has  a  lot  of  things;  an  abundance  of  metals  like  tita-
nium and iron that are bigger preponderance on the Moon than on 
the  planet,  on  Earth.  So  to  be  able  to  use  those  resources  of  the 
Moon for lunar bases and things like that as well as to maybe even 
use those resources sometime back here on the planet Earth. Those 
are outstanding, incredible possibilities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

The  Space  Station  can  help  along  the  way.  It  takes  a  while  and 
it  takes  some  effort  and  energy  to  get  the  samples  back  and  forth 
to the Moon, down to the planet Earth. We may be able to certainly 
do  some  research  on  the  materials  and  melt  them  and  do  all  the 
things  that  we  can  only  do  in  zero-g  or  reduce  gravity  aboard  the 
International Space Station. 

As we go forward and understand how we’re going to explore the 
Moon and beyond, I think this will be an important part of under-
standing  the  resources  from  the  Moon  and  how  the  Space  Station 
will play in there. 

The CHAIRMAN. I was interested in your thoughts on what would 
it  take  to  justify  the  International  Space  Station  to  be  designated 
as a national lab? 

I  would  be  interested  in  Dr.  Ross  or  Mr.  Readdy  telling  us  if 
NASA has ever looked at that as a way to assure that the scientific 
basis is going to be a priority and a long-term priority? 

Dr.  ROSS.  In  the  recent  past  before  the  announcement  of  the  Vi-
sion,  we  looked  at  broadening  the  community  of  people  that  were 
involved with the International Space Station and issued a request 
for  information  that  listed  all  the  potential  tasks  that  we  could 
turn  over  to  a  national  laboratory  of  like  situation;  an  institute  if 
you will. A research institute. 

That  list  was  being  reviewed,  commented  upon  by  industry,  by 
all  comers  if  you  will.  Then  we  suspended  the  process,  frankly, 
when the Vision got announced as the purpose of the International 
Space  Station  became  more  focused,  if  you  will,  in  support  of  the 
Vision. 

Some  of  the  tasks  there  are  really  quite  challenging  to  use  in  a 
national  laboratory  model.  Private  medical  data,  for  example,  that 
we gather is something we wouldn’t easily use through an institute 
the same with international agreements. But in the long run as the 
Station  evolves  over  time  certainly,  I  know  we’ve  had  internal  dis-
cussions,  that  we  would  want  to  come  back  and  look  at  it  again. 
This  is  a  postponement,  if  you  will,  or  a  suspension  of  the  activi-
ties. It’s not necessarily a termination. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  could  it—could  not  the  scientific  experi-
ments  that  you  could  do  in  a  national  lab  at  the  Station  be  done 
in a way that it would enhance what you are also doing to prepare 
for exploration of the Moon and then beyond? 

Dr. ROSS. Well, certainly we’re proud of all the experiments that 
we  go  on  now.  Everything  gets  peer  reviewed  and  it  is  a  broad 
array  of  experiments.  To  the  extent  we  can  broaden  the  commu-
nity,  broaden  the  number  of  people,  increase  the  number  of  people 
who  are  aware  of  what  we  can  do  on  the  International  Space  Sta-
tion and then subsequently do experiments, that’s, of course, a good 
thing. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Is  there  something  more  that—or  let  me  ask 
this. Do you see a prototype for how you would have a national lab 
designation?  Different  labs  are  run,  some  by  university,  some  by 
private  corporations,  some  with  consortia.  Do  you  see  a  best  way 
to approach this that might not only fulfill the Vision, but also give 
more emphasis to science? 

Dr.  ROSS.  The  agency  in  the  past  has  looked  at  eight  different 
models  of  FFRDC’s  versus  other  non-governmental  organizations 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

running  this.  I  don’t  think  we  settled  on  one  exact  model,  in  fact, 
the process we were going through was going to attempt to compete 
and elicit what would be the best model. 

So, I don’t think we settled on one yet. But again if we come back 
to  this  in  the  future  that’s  something  that  would  be  wrung  out  of 
the process. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  would  like  for—to  ask  you  to  submit  for  the 
record  the  preliminary  research  that  was  done  so  that  we  get  an 
idea  of  where  you  are  going  to  determine  if  that  might  be  a  part 
of a re-authorization. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

ISS UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT CONCEPT DEVELOPMENT STUDY 

On January 10, 2003, NASA submitted a report to Congress in response to direc-
tion accompanying the FY 2001 and FY 2003 VA-HUD-Independent Agencies Appro-
priations  Acts  (Pub.  L.  106–377  and  Pub.  L.  107–73,  respectively).  The  report  re-
flected the results of a seven-month, study-assessing options for ISS utilization man-
agement. The study set the following objectives for ISS utilization management: (1) 
to  facilitate  the  pursuit  of  flight  research;  (2)  to  optimize  research  opportunities 
within  current  capabilities  of  ISS  and  with  future  enhancements  for  greater  capa-
bilities;  and,  (3)  to  increase  the  long-range  productivity  of  science,  technology,  and 
commercial  research  and  development  aboard  the  ISS.  Designation  of  the  ISS  as  a 
National lab was not considered as part of the study. 

As  a  key  part  of  the  NASA  study,  the  scope  of  utilization  work  was  defined  as 
twenty-one principle functions ranging from development of strategic plans to archi-
val of research samples. A few functions, such as policy development and safety cer-
tification, were determined to be inherently governmental. The other functions were 
analyzed as candidates for delegation to a non-governmental organization. 

Ten  potential  business  models  were  evaluated.  Two  business  models—a  research 
institute  and  a  federally  funded  research  and  development  center  (FFRDC)— 
emerged  as  the  best  choices.  A  scoring  process  based  upon  an  agreed  upon  set  of 
evaluation criteria resulted in the research institute ultimately emerging as the pre-
ferred business model. 

The  resulting  NASA  report *  was  based  on  a  thorough  qualitative  and  quan-
titative analysis of the study results and extensive discussions with senior managers 
across  the  Agency.  In  the  report,  NASA  recommended  the  establishment  of  a  non-
governmental  organization,  specifically  a  non-profit  institute,  to  perform  research 
leadership functions including significant aspects of research planning, manifesting, 
prioritizing, resource allocation, advocacy, outreach, and archiving. 

A two-phase contracting approach was recommended. A phase one contract would 
be  implemented  to  focus  on  science,  technology,  and  commercial  (S/T/C)  leadership 
functions. The phase two contract, if implemented, would maintain the S/T/C leader-
ship  focus  and  add  responsibility  for  the  additional  utilization  management  func-
tions.  Factors  influencing  the  decision  on  the  recommended  approach  included  the 
importance  of  maintaining  an  institute  focus  on  the  S/T/C  leadership  functions,  the 
need  to  clearly  establish  requirements  for  the  additional  utilization  management 
functions,  and  the  belief  that  a  single  entity  should  ultimately  have  the  end-to-end 
authority and accountability for the competitively-sourced functions. 
Future ISS Research 

The  International  Space  Station  is  not  anticipated  to  have  excess  utilization  ca-
pacity beyond meeting the needs of the Vision for Space Exploration and our inter-
national  partners  through  the  middle  of  the  next  decade.  Over  the  next  several 
years,  as  the  Space  Station  research  agenda  focused  on  the  Vision  is  achieved,  it 
will  be  beneficial  to  reexamine  the  next  set  of  research  priorities.  Until  that  time, 
it  would  not  be  practical  to  expand  the  Space  Station  research  functions  to  cover 
the wider agenda of a National research facility. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Did  you  have  anything  else  to  add  on  that,  Mr. 

Readdy? 

Mr. READDY. No. 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Nelson. 
Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairman.  I  am  curious, 
since you had less bone loss, Colonel Fincke, what were some of the 
things  that  you  did  specifically  in  order  to  lessen  that  bone  loss? 
Colonel  FINCKE.  I  think  our  studies  are  showing  that  compared 
to  when  we  first  started  flying  up  to  Space  Station  Mir  and  had 
American  astronauts  on  the  Russian  space  station  from  that  time 
on  when  we’ve  had  Americans  and  human  beings  altogether  in 
space where we’re learning a lot of things. 

Our  exercise  countermeasure  program  is  pretty  outstanding. 
Gennady and I worked out for two and a half hours every day. Re-
sistive exercise combined with cardiovascular exercise like running 
or on a stationary bike. 

I  honestly  believe  that  the  data  show,  or  at  least—certainly  in 
my experience, because I exercised I came back feeling strong, feel-
ing healthy and with minimum but still some bone loss. And we’re 
working  hard  to  figure  out  why  these  things  happen.  The  images 
from  the  ultrasound  machine  will  be  helpful.  And  we’re  still  work-
ing  on  this,  because  we  need  to  understand  the  mechanisms  why 
it  happens  and  how  to  counteract  it,  because  when  we  go  to  the 
Moon and Mars it’s a long time on the lunar surface and it’s a long 
trip to Mars. 

Senator NELSON. How did you get the resistance in the exercise? 
Colonel  FINCKE.  There’s  a  machine  called  the  resistive  exercise 
device  or  the  ‘‘RED.’’  It  consists  of  a  cylinder  that’s  about  this  big, 
two  feet  by  maybe  about  I  don’t  know  one  foot  in  diameter.  There 
are  two  of  these  devices.  They  have  some  rubberized  components 
on  the  inside.  We  can  dial  a  certain  resistance  and  then  pull  on 
some cords. 

From  that  we’ve  had  a  very  clever  team  on  the  ground  that  we 
can do all the things like upper body strength exercises to the real-
ly  important  one  which  we’re  doing—what  are  referred  to  as 
squats. All that stress on our bones and muscles while we’re doing 
these squat exercises really helped our hips not to lose bone so fast. 
We could dial up exercise up to some very high weights just to keep 
us progressing. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  on  a  treadmill,  is  it  still  the  old  style 
treadmill where you put on a harness with bungee cords that forces 
you down? 

Colonel FINCKE. Yes, Senator. For the last month—that’s exactly 
how  I  did  it  for  the  first  5  months.  For  the  last  month  we  actu-
ally—I  ran  out  of  bungees.  In  other  words,  they  couldn’t  pull  me 
down  hard  enough,  so  we  used  a  device  that’s  on  the  treadmill 
called  the  ‘‘Subject  Loading  Device.’’  And  I  could  dial  in  or  type  in 
how many pounds I wanted to pull me down so I could be running 
effectively  at  my  own  weight  on  the  ground.  I  was  doing  that  up 
in space. 

So,  we’ve  come  a  long  way  with  our  exercise  equipment  and  we 

still have a long way to go, however. 

Senator  NELSON.  Did  your  crew  mate  exercise  as  diligently  as 

you did? 

Colonel FINCKE. Yes. He was—— 
Senator NELSON. And he had a similar less bone loss? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Colonel FINCKE. I’m not privy to his medical data, but he seemed 

to be looking and feeling pretty good when he came back home. 

Senator NELSON. That is very, very encouraging. 
Mr. Readdy, one of the things that Senator Hutchison and I had 
hammered at the confirmation hearings of Dr. Griffin was that we 
are concerned about this proposed hiatus between the time that the 
Space Shuttle would be stopped in 2010 and then who knows what 
time  that  the  crew  exploration  vehicle  would  be  ready.  And,  of 
course,  Dr.  Griffin  had  indicated  that  he  was  going  to  try  to  speed 
that up so that there was not much of a hiatus. 

Your  current  plan  is  that  it  may  have  the  option,  the  CEV  may 
have the option of docking with the Space Station. Why would that 
not  be  part  of  the  plan  so  that  we  can  still  continue  to  use  the 
Space Station without having to rely just on another nation’s, spe-
cifically  the  Russian  vehicle,  to  get  to  the  Space  Station  after  the 
year 2010? 

Mr.  READDY.  Sir,  first  of  all  I  have  to  compliment  our  Russian 
partners,  because  they  have  done  exactly  what  they  committed  to 
do  in  terms  of  providing  the  Soyuz  vehicles  for  crew  rotation  as 
well  as  crew  rescue  and  Progress  vehicles  for  resupply.  But  you’re 
both absolutely right on that score. 

I  know  the  Administrator  committed  to  you  both  when  he  was 
doing  his  visits  that  we’re  going  to  accelerate  the  crew  exploration 
vehicle and he’s conducting the review already of that. He’s named 
people  to  start  reviewing  the  baseline  plan  that  we  had  had  for 
Project  Constellation,  to  accelerate  that  program  so  that  we  can 
minimize the gap. 

You’re  quite  right  as  that  International  Space  Station  ought  to 

have access from U.S. vehicles as well. 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  my  question  was,  well  why  is  that  just  an 

option? Why are we not actually planning that? 

Mr.  READDY.  No.  The  previous  baseline  did  show  that  as  an  op-
tion,  I  think,  in  the  request  for  proposal.  But  I  think  Dr.  Griffin 
is actively reviewing that as we speak. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  that  is  encouraging  too.  After  you  fully 
assemble  the  Space  Station  and  on  the  timeline  that’s  what  year 
now? 

Mr. READDY. 2010, Sir. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Then what is the role of the Space Station 
once  we  have  it  fully  assembled  and  supposedly  the  Space  Shuttle 
is over and done with? 

Mr.  READDY.  Well,  as  you  know  from  your  own  personal  experi-
ence,  the  Space  Shuttle  is  a  very  unique  vehicle  and  it’s  not  with-
out  risk.  That  was  pointed  out,  obviously,  and  the  loss  of  our  col-
leagues on the Challenger and then again on Columbia. 

The  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board  pointed  out  that  it’s 
inherent  design  has  risk  associated  with  it.  Our  job  is  to  use  the 
Space  Shuttle  for  those  missions  that  it’s  uniquely  qualified  to  do. 
Those  include  assembly  of  International  Space  Station  where  you 
need  robotic  capability,  you  need  crew  capability  to  do  the  space 
walks,  you  need  the  rendezvous  docking  and  the  environment  of 
the  payload  bay  in  order  to  take  those  very  large  modules  up  to 
Space Station. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

So,  as  the  Vision  was  being  formulated  our  input  to  that  vision 
was  we  should  minimize  the  number  of  Space  Shuttle  flights  to 
those  essential  to  complete  International  Space  Station  and  honor 
our international commitments. 

As the Space Station is completed, we expect to be able to do lo-
gistics  not  only  from  our  international  partners,  the  Russians  cer-
tainly with their Progress vehicles, the Europeans next spring with 
Autonomous  Transfer  Vehicle  Jules  Verne  which  is  right  now  over 
in  Holland  being  completed.  They’re  working  with  the  Ariane 
which  is  now  the  ten-ton  version  has  just  returned  to  flight  here 
2 months ago. So, they’re on track to provide a redundant logistics 
leg.  I  know  a  number  of  American  contractors  are  looking  at  that 
capability  to  see  if  it  would  launch  on  our  launch  vehicles  as  well. 
Then our Japanese partners similarly returned to flight on their 
H–II  launch  vehicle  in  February.  They  are  progressing  well  on 
their HTV, which is a H–II transfer vehicle that in addition to mat-
ing with the U.S. portion of the Space Station allowing much larger 
transfer  of  pressurized  cargo  also  has  the  capability  of  taking  up 
un-pressurized  cargo  such  as  gyrodynes  and  batteries  and  things 
like that. 

Clearly,  we  would  also  like,  United  States  industry  and  entre-
preneurs to supply us with the possibility of logistics here from the 
United  States.  And  we  are  putting  out  a  request  for  proposal  here 
at  the  end  of  the  summer  with  the  expectation  that  by  the  end  of 
the  year  we  would  be  able  to  do  that  probably  around  the  year 
2009. 

The role of the Space Shuttle Orbiter at that point would not be 
required.  Clearly  eliminating  the  gap  that  both  of  you  have  men-
tioned  and  crew  exploration  vehicle  and  making  sure  it  has  the 
possibility of docking at Space Station is a critical part of that. 

Senator  NELSON.  Is  the  present  thinking  that  the  CEV  is  going 

to launch on an EELV or some Shuttle-derived vehicle? 

Mr. READDY. Admiral Steidle would be better to comment on that 
than  I.  But  the  initial  plan  that  they  have  provided  to  us  and  in-
dustry  are  two  competing  designs.  Spiral  One  would  not  in  fact  be 
a crude vehicle. It would be a demonstration of the capability, and 
I think, they’re silent on what launch vehicle would be required to 
do those demonstrations. 

Downstream, though, I think the expectation is that the crew ex-
ploration  vehicle  would  be  of  such  a  size  in  mass  that  would  re-
quire  heavy  lift  launch  vehicle  and  that  could  be  one  of  the  EELV 
derivatives or it might wind up being some kind of Shuttle-evolved 
design. 

Senator  NELSON.  There  has  been  some  concern  expressed  about 
the RCS system accidentally activating while the Space Shuttle Or-
biter  is  docked  to  the  International  Space  Station.  Could  you  dis-
cuss the things that we should be worrying about and what we are 
going to do? 

And  particularly  once  you  have  got  all  the  mass  up  there  that 

has been assembled. 

Mr.  READDY.  Certainly.  The  Senator  is  referring  to  the  reaction 
control system, RCS. These are 44 thrusters that are on the Space 
Shuttle Orbiter, they’re used to maneuver the Space Shuttle. When 
docked  to  the  International  Space  Station  we  also  use  the  vernier 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

or the lower thrust versions of those to re-orient the Space Station. 
So,  operation  of  those  jets  is  not  anything  that  we  wouldn’t  have 
planned to do normally. 

I think the failure mode that you’re referring to is the jet driver, 
the  reaction  control  jet  driver  device.  One  of  the  outcomes  of  the 
Columbia  accident  was  we  established  a  NASA  Engineering  and 
Safety  Center.  They  surfaced  a  failure  mode  that,  as  yet,  they 
haven’t  quantified  whether  it’s  a  one-in-a-thousand  or  one-in-ten- 
thousand  chance  that  this  driver  device,  which  is  what  translates 
either the pilots input or the computers input into firing of the ap-
propriate reaction control jet. Whether through failure of one of the 
electronic  devices  in  it,  it  might  inadvertently  command  a  jet  to 
fire. 

As  you  mentioned,  the  concern  would  be  that  it  would  perhaps 
put  too  large  a  load  into  the  docking  interface  and  the  Inter-
national Space Station. 

Well,  I’d  offer  three  things.  For  the  first  two  flights,  which  are 
logistics flights that is not an issue given the configuration of Space 
Station  even  were  the  jets  to  fire  inadvertently.  But  given  the  fact 
that we acknowledge that there’s the possibility, however remote of 
this  failure  occurring,  we  turn  off  the  reaction  control  jet  drivers 
as soon as we’re docked to help alleviate that as a possibility. 

Further, we would also secure the manifolds to the reaction con-
trol  jets  so  that  they  wouldn’t  have  any  propellants.  As  an  addi-
tional measure, though, as the Space Station increases in mass and 
future configurations after STS–115, what we will also do is a soft-
ware  modification  to  the  Orbiter  orientation  system  such  that  the 
pulse size of the jets of the primary thrusters would be insufficient 
to cause any kind of structural issue. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  Colonel  Collins  is  satisfied  with  where  we 

are on this? 

Mr. READDY. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  How  about  the—presently  you  have  two  gyro-
scopes  that  are  operational  and  one  of  those  possibly,  is  going  to 
fail.  How  are  we  going  to  get  replacement  gyros  to  the  Station,  if 
the—if this return to flight were to be postponed? 

Mr. READDY. To start out, I’d like to complete my answer to your 
previous  question  in  terms  of  Eileen  Collins  and  STS–114.  I  just 
want  to  make  very  clear  that  the  failure  mode  that  you  describe 
is  not  an  issue  for  STS–114,  it’s  not  an  issue  for  STS–121  either; 
the  second  test  flight.  We  have  controls  in  place  so  that  we  don’t 
think it’s a credible issue for subsequent flights either. 

In terms of your question about the gyroscopes or the control mo-
mentum  gyros,  Mike  Fincke  actually  had  an  opportunity  to  do  a 
space  walk  while  he  was  up  there  and  I’ll  ask  him  for  his  com-
mentary here in a moment. 

There  are  four  gyros  onboard  the  International  Space  Station. 
They  are  the  non-propulsive  means  of  orienting  the  Space  Station 
and pitch, roll, and yaw. 

There are propulsive ways to do that using the thruster jets that 
are  part  of  the  Russian  part  of  International  Space  Station.  Those 
function  perfectly  fine.  We’ve  got  over  a  year  of  propellants  and  so 
that’s  really  not  an  issue  were  other  gyros  to  fail.  We  do  not  use 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

the  gyros  to  orient  the  Space  Station  during  shuttle  docking;  so 
that’s not an issue. 

It  turns  out  to  be  one  of  redundancy  management.  As  you  point 
out  STS–114  does  have  a  replacement  gyro  onboard.  And  the  com-
plement  of  two  that  are  functioning  right  now  could  be  enhanced 
to three if we take the power supply and instead of making it inde-
pendent for each of the gyros if we tie it to another gyro. Here I’m 
starting to get way outside my personal knowledge, so I’d like Colo-
nel Fincke to comment. 

Colonel  FINCKE.  The  Space  Station’s  equipped  with  four  gyro-
scopes.  One  of  them  is  hard-failed.  We  think  it’s  something  maybe 
in the bearings or something. That one’s been down for a while and 
that’s the one that’s going to be replaced by this next crew. 

The  one  that  we  worked  on,  the  failure  mode  was  different.  It’s 
a power supply problem. And we went out and we changed out the 
power supply and a year later the power supply we replaced it with 
showed the same design defect. So, that gyroscope spun down. 

So,  the  trick  is  to  get  if  we  wanted  to,  if  we  thought  we  needed 
to  get  this  other  gyroscope  back  and  up  running  there’s  two  dif-
ferent ways to get power to it. We could do the same kind of space 
walk  that  Gennady  and  I  performed,  or  we  could  take  a  shorter 
space  walk  and  jumper  over  the  power  like  Mr.  Readdy  was  sug-
gesting. 

So,  it  could  be  done  by  a  Space  Station  crew.  So  if  we  really 
needed  to  get  another  gyroscope  up  and  running  it  would  require 
a  space  walk.  To  do  a  task  that  we’ve  already  done  on  either  dif-
ferent way we have experience doing that. 

So,  it’s  a  big  deal  to  do  a  space  walk.  It  takes  some  operational 
planning,  some  a  little  bit  of  Station  resources,  in  general  it’s  well 
understood issue and quite achievable. 

Mr. READDY. To complete that thought, it is planned for STS–114 
not  only  to  replace  the  failed  gyroscope  but  also  to  do  what  he  de-
scribed as really kind of hot wiring the gyroscope that has a faulty 
power  supply  so  that  we  would  be  back  in  operation  with  all  four 
gyros. 

Senator  NELSON.  Back  on  my  original  question  about  your  exer-
cise  regime.  With  this  successful  regime  that  you  employed  that 
Dr.  Ross  was  talking  about,  how  long  did  it  take  you  where  you 
could stand up and walk once you returned? 

Colonel FINCKE. I felt even though we were in space for over 187 
days that I could have walked off the Soyuz spacecraft. I was feel-
ing  very  good,  very  strong.  So  there  were  no  strength  issues.  The 
only  issue  I  had  was  really  a  balance  issue.  My  inner  ear  just 
wouldn’t balance me so I was walking a little bit zig-zag. But other 
than that I felt I could have walked off that spacecraft. 

Senator NELSON. I was zig-zag as well and I was only up 6 days. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Ross,  are  we  within  the  magnetic  field  of 
the  Earth  in  the  Space  Station  so  that  we  don’t  have  to  worry 
about protection on solar flares? 

Dr.  ROSS.  Oh,  we  are  within  the  magnetosphere,  but  we  still 
have  to  worry  about  solar  flares.  There  was  an  incident  just  this 
past  January  where  the  crew  had  to  organize  themselves,  if  you 
will, against the solar storm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Senator NELSON. And how do they do that? 
Dr.  ROSS.  Put  sufficient  shielding  in  the  path.  We  know  the  di-
rection that the radiation is coming from in such cases. So they put 
sufficient material, if you will, in the path. 

Senator NELSON. What is that shielding material? 
Dr.  ROSS.  Today  it’s  all  of  the  different  equipment  that’s  on  the 
Space  Station.  Primarily  aluminum  in  the  long  run  we  hope  to  go 
to  materials  like  polyethylene  or  more  advanced  materials  that 
have even better shielding capabilities. 

Senator  NELSON.  Will  that  be  a  component  in  the  design  of  the 

CEV, especially if it is to leave Earth’s orbit? 

Mr.  READDY.  Clearly,  we  have  to  protect  the  crewmen.  As  soon 
as you leave the magnetosphere, of course you’re subject to a much, 
much  higher  radiation.  When  we’re  talking  about  voyages  that 
would  be  hundreds  of  days,  yes,  we  do  need  to  work  on  radiation 
protection. 

Senator NELSON. Madam Chairman, thank you so much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Last question. Just to sort of summa-
rize,  if  we  had  a  5-year  hiatus  in  being  able  to  deliver  and  return 
payload  to  the  International  Space  Station,  would  science  not  be 
hurt  as  well  as  the  security  risks  of  being  unable  to  go  in  space 
when  we  know  other  countries  are  going  to  be  putting  people  in 
space more and more; even China and India possibly? 

Dr. ROSS. I guess the answer to your question is it depends what 
alternatives  are  available  at  the  time.  Certainly  there  is  pursuit 
right  now  of  other  launch  vehicles  that  would  provide  the  cargo 
transportation to and from the Space Station. That would mitigate 
any problems associated with the science. 
The CHAIRMAN. Being unmanned is—— 
Dr. ROSS. Yes. 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes. 
Dr.  ROSS.—unmanned.  The  same  thing  if  we  would  have  to  con-
tinue  to  rely  on  the  Russians  as  far  as  crew  transport  that’s,  you 
know, that’s the major concern of course. And to try to expand the 
number of crew members. 

So,  yes,  it  would  be  a  concern  until  we  explore  all  the  alter-

natives. I couldn’t tell you how much science would be hurt. 

The CHAIRMAN. But about the people not being there in sufficient 

numbers to do the experiments? 

Dr. ROSS. We hope by 2009 that the people will be there in suffi-
cient numbers. We’re planning on six people by that time. As I un-
derstand  it,  I  can  defer  this  to  Bill,  to  keep  it  populated  with  six 
people through the lifetime of the Station. 
The CHAIRMAN. Using Russian vehicles? 
Mr. READDY. Right now it appears that Russian vehicles are the 
interim  answer.  Yes,  ma’am.  But  as  I  said  before,  the  Administra-
tor’s  committed  to  accelerate  the  CEV  program  so  that  we  mini-
mize the gap. 

The CHAIRMAN. Yes. But my point was if we did not have the gap 

minimized would it not hurt our scientific—— 

Mr.  READDY.  We  would  certainly  be  dependent  on  someone  else. 
The CHAIRMAN.—capacity? 
Mr. READDY. Yes, ma’am. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Senator  NELSON.  And  Madam  Chairman,  if  I  might,  that  of 
course  is  our  dual  concern.  In  the  geopolitics  of  today  that’s  not  a 
problem,  because  we  have  this  bond,  this  close  relationship  with 
the  Russians.  But  what  is  the  geopolitics  of  planet  Earth  going  to 
look like in the year 2012? And that’s why jointly the two of us feel 
very strongly we need to accelerate the CEV. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. We appreciate your being 

here and helping us get started. 

And  I  do  want  to  have  all  of  the  work  that  you  have  done  on  a 
national  lab  and  anything  that  you  would  want  to  add  that  might 
be  useful  from  a  scientific  standpoint  that  might  be  done  in  a  na-
tional lab configuration. 
Dr. ROSS. Absolutely. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Dr. ROSS. Thank you. 
Mr. READDY. Thank you, Madam Chairman, Senator Nelson. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. I would like to call our second panel, 
Marcia Smith, Senior Analyst at the Congressional Research Serv-
ice;  Dr.  Jeffrey  Sutton,  Director  of  the  National  Space  Biomedical 
Research  Institute  in  Houston;  and  Dr.  Mary  Ellen  Weber,  Vice 
President of the University of Texas, Southwestern Medical School 
in Dallas. 

I  am  very  pleased  to  have  your  testimony  and  I  want  to  say  to 
Ms. Smith, particularly, I appreciated in your written remarks and 
maybe you will be going over this orally, but describing the mission 
of  the  Space  Station  through  the  different  presidents  was  very  en-
lightening  to  me.  And  I  want  to  go  back  to  the  Ronald  Reagan  Vi-
sion. I’ll just state that right now. 

So,  with  that,  let  me  welcome  you  and  ask  for  your  testimony. 

STATEMENT OF MARCIA S. SMITH, SENIOR ANALYST, 

CONGRESSIONAL RESEARCH SERVICE 

Ms.  SMITH.  Thank  you  very  much,  Madam  Chairwoman.  And 
thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today  to  testify  about  the  Space 
Station  program.  You  asked  that  I  focus  my  remarks  on  how  the 
rationale  behind  the  program  has  changed  over  the  years,  particu-
larly in terms of it’s expected benefits. Essentially, what was prom-
ised  and  whether  those  promises  are  likely  to  be  met  under  the 
current plan. 

I  would  ask  that  my  written  testimony  be  submitted  for  the 
record  and  I  will  try  to  summarize  it’s  key  points  in  the  next  5 
minutes. 

Ms.  SMITH.  When  he  initiated  the  Space  Station  program  in 
1984,  President  Reagan  said,  ‘‘A  Space  Station  will  permit  quan-
tum  leaps  in  our  research  in  science,  communications,  in  metals, 
and  in  lifesaving  medicines  which  could  be  manufactured  only  in 
space.’’ 

Originally,  the  Space  Station  was  to  consist  of  three  orbiting  fa-
cilities;  an  occupied  base,  an  automated  co-orbiting  platform,  and 
another  automated  platform  in  a  polar  orbit.  NASA  Administrator 
Beggs said in 1984 that it would have eight functions; a laboratory 
in  space,  a  permanent  observatory  to  look  down  upon  the  Earth 
and out at the universe, a transportation node, a servicing facility, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

.

an assembly facility, a manufacturing facility, a storage depot, and 
a staging base for more ambitious future missions. 

Repeated  cost  growth  led  to  many  changes  in  that  concept  over 
the  next  5  years.  By  the  end  of  1989  only  the  laboratory  function 
remained. President George H.W. Bush, the senior President Bush, 
made a major space policy address announcing his Moon/Mars pro-
gram  that  year  and  spoke  glowingly  of  what  was  then  known  as 
Space Station Freedom’s role in that vision. 

But the Space Station continued to be down-sized. A redesign in 
1990  to  1991  raised  concern  in  the  scientific  community,  because 
it  excluded  plans  for  a  centrifuge.  Reports  from  the  Space  Studies 
Board and the White House Office of Science and Technology Policy 
stressed  the  need  for  a  centrifuge.  The  Chairman  of  the  SSB  told 
this  Committee  in  1991  that,  ‘‘.
. a  centrifuge  is  the  single  most 
important  facility  for  space  biology  and  medicine  research.’’  NASA 
restored a 2.5 meter centrifuge to the design. 

In  1993  as  President  Clinton  took  office,  additional  cost  growth 
was  revealed.  He  directed  another  redesign  and  in  June  1993  ap-
proved  a  scaled-down  version  of  Space  Station  Freedom.  Congress 
agreed  to  proceed  with  the  redesign  program,  but  by  narrow  mar-
gins  in  the  House.  Then  in  September  1993,  Vice  President  Gore 
announced that Russia would join the program. This design includ-
ing  Russian  contributions  is  the  Space  Station  under  construction 
today, the International Space Station. 

In  1997  NASA  Administrator  Goldin  told  this  Committee  that, 
‘‘. .
. the  ISS  has  unique  characteristics  where  we  could  do  re-
search  and  bio-medicine,  biotechnology,  advanced  materials,  com-
bustion research, advanced communications, and advance engineer-
ing  and  Earth  science  that  we  could  do  on  no  other  platform.  This 
is  a  place  where  we  use  the  absence  of  gravity  to  understand  the 
laws of physics and chemistry and biology much better and rewrite 
text books.’’ 

Assembly of the Space Station began in 1998 and permanent oc-
cupancy by three-person crews began in 2000. But in 2001 as Presi-
dent  Bush  took  office  more  cost  growth  was  revealed.  The  White 
House  decided  to  truncate  construction,  canceling  plans  to  build 
certain U.S. hardware including a crew return vehicle. The decision 
not  to  build  the  CRV  affected  plans  to  increase  the  size  of  the 
Space Station crew. 

The number of crew is important in terms of how much research 
could be conducted since, according to NASA prior to it’s recent ex-
perience  with  the  two-person  crews,  that  with  a  three-person  crew 
it takes two and a half people to operate the station, meaning that 
only  one  half  of  one  person’s  time  would  be  allocated  to  research. 
The  2003  Columbia  accident  led  to  a  re-examination  of  the  fun-
damental rationale of the human space flight program. That review 
led  in  turn  to  President  Bush’s  January  2004  announcement  of  a 
Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  The  full  extent  to  which  the  Vision, 
if adopted, would effect the Space Station program is not clear yet. 
What is known is that the scope of research would be narrowed to 
only  that  which  supports  the  Vision.  There  would  be  fewer  years 
during which NASA would conduct research and the Shuttle would 
not be available to support scientific operations after 2010. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

What  is  not  known  yet  are  details  of  the  new  research  program, 
and therefore, what benefits can be expected from it, what the ISS 
crew size will be and how many will be NASA astronauts; whether 
the  centrifuge  will  be  completed,  and  what  capabilities  may  be 
available from other partners or the U.S. commercial sector to take 
cargo to and from ISS instead of the Shuttle. 

Therefore,  the  extent  to  which  Space  Station  research  will  re-
write  text  books,  as  Mr.  Goldin  forecast  in  1997,  remains  to  be 
seen. Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Smith follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARCIA S. SMITH, SENIOR ANALYST, 

CONGRESSIONAL RESEARCH SERVICE 

Madam  Chairwoman,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me 
to  testify  here  today  about  the  space  station  program.  You  asked  that  I  focus  my 
remarks on how the rationale behind the program has changed over the years, par-
ticularly  in  terms  of  its  expected  benefits—essentially,  what  was  promised,  and 
whether those promises are likely to be met under the current plan. 

The space station program has been an international endeavor since its inception. 
Today,  Russia,  Canada,  Japan,  and  10  European  countries 1 are  partners  with  the 
United  States  in  building  the  International  Space  Station  (ISS).  My  testimony  will 
not  address  how  the  non-U.S.  partners  have  won  support  from  their  governments, 
or  what  benefits  they  expect,  however.  The  focus  here  is  on  how  NASA  and  the 
White  House  have  explained  the  rationale  for  and  expected  benefits  from  the  pro-
gram  to  the  U.S.  Congress.  My  testimony  would  not  be  complete,  though,  without 
noting  that  the  other  partners  are  vital  to  NASA’s  use  of  the  space  station.  NASA 
is dependent on Russia for crew and cargo transportation to and from ISS while the 
space  shuttle  is  grounded.  Under  President  Bush’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration, 
NASA  will  continue  to  be  dependent  on  Russia  to  enable  NASA  astronauts  to  re-
main  aboard  the  space  station  for  long  duration  missions,  and  to  have  them  there 
at all once the space shuttle is terminated in 2010. In addition, some of the research 
facilities that will be available to U.S. researchers are in Europe’s Columbus module 
and  Japan’s  Kibo  module.  Also,  Japan  is  building  a  centrifuge  and  its  accommoda-
tion  module  for  NASA  in  exchange  for  NASA  launching  Japanese  hardware.  How-
ever, NASA reportedly is reconsidering whether it needs the centrifuge. 
Rationale for and Expected Uses of the Space Station 

Four  Presidents  have  shaped  the  space  station  program—Ronald  Reagan,  George 
H.W.  Bush,  Bill  Clinton,  and  George  W.  Bush—so  I  have  separated  this  historical 
discussion into the time periods of those administrations. This is not meant to sug-
gest  that  they  were  the  only  forces  affecting  the  program.  Congress  has  played  a 
strong role in the space station’s evolution through funding decisions and oversight. 
The  two  space  shuttle  tragedies—Challenger  in  1986  and  Columbia  in  2003—also 
impacted  the  program.  Perhaps  the  biggest  influence  has  been  the  incessant  cost 
growth  and  schedule  delays  that  have  characterized  the  program  since  its  earliest 
days.  Assembly  was  originally  planned  for  completion  by  1994;  now  it  is  2010. 
NASA  estimated  the  space  station  would  cost  $8  billion  (FY  1984  dollars)  when  it 
first came to Congress to obtain approval for the program. Congress now has appro-
priated approximately $35 billion (FY 1985–2005, in current dollars), and NASA es-
timates it will cost another $10 billion through the end of construction in FY 2010. 
(Estimates do not include shuttle launch costs.) 

The  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  over  the  past  21  years  have  subjected  the 
space station to repeated downsizings and consequent reductions in its capabilities. 
It  is  not  possible  in  this  short  statement  to  review  comprehensively  the  record  of 
statements  made  to  Congress  by  the  White  House  and  NASA  about  the  rationale 
for building a space station and what could be expected from it. The examples here-
in  are  illustrative.  For  your  convenience,  I  have  summarized  the  various  changes 
to the space station’s configuration in a table appended to this statement. 

1 Belgium,  Denmark,  France,  Germany,  Italy,  the  Netherlands,  Norway,  Spain,  Sweden,  and 
Switzerland.  The  United  Kingdom  signed  the  Intergovernmental  Agreement  that  governs  the 
program, but is not financially participating in it, so the number of participating European coun-
tries is sometimes listed as 11. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Reagan Administration 

The space station program, today known as the International Space Station (ISS), 
was  formally  initiated  by  President  Ronald  Reagan  in  his  January  25,  1984  State 
of  the  Union  Address.  President  Reagan  directed  NASA  to  build  a  permanently  oc-
cupied  space  station  ‘‘within  a  decade’’  and  to  invite  other  countries  to  join  in  the 
project.  He  explained  his  reasons  for  wanting  to  build  such  an  orbiting  facility  in 
this way: 

America  has  always  been  greatest  when  we  dared  to  be  great.  We  can  reach 
for greatness again. We can follow our dreams to distant stars, living and work-
ing  in  space  for  peaceful,  economic,  and  scientific  gain.  Tonight,  I  am  directing 
NASA to develop a permanently manned space station and to do it within a dec-
ade. 
A  space  station  will  permit  quantum  leaps  in  our  research  in  science,  commu-
nications,  in  metals,  and  in  lifesaving  medicines  which  could  be  manufactured 
only in space. We want our friends to help us meet these challenges and share 
in  their  benefits.  NASA  will  invite  other  countries  to  participate  so  we  can 
strengthen  peace,  build  prosperity,  and  expand  freedom  for  all  who  share  our 
goals. 2 

NASA officials at this time articulated the need for a new space station 3 by using 
the motto that it was ‘‘the next logical step’’ in the space program. Indeed, in 1969, 
Vice President Agnew had chaired a Space Task Group to recommend goals for the 
post-Apollo space program. Briefly, the plan was to build a space station, a reusable 
space  transportation  system  to  service  it,  and  to  send  people  to  Mars.  Budget  con-
straints  led  President  Nixon  to  approve  only  one  element  of  that  plan  in  1972—de-
velopment  of  a  reusable  space  transportation  system,  which  became  known  as  the 
space shuttle. NASA declared the space shuttle ‘‘operational’’ in 1982, and then was 
ready to proceed with the next step, building a space station. 

Two  months  after  the  State  of  the  Union  Address,  then-NASA  Administrator 
James Beggs testified to the House Appropriations Committee that the cost estimate 
for the space station was $8 billion (FY 1984 dollars), and identified the eight func-
tions that the space station would serve: 

necessary, repaired; 

propelled to their destinations; 

• a  laboratory  in  space,  for  the  conduct  of  science  and  the  development  of  new 
• a permanent observatory, to look down upon the Earth and out at the universe; 
• a transportation node where payloads and vehicles are stationed, processed and 
• a  servicing  facility,  where  these  payloads  and  vehicles  are  maintained,  and  if 
• as  assembly  facility  where,  due  to  ample  time  on  orbit  and  the  presence  of  ap-
• a  manufacturing  facility  where  human  intelligence  and  the  servicing  capability 
• a  storage  depot  where  payloads  and  parts  are  kept  on  orbit  for  subsequent  de-
• a staging base for more ambitious future missions. 4 

propriate equipment, large structures are put together and checked out; 

of the Station combine to enhance commercial opportunities in space; 

technologies; 

ployments; and 

2 Ronald W. Reagan. State of the Union Address. January 25, 1984. Text available on the Uni-
versity  of  California  Santa  Barbara  (UCSB)  American  Presidency  Project  website  at:  http:// 
www.presidency.ucsb.edu/ws/index.php?pid=40205. 

3 The  space  station  approved  in  1984,  and  currently  under  construction,  is  NASA’s  second 
space  station.  The  first  NASA  space  station  was  Skylab,  launched  in  1973.  Skylab  was  not  in-
tended  to  be  permanently  occupied.  Visited  by  three  3-person  crews  in  1973–1974,  it  made  an 
uncontrolled reentry through Earth’s atmosphere in 1979, spreading debris on Australia and the 
Indian  Ocean.  The  space  station  approved  in  1984  was  intended  to  go  beyond  Skylab,  to  a  per-
manently  occupied  facility  with  sequential  crews  onboard  year-round.  Meanwhile,  the  Soviet 
Union  had  launched  the  world’s  first  space  station  in  1971  (Salyut  1).  By  1984  when  President 
Reagan  announced  the  plan  to  build  NASA’s  space  station,  the  Soviets  were  operating  their 
sixth successful space station (Salyut 7). In 1986, they launched the first element of the modular 
Mir space station. Several other modules were added to the Mir complex over many years, and 
Mir  was  permanently  occupied  from  1989–1999  (including  multi-month  visits  by  seven  NASA 
astronauts,  and  nine  dockings  between  Mir  and  NASA’s  space  shuttle).  Mir  made  a  controlled 
deorbit into the Pacific Ocean in 2001. 

4 U.S.  Congress.  House.  Committee  on  Appropriations,  Subcommittee  on  HUD-Independent 
Agencies.  Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development—Independent  Agencies  Appropria-
tions  for  1985,  Part  6,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration.  March  27,  1984.  Wash-
ington, U.S. Govt. Print. Off., p. 8 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

This  original  concept  envisioned  three  separate  space  station  facilities:  an  occu-
pied base for eight crew members in a 28.5° orbit, an automated co-orbiting platform 
nearby,  and  an  automated  ‘‘polar  platform’’  in  orbit  around  Earth’s  poles  (an  orbit 
typically  used  for  Earth  observations).  By  the  fall  of  1985,  NASA  had  settled  on  a 
‘‘dual-keel’’ design for the facility, with four laboratory and habitation modules. Over 
the  next  several  months,  NASA  approved  other  details,  including  a  few  changes 
from  that  baseline  design.  Among  the  changes  was  reducing  the  number  of  U.S. 
modules  from  four  to  two  (but  the  new  U.S.  modules  would  be  larger  so  the  total 
habitable volume was relatively unchanged), with plans for two more modules to be 
provided  by  Europe  and  Japan.  NASA  also  agreed  to  add  a  U.S.  Flight  Telerobotic 
Servicer at Congressional urging, to supplement Canada’s planned Mobile Servicing 
System. 

In  1985,  as  you  may  recall  Senator  Nelson,  NASA’s  Associate  Administrator  for 
Space Station, Phil Culbertson, told you at a hearing you convened on the space sta-
tion  and  space  science,  that  a  ‘‘fundamental  concept  upon  which  the  space  station 
has  been  and  will  continue  to  be  defined  is  that  it  will  be  designed,  operated,  and 
evolved  in  response  to  user  requirements.’’ 5 Mr.  Culbertson  explained  that  NASA 
had  worked  closely  with  prospective  users  for  the  previous  three  years,  and  estab-
lished a Task Force on Scientific Uses of the Space Station, to advise NASA on what 
the  scientific  community  wanted  and  needed.  He  listed  the  following  as  examples 
of  the  planned  scientific  uses:  Earth  observations;  astronomical  observations;  basic 
biological  and  physiological  research,  including  the  effect  of  long  duration  exposure 
to  microgravity  conditions;  research  on  the  processing  and  behavior  of  materials  in 
microgravity, including crystals and pharmaceuticals (with research to be conducted 
on  the  occupied  base,  and  full  scale  commercial  production  either  on  the  occupied 
base  or  on  spacecraft  serviced  from  the  occupied  base);  and  applications  and  tech-
nology  research  such  as  advanced  communications,  energy  conversion,  propulsion, 
controls, and human factors. 

Funding  challenges,  and  the  January  1986  Space  Shuttle  Challenger  tragedy, 
soon  impacted  the  space  station  design.  In  late  1986,  the  dual-keel  design  was  re-
affirmed, but emphasis was placed on building a single-keel first because of the re-
duction  in  the  number  of  shuttle  flights,  and  the  reduced  amount  of  cargo  that 
would be allowed aboard the shuttle, in the wake of the Challenger tragedy. An em-
phasis on early accommodation of experiments, fewer spacewalks, an extended ‘‘safe 
haven’’ concept with the possibility for ‘‘lifeboats’’ for emergency return to Earth (not 
made  a  requirement  at  this  time  reportedly  for  cost  reasons),  and  increased  use  of 
automation and robotics, were made part of the program. 

In  1987,  in  response  to  continued  cost  growth,  the  program  was  split  into  two 
phases. Phase I, to be completed by 1996, would include a single keel of the occupied 
base  (including  the  four  modules),  and  the  polar  platform.  The  second  keel,  the  co- 
orbiting platform, and solar dynamic power were deferred to Phase 2, on which fur-
ther decisions were anticipated in 1991. 

In  1988,  Canada,  Europe,  and  Japan  formally  joined  the  program  after  three 
years  of  negotiations.  Canada  agreed  to  build  a  Mobile  Servicing  System 
(Canadarm2), while Europe and Japan each agreed to build laboratory modules (Co-
lumbus  and  Kibo,  respectively).  The  partners  named  the  space  station  Freedom.  In 
return for providing services such as electrical power and crew and cargo transport, 
NASA  obtained  utilization  rights  to  half  of  the  research  facilities  in  the  European 
and Japanese modules. 
George H.W. Bush Administration 

On July 20, 1989, six months after taking office, the senior President Bush made 
a  major  space  policy  address  on  the  20th  anniversary  of  the  Apollo  11  landing  on 
the Moon. He called on the United States to return humans to the Moon and some-
day  go  to  Mars.  Space  Station  Freedom  featured  prominently  in  the  President’s  vi-
sion for the future of the space program. This excerpt may be helpful in comparing 
the role envisioned for the space station as part of a program of human space explo-
ration at that time, versus today. The senior President Bush said: 

In  1961  it  took  a  crisis—the  space  race—to  speed  things  up.  Today  we  don’t 
have  a  crisis;  we  have  an  opportunity.  To  seize  this  opportunity,  I’m  not  pro-
posing  a  10-year  plan  like  Apollo;  I’m  proposing  a  long-range,  continuing  com-
mitment.  First,  for  the  coming  decade,  for  the  1990s:  Space  Station  Freedom, 
our critical next step in all our space endeavors. And next, for the new century: 
Back  to  the  Moon;  back  to  the  future.  And  this  time,  back  to  stay.  And  then 

5 U.S.  Congress.  House.  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology.  Space  Science  and  the  Space 

Station. September 24, 1985. Washington, U.S. Govt. Print. Off., 1985, p. 6. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

a  journey  into  tomorrow,  a  journey  to  another  planet:  a  manned  mission  to 
Mars. 
Each mission should and will lay the groundwork for the next. . . . 
And  to  those  who  may  shirk  from  the  challenges  ahead,  or  who  doubt  our 
chances of success, let me say this: To this day, the only footprints on the Moon 
are  American  footprints.  The  only  flag  on  the  Moon  is  an  American  flag.  And 
the  know-how  that  accomplished  these  feats  is  American  know-how.  What 
Americans dream, Americans can do. And 10 years from now, on the 30th anni-
versary of this extraordinary and astonishing flight, the way to honor the Apollo 
astronauts is not by calling them back to Washington for another round of trib-
utes. It is to have Space Station Freedom up there, operational, and underway, 
a  new  bridge  between  the  worlds  and  an  investment  in  the  growth,  prosperity, 
and technological superiority of our nation. And the space station will also serve 
as  a  stepping  stone  to  the  most  important  planet  in  the  solar  system:  planet 
Earth. 
. . .
The  space  station  is  a  first  and  necessary  step  for  sustained  manned 
exploration . . . But  it’s  only  a  first  step.  And  today  I’m  asking . . . Vice 
President,  Dan  Quayle,  to  lead  the  National  Space  Council  in  determining  spe-
cifically what’s needed for the next round of exploration. . . . The Space Coun-
cil  will  report  back  to  me  as  soon  as  possible  with  concrete  recommendations 
to chart a new and continuing course to the Moon and Mars and beyond. 
. . . Why  the  Moon?  Why  Mars?  Because  it  is  humanity’s  destiny  to  strive, 
to seek, to find. And because it is America’s destiny to lead. 6 

Despite  this  glowing  endorsement  of  Space  Station  Freedom,  on  a  practical  level, 
the  program  continued  to  experience  cost  and  schedule  problems,  resulting  in  more 
changes  that  further  reduced  its  capabilities.  In  1989,  the  same  year  as  the  Presi-
dent’s  speech,  NASA  indefinitely  postponed  Phase  2,  and  the  polar  platform  was 
transferred  out  of  the  space  station  program  and  into  NASA’s  Office  of  Space 
Science and Applications. 

By this time, five years after the program began, of the eight functions identified 
by  Administrator  Beggs  in  his  1984  testimony,  only  one  remained:  a  single-keel  oc-
cupied base to serve as a laboratory. Construction of that base was, in turn, divided 
into two phases: an ‘‘initial phase’’ with reduced capabilities ( crew size was reduced 
from  eight  to  four,  electrical  power  reduced  from  75  kw  to  37.5  kw,  and  an  open- 
loop  instead  of  a  closed-loop  life  support  system  would  be  used);  and  an  ‘‘assembly 
complete’’  phase  when  full  capabilities  would  be  restored.  NASA  asserted  that  the 
capabilities  envisioned  in  the  1987  Phase  2  program  (dual-keel  etc.)  could  still 
‘‘evolve’’ sometime in the future to support expeditions to the Moon and Mars. 

In  1990–1991,  the  space  station  was  further  downsized  because  of  continued  cost 
problems, weight growth, and growing estimates of the number of spacewalks need-
ed  for  its  construction.  The  U.S.  modules  were  reduced  in  size  from  44  feet  to  27 
feet in length; the total length of the facility was reduced from 493 feet to 353 feet; 
the Flight Telerobotic Servicer was canceled; crew size was formally reduced to four; 
and  electrical  power  was  formally  reduced  from  75  kw  to  56  kw.  A  ‘‘lifeboat’’  was 
added to the station’s design, but was not included in the cost estimate. The ‘‘assem-
bly  complete’’  designation  was  abandoned  in  favor  of  a  concept  that  the  station 
would continually evolve in an undefined and unbudgeted ‘‘follow-on phase.’’ 

The  1990–1991  downsizing  raised  concern  in  the  scientific  community.  Among 
other things, the redesign excluded plans for a centrifuge. The Space Studies Board 
(SSB)  of  the  National  Research  Council  issued  a  report  saying  that  the  limited 
microgravity  research  that  could  be  conducted  on  the  redesigned  station  did  not 
merit  the  investment  required.  The  SSB  said  that  while  it  strongly  endorsed  the 
need  for  a  space  station  to  study  the  physiological  consequences  of  long-term  space 
flight,  the  redesigned  station  did  not  have  the  necessary  facilities  to  do  so.  It  cited 
the following as ‘‘absolutely fundamental to the acquisition of the data necessary to 
determine the feasibility of long-term human space exploration’’— 

• a dedicated life sciences laboratory with adequate scientific crew to conduct re-
• a variable speed centrifuge of sufficient radius to accommodate small primates; 

search; 

6 George  H.W.  Bush.  Remarks  on  the  20th  Anniversary  of  the  Apollo  11  Moon  Landing.  Text 
available  from  the  Bush  Library  website  at:  http://bushlibrary.tamu.edu/research/papers/ 
1989/89072000.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

• sufficient  numbers  of  experimental  subjects  (humans,  plants  and  animals)  to 

address the stated scientific goals; and 

• sufficient laboratory resources, i.e. power, equipment, space, and atmosphere, to 

support the above research requirements. 7 

In  testimony  to  this  subcommittee  on  April  16,  1991,  SSB  Chairman  Louis 
Lanzerotti  noted  that  ‘‘For  over  twenty  years,  virtually  every  internal  and  external 
life  sciences  advisory  group  to  NASA  has  emphasized  the  absolutely  critical  need 
for a centrifuge in space. A variable force centrifuge (VFC) is the single most impor-
tant facility for space biology and medicine research.’’ 8 

The  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  issued  its  own  report, 
which essentially agreed with the Academy’s findings, and similarly emphasized the 
need  for  a  centrifuge. 9 In  response,  NASA  restored  a  2.5  meter  centrifuge  to  the 
design. 
Clinton Administration 

As  President  Clinton  took  office  in  1993,  NASA  announced  $1  billion  in  cost 
growth  in  the  Space  Station  Freedom  program.  In  response,  the  President  directed 
NASA  to  redesign  the  space  station  again  to  reduce  costs.  Many  in  the  space  com-
munity  consider  this  to  be  the  most  crucial  year  in  the  space  station’s  history,  as 
the continued cost growth, schedule delays, and redesigns took their toll on congres-
sional support for the program. 

Ultimately,  a  scaled-down  version  of  the  Freedom  design  was  selected.  President 
Clinton issued a statement announcing the decision on June 17, 1993 that included 
the following rationale for proceeding with the program: 

At  a  time  when  our  long-term  economic  strength  depends  on  our  technological 
leadership  and  our  ability  to  reduce  the  deficit,  we  must  invest  in  technology 
but  invest  wisely,  making  the  best  possible  use  of  every  dollar.  That’s  why  I 
asked  for  a  review  of  NASA’s  space  station  program. . . . I  instructed  NASA 
to  redesign  the  space  station  program  in  a  way  that  would  preserve  its  critical 
science  and  space  research  and  ensure  international  cooperation,  but  signifi-
cantly reduce costs and improve management. 
NASA has met that challenge . . .
I  am  calling  for  the  U.S.  to  work  with  our  international  partners  to  develop  a 
reduced-cost, scaled-down version of the original Space Station Freedom. At the 
same  time,  I  will  also  seek  to  enhance  and  expand  the  opportunities  for  inter-
national  participation  in  the  space  station  project  so  that  the  space  station  can 
serve as a model of nations coming together in peaceful cooperation. . . .
To  make  maximum  use  of  our  investments  and  meet  the  scientific  goals  we 
have set, the specific design we will pursue will be a simplified version of Space 
Station Freedom . . .
There  is  no  doubt  that  we  are  facing  difficult  budget  decisions.  However,  we 
cannot retreat from our obligation to invest in our future. Budget cuts alone will 
not restore our vitality. I believe strongly that NASA and the space station pro-
gram  represent  important  investments  in  that  future  and  that  these  invest-
ments will yield benefits in medical research, aerospace, and other critical tech-
nology areas. As well, the space station is a model of peaceful international co-
operation,  offering  a  vision  of  the  new  world  in  which  confrontation  has  been 
replaced with cooperation. 10 

A  week  later,  on  June  23,  1993,  the  House  voted  to  continue  the  space  station 
program  by  a  one-vote  margin  as  it  considered  a  NASA  authorization  bill.  A  week 
after  that,  on  June  28,  it  voted  to  support  the  program  by  a  somewhat  wider  (24 
vote)  margin  when  considering  NASA’s  appropriations  bill  for  that  year.  Two 

7 U.S.  National  Academy  of  Sciences.  National  Research  Council.  Space  Studies  Board.  Space 
Studies Board Position on Proposed Redesign of Space Station Freedom. Letter report to NASA 
Administrator Richard Truly, March 14, 1991. pp. 1–3. 

8 U.S.  Senate.  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation.  Subcommittee  on 
Science, Technology, and Space. NASA’s Plan to Restructure the Space Station Freedom. Hear-
ing. April 16, 1991. S. Hrg. 102–268. Washington, U.S. Govt. Print. Off., 1997, pp. 52–53. 

9 White  House.  Letter  from  Dr.  D.  Allan  Bromley,  Assistant  to  the  President  for  Science  and 
Technology, to the Honorable Dan Quayle, Vice President of the United States. March 11, 1991. 
Dr. Bromley’s report called not only for a centrifuge able to accommodate animals, but a larger 
one for human subjects. 

10 William  J.  Clinton.  Public  Papers  of  the  President.  June  17,  1993.  Available  from  the  Gov-

ernment Printing Office at: http://www.gpoaccess.gov/pubpapers/index.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

months later, on September 21, 1993, the Senate voted to continue the program 59– 
40. 

By  the  time  of  the  Senate  vote,  the  space  station  had  changed  again,  however. 
On September 2, Vice President Gore announced that Russia had agreed to join the 
space  station  partnership  as  part  of  broader  cooperation  in  human  space  flight  and 
other science and technology areas. Some of the expected benefits of bringing Russia 
into  the  space  station  program  were  in  the  foreign  policy  arena  and,  while  impor-
tant, are not the focus of your hearing this morning, so I will not discuss them here. 
In terms of the capabilities of the new space station design, NASA said that, in com-
parison  with  the  design  announced  in  June  1993,  the  space  station  would  be  ready 
one year sooner, cost $2 billion less, 11 have 25 percent more usable volume and 42.5 
kilowatts  more  electrical  power,  and  accommodate  six 12 instead  of  four  crew  mem-
bers. 

Mr. Daniel Goldin, the Administrator of NASA from 1992–2001, often stated that 
this  redesigned  space  station—now  referred  to  simply  as  the  International  Space 
Station  (the  name  Freedom  was  dropped  in  1993)—would  have  ‘‘world-class’’  re-
search capabilities. In 1997, he articulated the expected scientific payoff in response 
to questions posed at a hearing before this Subcommittee: 

. . . We  happen  to  be  building  a  station  in  Earth  orbit  that  has  unique  char-
acteristics  where  we  could  do  research  in  biomedicine,  biotechnology,  advanced 
materials,  combustion  research,  advanced  communications  and  advanced  engi-
neering and Earth science that we could do on no other platform. 
We  already  have  results  back  from  our  very  early  missions  on  the  Mir  space 
station . . . [W]e  have  been  getting  absolute  breakthroughs  in  the  kind  of 
science we have in the areas of cancer research, pharmaceutical research. 
We  have  even  built  a  half-centimeter  piece  of  human  cartilage  in  the  bio-
reactor. . . . We have done incredible research in combustion. 
The  key  to  it  is  time  on  orbit  and  the  absence  of  gravity.  The  International 
Space Station is going to provide that capacity. 
Furthermore,  we’re  going  to  have  exploration  of  space. . . . In  the  process  of 
understanding  how  people  can  adapt  to  space,  we  study  healthy  physiology  in 
an abnormal environment and compare it to abnormal physiology or sick people 
in  a  normal  environment  here.  This  is  yielding  great  results,  and,  in  fact,  it  is 
so  exciting  that  the  American  Medical  Association  has  signed  a  cooperative 
agreement  with  NASA  to  take  advantage  of  the  International  Space  Station  to 
help upgrade medical techniques right here on Earth. 
. . . This  is  a  place  where  we  use  the  absence  of  gravity  to  understand  the 
laws of physics and chemistry and biology much better and rewrite textbooks. 13 
After  further  discussion,  he  cautioned  that  ‘‘ . . . I  cannot  tell  you  that  I  could 
give any American a cure for cancer. . . . ’’ or make other promises because NASA 
engages  in  long  term,  high  risk  research  for  which  the  payoff  could  be  10–20  years 
in the future. 14 

The basic design of the space station remained unchanged throughout the Clinton 
Administration.  But  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  remained  a  constant  com-
panion.  In  1997,  NASA  began  to  shift  funds  from  space  station  research  into  space 
station construction. 

In  1998,  the  first  two  elements  of  the  space  station  were  launched.  A  19-month 
hiatus followed, waiting for Russia to launch its ‘‘Service Module’’ that provides crew 
quarters. With the successful launch of the Service Module in 2000, successive space 
station crews took up residency, initiating permanent occupancy of ISS. 
George W. Bush Administration 

As President George W. Bush took office in 2001, NASA again announced signifi-
cant  cost  growth,  not  unlike  the  situation  when  President  Clinton  took  office  in 
1993. With space station construction already under way, redesign options were lim-

11 Initially,  NASA  and  the  White  House  said  that  Russia’s  participation  would  save  2  years 
and  $4  billion,  but  later  lowered  it  to  1  year  and  $2  billion.  The  estimated  savings  were  based 
on  the  fact  that  NASA  was  spending  about  $2  billion  per  year  on  the  program,  so  accelerating 
the  schedule  by  one  year  would  save  that  amount.  For  more  information,  see  CRS  Issue  Brief 
IB93017. 

12 Although  NASA  said  six  at  the  time,  the  revised  intergovernmental  agreements  that  for-
mally brought Russia into the program in 1998 call for a permanent space station crew of seven. 
13 U.S.  Senate.  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation.  Subcommittee  on 
Science,  Technology,  and  Space.  International  Space  Station.  Hearing.  September  18,  1997.  S. 
Hrg. 105–792. Washington, U.S. Govt. Print. Off., 1997, pp. 12–13. 

14 Ibid, p. 15. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

ited.  The  Bush  Administration  decided  to  truncate  ISS  construction  at  a  phase 
called  ‘‘core  complete,’’  which  included  the  launch  of  certain  U.S.  components,  and 
the hardware under construction by other ISS partners. The White House said that 
if  NASA  could  demonstrate  better  program  management,  it  would  consider  adding 
‘‘enhancements’’ to the station later. 

Three  major  U.S.  elements  were  cancelled  then  or  the  next  year:  a  Crew  Return 
Vehicle  for  returning  astronauts  to  Earth  in  an  emergency;  a  Propulsion  Module; 
and  a  Habitation  Module.  The  Administration  also  cut  the  budget  for  space  station 
research  by  $1  billion,  and  directed  NASA  to  reprioritize  its  research  program  ac-
cordingly. NASA created a Research Maximization and Prioritization (ReMaP) Task 
Force to do so. Its report was completed in 2002. 

Mr.  Goldin,  who  remained  Administrator  for  most  of  the  first  year  of  the  Bush 
Administration,  told  the  House  Science  Committee  that  the  downscaled  space  sta-
tion  still  would  support  the  ‘‘high  priority  goals  of:  (1)  permanent  human  presence 
in  space,  (2)  accommodation  of  all  international  partner  elements;  and  (3)  world- 
class  research  in  space.’’ 15 One  major  concern  was  the  decision  to  terminate  the 
Crew Return Vehicle (CRV), which was needed if the crew size was going to increase 
from three to six or seven. The size of the crew was considered vital to the amount 
of  scientific  research  that  could  be  conducted  there,  since  NASA  estimated  that  it 
took  ‘‘21⁄2’’  astronauts  to  operate  and  maintain  the  facility,  leaving  only  half  of  one 
person’s time for research when the crew size was limited to three. Mr. Goldin said 
that  ‘‘human-tended  science  would  be  greatly  degraded’’  with  a  three-person  crew, 
but  he  expressed  hope  that  a  solution  would  be  found  so  that  the  larger  crew  size 
could be restored. 16 

Mr.  Sean  O’Keefe  became  NASA  Administrator  in  December  2001,  with  a  man-
date,  inter  alia,  to  ‘‘fix’’  the  space  station  program.  Eleven  months  later,  he  won 
White House support to submit a FY 2003 budget amendment that called for adding 
$706  million  to  the  ISS  program  for  FY  2004–2007:  $660  million  to  boost  program 
reserves to ensure sufficient funds to finish the core complete configuration, and $46 
million  in  FY  2004  for  ‘‘long-lead’’  items  to  preserve  the  option  of  increasing  crew 
size  beyond  three. 17 In  December  2002,  he  and  the  heads  of  the  other  partners’ 
agencies  agreed  on  a  process  for  selecting  a  final  ISS  configuration  by  December 
2003, including how to increase the crew size. 

The  crew  size  limitation  is  based  on  the  number  of  astronauts  who  can  be  re-
turned to Earth in an emergency by a single Russian Soyuz spacecraft. In this con-
text, it is referred to as a ‘‘lifeboat’’ or ‘‘crew return’’ capability. Russia is committed 
to  having  one  Soyuz  docked  with  ISS  at  all  times  throughout  its  lifetime  to  serve 
as  a  lifeboat  for  three  people.  The  U.S.  Crew  Return  Vehicle  (CRV)  was  to  serve 
the  same  function  for  another  four.  The  Bush  Administration  had  terminated  the 
CRV,  however.  Without  it,  the  only  option  for  augmenting  lifeboat  services  is  for 
Russia to provide additional Soyuz spacecraft. Each Soyuz can only remain in orbit 
for  6  months.  Today,  Russia  launches  two  Soyuzes  per  year.  To  enable  crew  size  to 
increase  to  six,  it  would  have  to  launch  four  per  year.  Russian  space  officials  said 
that  they  could  not  afford  to  build  and  launch  the  additional  Soyuzes,  and  needed 
to  be  compensated.  NASA,  however,  is  not  permitted  to  pay  Russia  for  ISS-related 
activities unless the President certifies that Russia is not proliferating certain tech-
nologies  to  Iran  under  the  Iran  Nonproliferation  Act. 18 The  other  partners  did  not 
offer  to  pay  for  the  additional  Soyuzes,  leaving  the  situation  in  a  stalemate,  where 
it remains today. 

Debate  over  the  long  term  plans  for  the  ISS  was  soon  complicated  by  the  Feb-
ruary  1,  2003  space  shuttle  Columbia  tragedy.  The  Columbia  tragedy  has  affected 
the  space  station  program  in  many  ways.  One  outcome  is  that  it  led  to  a  review 
of  the  reasons  that  the  United  States  engages  in  human  space  flight  at  all.  That 
review  resulted  in  an  announcement  by  President  Bush  of  a  new  Vision  for  Space 
Exploration on January 14, 2004. The President said: 

15 U.S.  Congress.  House.  Committee  on  Science.  Space  Station  Cost  Overruns.  Hearing,  April 

25, 2001. Washington, U.S. Govt. Print. Off., p. 74. 

16 U.S.  Congress.  House.  Committee  on  Science.  Subcommittee  on  Space  and  Aeronautics. 

NASA Posture. Hearing, May 2, 2001. Washington, U.S. Govt. Print. Off., p. 31. 

17 The  ISS  increases  were  proposed  to  begin  in  FY  2004.  By  the  time  Congress  deliberated 
the FY 2004 budget, ISS construction was suspended because of the Columbia tragedy, and Con-
gress  cut  $200  million  from  the  ISS  budget.  The  budget  amendment  also  initiated  an  Orbital 
Space Plane program that would have been able to take crews to and from ISS, but it was ter-
minated a year later. 

18 The  relationship  between  the  ISS  and  the  Iran  Nonproliferation  Act  is  discussed  in  CRS 

Report RS22072. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Today  I  announce  a  new  plan  to  explore  space  and  extend  a  human  presence 
across  our  solar  system.  We  will  begin  the  effort  quickly,  using  existing  pro-
grams and personnel. We’ll make steady progress—one mission, one voyage, one 
landing at a time. 
Our  first  goal  is  to  complete  the  International  Space  Station  by  2010.  We  will 
finish  what  we  have  started,  we  will  meet  our  obligations  to  our  15  inter-
national  partners  on  this  project.  We  will  focus  our  future  research  aboard  the 
station on the long-term effects of space travel on human biology. The environ-
ment  of  space  is  hostile  to  human  beings.  Radiation  and  weightlessness  pose 
dangers to human health, and we have much to learn about their long-term ef-
fects  before  human  crews  can  venture  through  the  vast  voids  of  space  for 
months  at  a  time.  Research  onboard  the  station  and  here  on  Earth  will  help 
us  better  understand  and  overcome  the  obstacles  that  limit  exploration. 
Through  these  efforts  we  will  develop  the  skills  and  techniques  necessary  to 
sustain further space exploration. 
To meet this goal, we will return the Space Shuttle to flight as soon as possible, 
consistent with safety concerns and the recommendations of the Columbia Acci-
dent  Investigation  Board.  The  Shuttle’s  chief  purpose  over  the  next  several 
years  will  be  to  help  finish  assembly  of  the  International  Space  Station.  In 
2010,  the  Space  Shuttle—after  nearly  30  years  of  duty—will  be  retired  from 
service. 19 

A  NASA  budget  chart  released  the  same  day  as  the  President’s  speech  showed 
NASA  completing  its  use  of  the  space  station  by  FY  2017.  Funds  now  devoted  to 
the  space  shuttle  and  space  station  programs  could  thereby  be  redirected  to  ful-
filling  the  ‘‘Moon/Mars’’  goals  enunciated  in  the  Vision.  So  although  the  Columbia 
tragedy was a catalyst for a new Vision for the human space flight program, if that 
Vision is implemented, it also would spell the end of the space shuttle and ISS pro-
grams (from a U.S. perspective that is; the other partners might continue to use ISS 
after NASA completes its utilization). 

If  the  Vision  is  adopted,  the  full  extent  of  its  impact  on  U.S.  use  of  ISS  is  not 
yet  clear.  What  is  known  is  that  the  scope  of  research  would  be  narrowed  to  only 
that which supports the Vision; there would be fewer years during which NASA will 
conduct  research; 20 and  the  shuttle  would  not  be  available  to  support  scientific  op-
erations  by  taking  experiments  and  equipment  up  to  the  ISS  (‘‘upmass’’)  or  back  to 
Earth  (‘‘downmass’’)  once  construction  is  completed.  NASA’s  ReMaP  Task  Force 
cited  lack  of  upmass  capacity  as  one  of  the  limiting  factors  on  conducting  high  pri-
ority research. 

What  is  not  known  is  details  of  the  new  research  program  and  therefore  what 
benefits  can  be  expected  from  it,  what  the  ISS  crew  size  will  be,  whether  the  cen-
trifuge  will  be  completed,  and  what  capabilities  may  be  available  from  other  part-
ners  or  the  U.S.  commercial  sector  to  take  cargo  to  and  from  ISS  instead  of  the 
shuttle. 
Conclusion 

The  space  station  was  originally  presented  to  Congress  as  a  facility  that  would 
have eight functions. Within five years, that had been reduced to one—a laboratory 
for  world-class  research.  That  research  program  has  been  affected  by  reductions  in 
funding (in the late 1990s by shifting funds from research into construction, and in 
2001  as  part  of  the  cost-cutting  in  response  to  cost  growth  in  the  overall  program), 
and  now  by  the  direction  of  President  Bush,  narrowing  the  scope  to  only  research 
that supports the Vision. 

The extent to which space station research will ‘‘rewrite textbooks’’ as forecast by 

Mr. Goldin in 1997 remains to be seen. 

19 President  Announces  New  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  Program.  Available  at:  http:// 

www.whitehouse.gov/news/releases/2004/01/20040114–3.html. 

20 Space Station Freedom was designed with a 30 year lifetime. When the program was rede-
signed  in  1993,  NASA  shortened  the  operational  lifetime  of  the  new  station  to  10  years  (the 
modules are designed for 15 years—5 years during assembly, and 10 years of operation). Under 
the  Vision,  NASA  officials  say  the  agency  will  complete  its  use  of  the  ISS  by  2016,  six  years 
after construction is completed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Major Program Changes to the U.S. Portion of the International Space Station* 

33 

Calendar 

Year 

Fall 1985– 
May 1986 

Nature of Change 

Reason 

Reagan Administration 

Cost and user requirements. NASA 
stated that the dual-keel design 
would provide a better microgravity 
environment for scientists, more usa-
ble area for attached payloads, and 
better pointing accuracy. Cost esti-
mate maintained at $8 billion ($FY 
1984). 

Original space station concept envisioned 
three elements: an occupied base for 8 
crew members in a 28.5° orbit, an auto-
mated co-orbiting platform nearby, and an 
automated ‘‘polar platform’’ in orbit 
around Earth’s poles. The original ref-
erence design for the occupied base was 
called the ‘‘Power Tower,’’ but a ‘‘dual- 
keel’’ approach was chosen instead as the 
baseline design in the fall of 1985; the de-
tails were approved by NASA in May 
1986. Changes included: arrangement of 
truss structure and modules modified to 
place modules at center of gravity; solar 
dynamic power added to photovoltaic ar-
rays; number of U.S. laboratory and habi-
tation modules reduced from 4 to 2, with 
plans for 2 more provided by Europe and 
Japan (the new U.S. modules would be 
larger than the original design, however, 
so total habitable volume relatively un-
changed); U.S. Flight Telerobotic Servicer 
added at congressional urging to supple-
ment Canada’s planned Mobile Servicing 
System. 

Late 1986  Dual-keel design reaffirmed, but emphasis 
on building single-keel first in recognition 
of reduced availability of shuttle flights 
and reduced amount of cargo that would 
be allowed aboard the shuttle in the wake 
of the Challenger tragedy. Emphasis on 
early accommodation of experiments; 
fewer spacewalks; extended ‘‘safe haven’’ 
concept with the possibility for ‘‘lifeboats’’ 
for emergency return to Earth (not made a 
requirement at this time reportedly for 
cost reasons); increased use of automation 
and robotics; ‘‘lead center’’ management 
approach replaced with dedicated program 
office for the space station in Reston, VA. 
Program split into ‘‘phase 1’’ and ‘‘phase 
2,’’ with single keel of occupied base built 
in phase 1 and second keel delayed until 
phase 2; polar platform part of phase 1; co- 
orbiting platform and solar dynamic power 
pushed into phase 2. 

1987 

January 1986 space shuttle Chal-
lenger tragedy and concern by astro-
nauts at Johnson Space Center about 
the number of hours of spacewalks, 
or ‘‘EVAs’’; quality and quantity of 
living space; standard of safety for 
‘‘safe havens’’ (to which astronauts 
would retreat in emergencies such as 
depressurization or dangerous sun-
spot activity); lack of ‘‘lifeboats’’ for 
emergency return to Earth when the 
space shuttle was not docked with 
the station. Cost estimate un-
changed. 

Rising program costs and expected 
budget constraints. Cost estimate 
had risen to $14.5 billion ($FY 1984) 
for research and development. New 
design estimated to cost $12.2 billion 
($FY 1984) for Phase 1 and $3.8 bil-
lion ($FY 1984) for Phase 2, saving 
money in the near term, but costing 
more in the long term. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Major Program Changes to the U.S. Portion of the International Space Station*—Continued 

34 

Calendar 

Year 

1989 

Nature of Change 

Reason 

George W. Bush Administration 

Cost growth and expected budget 
constraints. NASA termed this a ‘‘re-
phasing.’’ Cost for Phase I estimated 
at $19 billion real year dollars,* or 
$13 billion FY 1984 dollars, for R&D; 
NASA estimated total program costs 
through assembly complete at $30 
billion real year dollars. 

Phase 2 indefinitely postponed; polar plat-
form transferred from space station pro-
gram to NASA’s Office of Space Science 
and Applications (was for Earth observa-
tion studies). Only remaining element is 
single-keel occupied base, divided into an 
initial phase with reduced capabilities (e.g. 
crew reduced from 8 to 4; electrical power 
reduced from 75 kw to 37.5 kw; use of 
open-loop instead of closed-loop life sup-
port system) and an assembly complete 
phase when ‘‘full capabilities’’ would be re-
stored. NASA asserted that the capabili-
ties envisioned in the 1987 Phase 2 pro-
gram (dual-keel etc.) could still ‘‘evolve’’ 
sometime in the future to support expedi-
tions to the Moon and Mars. 

1990–1991  U.S. modules reduced in size (from 44 feet 

to 27 feet); ‘‘pre-integrated truss’’ chosen 
in effort to reduce EVA requirements; total 
length reduced (from 493 feet to 353 feet); 
Flight Telerobotic Servicer canceled; crew 
size formally reduced to 4; electrical power 
reduced (from 75 kw to 56 kw); ‘‘lifeboat’’ 
added to the station’s design but not in-
cluded in the cost estimate; ‘‘assembly 
complete’’ designation abandoned with 
concept that station would continually 
evolve in an undefined and unbudgeted 
‘‘follow-on phase.’’ 

Beginning in 1990, concerns devel-
oped over rising program costs, 
weight, and too many EVAs for 
maintenance. In Dec. 1990, NASA es-
timated program costs through as-
sembly complete at $38.3 billion real 
year dollars. Congress directed NASA 
to restructure the station. New plan 
released in March 1991. NASA stat-
ed it would cost $30 billion real year 
dollars through 1999, though this 
was no longer the time when assem-
bly would be completed (see column 
to the left). GAO estimated total pro-
gram costs through 30 years of oper-
ation at $118 billion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Major Program Changes to the U.S. Portion of the International Space Station*—Continued 

35 

Calendar 

Year 

1993 

Nature of Change 

Reason 

Clinton Administration 

Space Station Freedom program termi-
nated. New design developed (initially 
called Alpha), which NASA said would use 
75 percent of Freedom’s hardware and sys-
tems. Russia added as another inter-
national partner in a second phase of the 
1993 activity. Program renamed Inter-
national Space Station Alpha, and, later, 
simply International Space Station (ISS). 
Two U.S., 1 European, 1 Japanese, and 5 
Russian modules (3 for science) accommo-
date crew of 6; Canada to build Mobile 
Servicing System; station located in 51.6o 
orbit (to allow access from Russia); oper-
ating period shortened from 30 to 10 years 
and annual operating costs reduced; ‘‘as-
sembly complete’’ designation reinstated 
(but no ‘‘follow-on phase’’ or ‘‘evolution’’ or 
capabilities envisioned by the 1987 Phase 
2 plan); space station management 
changed to ‘‘host center’’ (later ‘‘lead cen-
ter’’) at Johnson Space Center, TX; Reston, 
VA office closed. 

2001–2002 

ISS construction to be terminated after 
completion of ‘‘U.S. Core’’ and attachment 
of European and Japanese mod-
ules.Propulsion Module canceled. Habi-
tation Module and Crew Return Vehicle 
indefinitely deferred pending demonstra-
tion of improved program management 
(later canceled). Could mean that crew 
size would be limited to 3 instead of 6 or 7 
because only one Russian Soyuz (which 
can accommodate 3) would be available as 
a lifeboat. Smaller crew size would limit 
amount of science that could be conducted. 
Funding for research program cut $1 bil-
lion cut. At December 2002 ‘‘Heads of 
Agency’’ meeting, partners agree that crew 
size should be restored to six, but no de-
tails on how to accomplish it. 

Cost growth and foreign policy con-
siderations. There were two phases of 
space station program changes in 
1993. The first (February-September) 
was prompted by $1.08 billion cost 
overrun (which NASA termed ‘‘cost 
growth’’) and resulted in a new de-
sign, tentatively called Alpha, involv-
ing the original space station part-
ners (U.S., Canada, Europe and 
Japan). This design was released on 
Sept. 7, but 5 days earlier, the White 
House announced plans to merge the 
space station program with Russia’s 
primarily for foreign policy reasons. 
In November, a new ‘‘Russian Alpha’’ 
design was announced including Rus-
sia as a partner. NASA said with 
Russian involvement, ‘‘Russian 
Alpha’’ would be ready 1 year sooner, 
cost $2 billion less (a figure GAO dis-
putes), and have more scientific util-
ity than the Sept. 7 Alpha version. 
NASA’s current estimate of program 
costs for FY 1994–2002 (assembly 
complete) is $17.4 billion real year 
dollars, not including launches or 
civil service salaries (adding those 
costs would raise it to $47.9 billion, 
using average shuttle costs). Monies 
spent prior to FY 1993 ($11.4 billion) 
and operational costs for 10 years 
($13 billion) are not included. [All 
funding figures from NASA.] 
Cost growth of $4 billion over esti-
mate made in its FY 2001 budget 
submission. ISS had been estimated 
to cost $17.4 billion (real year dol-
lars) when it began in 1993 (FY 
1994). NASA’s estimate rose to $21.3 
billion and then $22.7 billion in 1998, 
to $23.4–26 billion in 1999, and to 
$24.1–26.4 billion in 2000. NASA’s 
March 2001 plan to discontinue con-
struction after the ‘‘U.S. Core’’ is 
completed and attachment of the Eu-
ropean and Japanese module results 
in a cost estimate of $22–23 billion 
and a ‘‘completion’’ date of November 
2003-October 2004. Hardware being 
built for NASA by Europe and Japan 
(Node 3 and Centrifuge Accommoda-
tion Module, respectively) as part of 
barter agreements could be launched 
if NASA has sufficient funding for in-
tegration costs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Major Program Changes to the U.S. Portion of the International Space Station*—Continued 

36 

Calendar 

Year 

2004 

Nature of Change 

Reason 

President Bush’s announcement of 
the Vision for Space Exploration, 
which directs NASA to focus its ac-
tivities on returning humans to the 
Moon by 2020 and someday sending 
them to Mars and ‘‘worlds beyond.’’ 

Construction of ISS to be completed by 
2010, and shuttle program thereupon to be 
terminated, so shuttle will not be available 
during the ISS operational phase to rotate 
crews, bring supplies or new equipment 
and experiments, return results of experi-
ments, or return equipment needing re-
pair. U.S. ISS research program to be re-
formulated to support only the Vision. If 
crew size is to increase, will be via addi-
tional Soyuz spacecraft, but no details on 
how to accomplish that (NASA prohibited 
from making payments to Russia for ISS 
because of the Iran Nonproliferation Act). 
New Crew Exploration Vehicle (CEV) to be 
built to take crews to the Moon; Earth- 
orbit capability by 2014. Between 2010 
(when shuttle is terminated) and 2014, 
U.S. will rely on Russia for crew transport 
to ISS. NASA to rely on other partners, 
and U.S. commercial sector, to take cargo 
to and from ISS after shuttle retirement. 
No commitment to use CEV to service ISS, 
although it is an option. According to 
NASA budget chart, U S use of ISS to end 
by FY 2017. 

Prepared by CRS, based on information from NASA, historical CRS publications, congressional hearings, and 

articles in the trade press. 

According  to  NASA’s  budget  books  (e.g.,  page  SI–6  of  the  FY  2001  budget  book),  estimates  in  ‘‘real  year  dol-
lars,’’  reflect  current  and  prior  year  spending  unadjusted  for  inflation,  plus  future  year  spending  that  includes 
a factor accounting for expected inflation. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Dr. Weber. 

STATEMENT OF MARY ELLEN WEBER, PH.D., VICE PRESIDENT, 

UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS, SOUTHWEST MEDICAL CENTER 

Dr.  WEBER.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  had  the  great  privilege  of 
being  a  member  of  our  Nation’s  Astronaut  Corps  for  10  years  and 
even  greater  privilege  to  fly  on  two  Space  Shuttle  flights,  the  sec-
ond  of  which  was  the  third  construction  flight  for  the  Space  Sta-
tion. And although I’m now with Southwestern Medical Center, my 
heart  and  my  passion  will  always  be  in  space.  And  I’m  so  thrilled 
that  your  Subcommittee  is  taking  up  this  hearing  and  this  topic. 
For thousands of years people have looked up at the heavens and 
tried to imagine what was out there. What could possibly be those 
points  of  light?  And  our  generations  are  so  incredibly  fortunate  to 
be  the  ones  alive  at  what  is  just  a  blink  of  time  in  the  history  of 
humankind. 

This  is  the  beginning  of  the  quest  to  creating  a  space-faring  civ-
ilization.  Anything  this  momentous  cannot  be  accomplished  in  a 
day  or  a  week  or  a  year  or  even  a  decade.  It’s  a  very  long  road 
ahead  of  us.  And  we  as  a  country  and  as  a  society  have  to  be  pa-
tient. 

Someone  recently  lamented  to  me  that  we  really  hadn’t  come 
very far in aviation because 50 years ago it took a few hours to fly 
across  the  country  and  now  it  takes  about  the  same  amount  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

time. But what they were ignoring is the fact that we have created 
this  enormous,  tremendous  infrastructure  that  doesn’t  just  move  a 
few  hundred  people  once  a  day.  We  move  millions  of  people  every 
day.  And  in  fact,  we’ve  embraced  aviation  as  a  part  of  our  society, 
as  part  of  our  economy.  And  this  is  where  we  are  with  the  space 
program as well. We need to create an infrastructure to bring space 
travel  to  our  society  to  make  it  an  integral  part  of  our  economy, 
and to be contributing to our economy. 

It’s  really  easy  to  simply  focus  on  the  flashy  events;  the  Super 
Bowl,  the  World  Series  and  to  ignore  and  diminish  the  smaller 
events, the regular season games, the daily practice. And when we 
look at space travel, certainly going to other planets is the most al-
luring thing we can do in our quest to explore space. But to dimin-
ish what we’ve done with the Space Shuttle and the Space Station 
is  a  tremendous  mistake.  These  programs  are  giving  us  this  nec-
essary  infrastructure  for  us  to  go  on  and  do  the  big  flashy  major 
events. 

The  Space  Shuttle  for  the  past  two  decades  has  focused  on  the 
most  dangerous  and  most  risky  aspect  of  any  space  venture;  that 
of leaving and returning to a celestial body. It is the most risky and 
the  most  dangerous  because  of  the  irrefutable  fact  that  you  have 
to  go  mind  numbingly  fast.  You  have  to  go  25  times  the  speed  of 
sound to get into space. 

For  the  past  two  decades  we’ve  been  learning  how  to  leave  and 
return  to  a  planet.  About  100  flights.  And  it  may  sound  like  a  lot, 
but  it  is  just  the  first  step  and  we’ve  learned  with  Challenger  and 
Columbia that we have much to learn. 

You  heard  Mr.  Readdy  talk  about  the  benefits  of  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  and  the  operational  experience  and  knowl-
edge  that  we’re  gaining.  How  to  operate  in  weightlessness.  How 
can our bodies, bodies that have evolved over millions of years, how 
can  they  operate  in  weightlessness?  And  we’re  also  mastering  the 
ground  operations  of  coordinating  this  colossal  collaboration  be-
tween  nations  across  the  entire  world.  And  this  is  going  to  be  the 
same  thing  we  need  to  do  if  we  ever  want  to  go  on  to  the  Moon 
and  Mars;  such  an  enormous  venture  is  going  to  require  the  same 
kind of collaboration. 

But  aside  from  the  operational  lessons  that  we’ve  learned,  the 
Shuttle and Station have provided some very important opportuni-
ties scientifically. We have the chance to probe biological and mate-
rial  systems  by  varying  a  force  that  we  could  otherwise  not  vary. 
This  is  information  we  cannot  possibly  get  on  the  ground.  Will  all 
research  experiments  aboard  the  Space  Station  make  a  dramatic 
impact  on  our  society?  That’s  very  unlikely.  Research—ground- 
based research—doesn’t work that way either. 

But for Congress to continue to make an investment in space and 
to  get  us  to  the  Moon  and  on  to  Mars  I  believe  that  it’s  essential 
that  we  receive  an  economic  return  from  space  research.  While  I 
was  at  NASA,  I  became  intensely  involved  in  these  efforts  to  at-
tract private sector investment in space research. And even on the 
ground,  bridging  the  gap  between  the  laboratory  and  the  market-
place  is  truly  one  of  the  most  daunting  challenges  and  I  think  one 
of  the  most  under-appreciated  challenges.  And  when  you  put  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

laboratory up in space it definitely presents some even more formi-
dable hurdles. 

38 

From  my  experience  in  working  with  one  particularly  successful 
effort  with  a  VC  firm—this  one  resulted  in  the  most  ever  paid  to 
NASA  for  a  single  space  experiment—I  believe  that  there  is  still 
some  low  hanging  fruit  out  there.  Good  opportunities  for  the  pri-
vate sector to invest. However, in order to do this right with all of 
these  hurdles,  NASA  has  to  be  diligent  in  it’s  approach  to  attract-
ing this investment and making the business case. NASA must find 
compelling needs in the marketplace. Rather than starting with the 
phenomenon we see in space, we have to start with the needs that 
the marketplace has. 

Only  if  there  is  an  extremely  compelling  need  will  it  justify  the 
expense  and  the  overhead  and  the  inaccessibility  right  now  to 
space.  And  even  more  important  than  that,  NASA  really  must 
focus on identifying specific sources of revenue from these space ex-
periments. 

I have continually heard the phrase, ‘‘Well what we think is that 
that  they’ll  be  able  to  figure  out  something  up  on  space  that  will 
help  them  with  the  process  down  on  the  ground.’’  And  that’s  not 
enough.  It  simply  doesn’t  work  that  way.  There  needs  to  be  a  spe-
cific question identified that, if answered in that space experiment, 
will be a source of some revenue for that investor. 

And  finally,  it  is  NASA’s  responsibility  to  identify  these  needs 
and sources of revenue, not the investors. Now, this may seem like 
a  simple  concept,  but  from  my  experience  this  would  actually  be  a 
paradigm  shift  for  NASA.  Very  often  and  historically  NASA  has 
put the onus on the investors to come up with how they can make 
money and put the onus on them to pitch the idea to NASA. Cred-
ible top tier investors simply don’t work this way. 

What  we’ve  seen  is  that  a  lot  of  investors  with  motives  other 
than creating a viable business are the ones that solicit NASA. And 
this is a major hurdle if we truly want to be successful at commer-
cializing  space  experiments  and  getting  that  private  sector  invest-
ment in. 

Now,  I  mention  that  I  believe  there  are  a  couple  of  areas  of  low 
hanging  fruit  for  commercialization.  If  I—if  I  have  time  I’d  like  to 
just talk about a couple of those areas. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Very  briefly.  If  you  could  just  give  us  maybe  a 
couple  of  points  and  then  I  wanted  to  go  to  Dr.  Sutton  and  then 
do  questions  and  try  to  bring  those  out.  But  I  would  like  to  know 
the two points. Thank you. 

Dr.  WEBER.  The  NASA  bio-Reactor  is  an  area  of  research  in 
which you can grow human tissues outside of the human body. Not 
cells like we did in eighth-grade biology class, but real tissues. Tis-
sues with cells that are differentiating, functioning like the organs 
in our body. This is a tremendous step forward in trying to under-
stand the cellular sources and mechanisms for disease. 

The  other  area  of  research  is  in  protein  crystal  growth.  The 
whole  idea  behind  protein  crystal  growth  is  not  in  the  crystals 
themselves  but  in  the  structures  of  the  proteins  that  you  can  get 
from these experiments. Protein structure-based drug design is pro-
lific  today.  This  is  how  we  have  gotten  the  most  exciting,  most  ef-
fective  drugs  out  there  including  those  that  fight  AIDS,  the  recent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

drugs  that  fight  flu.  But  the  bottom  line  is  not  all  proteins  can  be 
crystallized  on  the  ground.  And  in  space  we  have  the  opportunity 
to grow them more perfectly and get those structures. 

So, tissue growth and protein structure, I think, are the two low-
est hanging pieces of fruit. And with that if I could just close with 
this: 

Despite all the tangible benefits from the space program, I really 
think  that  the  most  important  comes  from  deep  within  the  human 
spirit.  There  is  no  better  example  of  this  than  what  happened  2 
years ago with Columbia. 

As  you  might  expect,  the  entire  Astronaut  Corps  was  deeply 
moved  by  these  events.  We  lost  colleagues  and  had  our  deepest 
fears  realized.  What  was  surprising  to  me  was  the  impact  that  it 
had on the entire world. The news programs literally shut down for 
anything  but  this  event.  I  had  friends  in  other  countries  that  re-
ceived  condolences  simply  because  they  were  Americans.  People 
wept  who  never  had  ever  met  an  astronaut.  And  these  were  seven 
lives. Just seven lives. And it’s really—the people were not weeping 
for  those  lives,  they  were  weeping  for  the  loss,  the  potential  loss 
of moving our society forward beyond the bounds and into new ter-
ritory. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Weber follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARY ELLEN WEBER, PH.D., VICE PRESIDENT, 

UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS, SOUTHWEST MEDICAL CENTER 

For thousands of years people have looked to the heavens trying to imagine what 
could be out there, what could those points of light possibly be. We are the genera-
tions—those  fortunate  to  be  alive  at  this  blink  of  time  in  the  history  of  the  uni-
verse—at  the  dawn  of  humanity’s  quest  to  become  a  space-faring  civilization.  Mo-
mentous  endeavors  such  as  this  cannot  be  accomplished  in  day,  or  a  year,  or  even 
a  decade,  and  yet  it  is  a  time  when  it  seems  everyone  seeks  only  instant  gratifi-
cation. 

Someone recently lamented to me that we really had not come very far, since fifty 
years  ago  it  took  several  hours  to  fly  across  the  country,  and  it  still  does  today. 
However,  this  is  ignoring  that  an  enormous  infrastructure  has  been  created,  that 
simply flying a few hundred people a few thousand miles is an entirely different un-
dertaking  than  moving  millions  about  the  globe  each  and  every  day.  Indeed,  avia-
tion  has  progressed  from  simply  a  remarkable  feat  lasting  mere  seconds  to  become 
an  inextricable  part  of  billions  of  lives  and  an  infrastructure  without  which  our 
economy simply could not function. Likewise, in creating a space-faring civilization, 
it is not merely the one-time feats of venturing into new territory that matter. Cre-
ating  the  infrastructure  and  operations  that  will  enable  space  to  be  woven  into  our 
daily lives is the more difficult—and perhaps more important—feat. 

It  is  easy  to  only  applaud  the  flashy  events,  the  Super  Bowl,  golf’s  major  tour-
naments,  or  the  Olympic  gymnastics.  But  to  eliminate  the  arduous  tedious  daily 
practice,  the  minor  competitions,  or  the  daily  workouts  would  eliminate  the  major 
events  entirely.  Similarly,  creating  new  space  vehicles  that  will  take  us  once  again 
beyond  Earth  orbit  is  certainly  an  alluring  attention-getting  element  of  the  cen-
turies-long  quest  to  become  a  space-faring  civilization.  Yet  we  cannot  eliminate  or 
diminish the value and benefits of programs such as the Space Shuttle or the Inter-
national  Space  Station.  These  programs  provide  necessary  elements  for  success  in 
the major events of human planetary exploration. They have been extremely impor-
tant,  both  necessary  to  prepare  us  and  the  next  generations  to  whom  we  will  pass 
the baton. 

The  Shuttle  program  has  focused  on  the  most  dangerous,  challenging,  and  risky 
aspects  of  any  space  venture—leaving  from  and  returning  to  a  celestial  body.  The 
challenge, danger and risk arises from the irrefutable fact that to go into space, you 
must go mind-numbingly fast, at least 25 times the speed of sound, and then return. 
The  required  speed  alone  creates  a  need  for  amazing  power  and  technologies  and 
for complex operations coordinated around the world. Understanding and developing 
technologies,  which  will  allow  us  to  control  complicated  and  delicate  operations  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

these incredible speeds and over vast distances, will take decades and perhaps cen-
turies.  For  two  decades,  with  the  Shuttle,  we  have  been  mastering  launch  and  re-
entry, learning lessons—and learning just how much we have yet to learn—over the 
course  of  a  hundred  or  so  flights.  It  is  only  the  beginning,  a  small  and  critical  step 
in the long journey to becoming a space-faring civilization. 

Similarly,  the  International  Space  Station  is  allowing  us  to  master  yet  another 
important aspect of space travel to other heavenly bodies—long-term, non-stop oper-
ations  in  space.  This  involves  mastering  living  and  working  in  space,  including  the 
challenges  of  performing  in  weightlessness  and  the  debilitation  that  happens  to  a 
body that has evolved for millions of years to use the strong force of gravity. It also 
involves  mastering  long-term,  non-stop  operations  on  the  ground  that  involve  mul-
tiple agencies and countries. The importance of this cannot be diminished, since un-
doubtedly, venturing to other planets will involve such enormous collaborations. The 
Station  has  moved  us  forward  lightyears  in  our  ability  to  operate  globally,  and  to 
understand and withstand long-duration space travel. 

Aside from the operational lessons that we have learned, the Shuttle and Station 
have provided us an unparalleled scientific opportunity in research experiments. We 
have  the  chance  to  probe  biological  systems  and  physical  materials  by  varying  a 
force  that  we  could  not  otherwise  vary.  Will  all  research  experiments  aboard  the 
Station  make  an  immediate  and  dramatic  impact?  Unlikely.  Even  ground-based  re-
search  does  not  work  that  way.  But  I  would  like  to  highlight  just  two  types  of  re-
search  done  in  space  that  promise  great  rewards  and  promise  to  return  the  invest-
ment many times over. Both tie in to the next big wave in biomedical research, that 
of understanding the basis for disease both at a cellular and molecular level. 

The first area of research I would like to highlight is growing human tissues out-
side  the  human  body,  using  the  NASA  bioreactor.  Of  course  for  over  a  hundred 
years, we have been able to grow cells—we all did it back in Petri dishes in eighth 
grade biology—but cells are not the same as tissues. In fact, when a cluster of cells 
gets large enough, they begin to differentiate, to take on different roles in the larger 
organ.  Consider  a  cancer  tumor.  It  has  a  blood  vessel  system  and  glandular  struc-
tures that enable it to secrete chemicals, chemicals important for metastasis. In the 
NASA  bioreactor,  we  have  the  opportunity  to  grow  many  types  of  tissues,  outside 
the  human  body,  on  a  large  scale,  with  cells  differentiated,  and  the  Station  allows 
us to do it for months on end. This is an unprecedented opportunity to gain answers 
about the cellular basis for diseases affecting every organ of the human body. Hun-
dreds of researchers across the country are studying many different types of tissue, 
using  a  ground-based  NASA  bioreactor,  and  those  that  get  to  fly  their  experiments 
in  space  have  an  incredible  opportunity  to  study  the  largest,  most  stress-free,  and 
highest-fidelity tissues. 

The second area of research is protein crystal growth, and these experiments have 
been flying since almost the beginning of the Shuttle program. The end result is not 
crystals themselves, but structures of protein molecules. Proteins are enormous gan-
gly  molecules  with  thousands  of  atoms,  and  nothing  happens  in  our  bodies  without 
proteins being involved. Each protein has an active site, a specific place in a specific 
structure  that  allows  it  to  combine  in  a  specific  way  with  other  proteins  to  either 
make  something  good  or  bad  happen  in  our  bodies.  If  we  knew  the  complete  struc-
ture  and  that  active  site,  it  would  be  relatively  simply  to  come  up  with  a  chemical 
to fit within that site to prevent something from happening. 

Protein crystals are the way to determine the structure. Imagine shining light on 
a glass prism; from the pattern of colors on the wall, we could determine the shape 
of  that  prism.  For  protein  crystals,  the  dimensions  are  much,  much  smaller,  so  in-
stead of light, we use x-rays to reveal their shape. With either glass prisms or pro-
tein  crystals,  any  flaws  in  them  will  disturb  the  resulting  pattern  and  prevent  the 
true  structure  from  being  revealed.  This  is  why  growing  protein  crystals  in  space 
is so beneficial. The protein crystals are extremely delicate, and in the environment 
of  space,  they  can  grow  more  quiescently  and  more  perfectly  to  reveal  more  accu-
rate—and in some cases, the only available—structures. 

Protein-structure-based  drug  design  is  now  being  done  all  over  the  world,  and  it 
has  been  the  source  of  some  of  the  most  effective  drugs  for  some  of  the  most  chal-
lenging  diseases.  These  include  HIV  drugs  that  can  eliminate  the  presence  of  the 
virus  and  make  possible  a  relatively  symptom-free  life  for  many  years.  Another  ex-
ample is a recently introduced prescription flu drug that can make any strain of flu 
possibly a one- or two-day annoyance instead of a serious multi-week, sometimes le-
thal,  illness.  Hundreds  of  billions  of  dollars  are  lost  each  year  in  this  country  due 
to common but untreatable illnesses, and the use of space to discover even one effec-
tive  drug  would  return  many-fold  the  $16  billion  we  spend  each  year  on  the  entire 
space program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

It is critical to put in perspective the level of this $16 billion investment in space 
exploration  and  research.  In  fact,  it  is  exceedingly  small  compared  to  the  other 
agency  budgets  that  must  focus  on  the  here  and  now.  For  instance,  we  have  spent 
far  more  paying  farmers  not  to  grow  crops  than  we  have  each  year  on  our  entire 
Shuttle  program.  There  are  good  reasons  to  provide  farm  subsidies,  and  yet  there 
are  equally  compelling  reasons  to  invest  even  more  in  space  research,  an  activity 
that has yielded substantial return on investment over the past four decades. 

For  research  in  general,  either  space-based  or  ground-based,  finding  immediate 
applications is a challenge that requires patience. Yet there is a prevailing demand 
for instant gratification in our society, with Wall Street and corporations responding 
almost  exclusively  to  current  quarter  earnings.  Since  I  received  my  Ph.D.  in  1988, 
virtually  all  elite  corporate  basic  research  centers  America  have  vanished—includ-
ing  those  at  Bell  Labs,  Exxon,  Xerox,  and  Texas  Instruments.  Instead,  research  is 
supported only if it can be tied to business units, with researchers having to justify 
their  existence  only  by  having  a  positive  impact  on  profit  and  loss  in  the  current 
quarter. The most important discoveries in our society would never have been made 
if  subjected  to  such  restrictions.  Research,  like  the  quest  to  become  a  space-faring 
civilization, is a long but critical road. Since companies must focus on the here and 
now, it is the responsibility of our government to look to the future, to invest in re-
search and activities that will pay dividends in the long run. 

For Congress to continue to make this investment, however, I believe that receiv-
ing  an  economic  return  from  it  is  absolutely  vital.  Therefore,  while  at  NASA,  I  be-
came  intensely  involved  in  efforts  to  attract  private  sector  investment  in  space  re-
search. Commercializing research is always a daunting prospect, but space presents 
some  additional  formidable  challenges.  In  some  successful  ventures—one  involving 
the  bioreactor  that  resulted  in  the  most  ever  paid  to  NASA  for  a  single  experi-
ment—we  learned  successful  private  investment  is  possible  with  the  right  ap-
proaches.  I  have  been  asked  to  comment  on  lessons  learned.  First,  the  bridge  be-
tween the laboratory—space-based or otherwise—and the marketplace must be built 
starting from the marketplace. This contrasts markedly with prior NASA efforts, in 
which  amazing  scientific  phenomena  observed  were  the  starting  point,  with  finding 
potential  links  to  processes  here  on  Earth  second.  Second,  there  must  be  an  ex-
tremely  compelling  market  need,  since  only  with  intense  need  will  there  be  suffi-
cient  upside  to  bear  the  cost,  the  bureaucratic  overhead,  and  the  rare  accessibility 
to  space.  ‘‘Nice-to-have’’  just  is  not  good  enough  to  warrant  the  investment.  Third, 
there must be a specific source of revenue. The phrase repeated to me over and over, 
‘‘hopefully  they  can  learn  something  up  there  that  might  be  applied  to  a  process 
here  on  the  ground,’’  simply  does  not  work.  For  instance,  exactly  what  question,  if 
answered from a space experiment, will lead to revenue? What physical lightweight 
product  can  be  produced?  Is  there  a  ‘‘gold  standard’’  that  can  be  identified  in  space 
that  will  guide  product  development  on  the  ground?  Fourth,  it  is  NASA’s  responsi-
bility  to  identify  that  need  and  revenue  source,  not  the  investor’s.  While  this  may 
seem a simple concept, time and again, NASA has put the onus on investors to cre-
ate the value proposition and business plan, and market it to NASA. Top-tier cred-
ible  investors  simply  do  not  work  this  way,  leading  only  investors  with  motives 
other than viable business prospects to solicit NASA. 

Despite all tangible benefits from the space program, I believe the most important 
comes  from  deep  within  the  human  spirit.  There  is  no  better  testament  to  the  im-
portance  of  this  than  from  the  tragedy  of  Columbia,  just  two  years  ago.  As  one 
might  expect,  the  entire  astronaut  corps  and  NASA  family  was  deeply  affected.  It 
is a small community, and not only did we lose colleagues and friends, this loss was 
a deep and pervasive fear realized. What was entirely unexpected however—at least 
for  me—was  the  effect  this  tragedy  had  on  the  world.  The  entire  world  essentially 
came to a halt. No other news was covered. People wept, people who had never met 
an astronaut. Friends I had in other countries at the time received condolences, sim-
ply  because  they  were  Americans.  I  received  condolences  from  people  I  did  not 
know.  Columbia  captivated  and  moved  our  entire  society.  But  the  reality  is  that 
seven lives were lost. Seven lives. It happens all the time. People across our Nation 
and around the world did not weep for the loss of seven lives. I strongly believe peo-
ple wept for something far deeper in us all, a deep rooted need to progress our civili-
zation, to go beyond our bounds, beyond our own lives and the lives of our children. 
People wept because a part of this was lost, and because our whole space endeavors 
would be at risk. 

I  have  been  exceedingly  fortunate  to  have  had  a  small  but  exciting  role  in  our 
quest  to  create  a  space-faring  civilization.  But  we  are  all  pioneers,  everyone  in  our 
country  because  of  the  bold  commitment  that  we  have  made  to  space.  For  many 
years  I  have  felt  great  pride  that  it  would  be  our  generations  upon  which  future 
generations would look with envy that we started it all. But we are now at a pivotal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

point  in  the  quest.  We  are  now  retiring  the  Shuttle,  and  even  with  the  most  prom-
ising  budget  proposal,  there  is  still  insufficient  funding  to  get  us  much  beyond  test 
flights  with  a  new  vehicle.  I  greatly  fear  that  rather  than  being  the  generations  to 
have started it all, we will be the generations to bring it to a grinding halt. We sim-
ply cannot let that happen. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Weber.  Dr.  Sutton,  I  want  to 
thank you for being here and I know you have had a loss at NSBRI 
with your CFO Jim Cooper passing away suddenly this week. And 
certainly my sympathies go out to you. 

STATEMENT OF JEFFREY P. SUTTON, M.D., PH.D., DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL SPACE BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH INSTITUTE (NSBRI) 
Dr.  SUTTON.  Madam  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  your 
condolences.  And  distinguishing  Ranking  Member  thank  you  for 
the wonderful opportunity to come here today and present my testi-
mony. 

I  have  the  privilege  to  serve  as  the  Director  of  the  National 
Space  Biomedical  Research  Institute,  or  NSBRI.  NSBRI  is  a  non- 
profit  organization  that  engages  outstanding  scientists,  engineers, 
and  physicians  from  approximately  70  leading  institutions  across 
the country to work on focused integrated teams that develop ways 
to  decrease  biomedical  risks  associated  with  long-duration  space 
missions.  We’re  headquartered  in  Houston  and  we  work  closely 
with NASA in our science, technology, and education programs. 

Many  view  the  ISS  as  the  most  sophisticated  engineering  struc-
ture  ever  constructed  in  the  history  of  humankind.  It  provides  a 
unique  precious  resource  for  the  United  States  to  develop  innova-
tive  technologies,  knowledge  and  infrastructures  to  support  U.S. 
space  exploration  goals.  It’s  an  invaluable  test  bed  for  exploration 
in science. 

The NASA Administrator has affirmed that the completion of the 
ISS  is  a  priority,  in  a  matter  consistent  with  commitments  to  our 
international partners and the needs of human exploration. And as 
you  know  this  view  is  consistent  with  the  President’s  Vision  for 
Space  Exploration.  And  in  the  Vision,  one  of  the  three  main  items 
listed for the ISS places emphasis on understanding how the space 
environment  affects  astronaut  health  and  capabilities  and  devel-
oping countermeasures. 

In  the  wake  of  events  following  the  tragic  loss  of  Columbia  and 
her  valiant  crew,  progress  and  discovery  concerning  crew  health 
aboard the ISS continues. As we heard from the previous panel, ex-
perience  is  being  gained  on  the  reliability  of  critical  hardware  sys-
tems  including  life  support.  There’s  increased  emphasis  on  auton-
omy,  on  performing  in-flight  maintenance  rather  than  replacing 
parts  from  the  ground.  And  the  innovation  continues  to  have  a 
strong  presence  as  illustrated  by  the  recently  published  first  sci-
entific  report  ever  submitted  from  space  involving  the  testing  and 
evaluation of ultrasound as an exploration medical capability. 

Now with a shift in emphasis of the human space program from 
low–Earth orbit to destinations beyond, new priorities and exciting 
mission possibilities arise. In my view, it’s imperative in developing 
a balanced over-all program of science, exploration and aeronautics 
to capitalize on the unique test platform of and the Nation’s invest-
ment in the ISS. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

The  strategic  planning  process  for  ISS  should  integrate  with 
plans  for  other  systems  such  as  transportation.  Strategic  goals 
should  take  into  account  the  continuity  of  scientific  and  techno-
logical  development  of  deliverables  currently  in  the  pipeline.  Some 
of  these  products  have  long  lead  times  toward  maturation  and 
operational  integration  to  satisfy  standards  and  requirements.  ISS 
provides  a  critical  resource  to  help  define  requirements  for  explo-
ration  needs  and  for  on  orbit  check-out  of  select  technologies  and 
requisite interfacing with the human system. 

Human  flight  testing  may  be  required  for  many  months  or  even 
years given current design reference missions to Mars which poten-
tially  expose  humans  to  micro-gravity  for  periods  well  in  excess  of 
current  ISS  mission  durations.  The  ISS  is  a  critical  training  and 
educational  platform  for  crew  to  familiarize  themselves  with  the 
space  environment  and  operational  demands  for  extended  periods 
of time. 

It’s worth noting that not all highly meritorious research and de-
velopment  for  human  exploration  requires  ISS  resources.  It  will, 
therefore, be a challenging yet necessary task to prioritize projects. 
What  do  we  need  to  do  that  could  only  be  done  on  the  ISS?  What 
is  feasible?  What  is  the  cost  of  not  pursuing  certain  ISS  scientific 
inquiries  given  the  opportunity?  And  what  are  the  benefits  to 
Earth? 

As  my  colleagues  have  mentioned  the  path  toward  exploration 
class  human  space  missions  captures  the  imagination,  it  adds  to 
the marvelous recent successes of NASA’s robotics program, and it 
inspires  the  next  generation.  Fostering  a  broad  interest  in  science 
and engineering is essential to our national mission and wellbeing. 
And  a  strong  future  workforce  in  technology  helps  fuel  our  econ-
omy.  There  are  several  management  models  which  may  increase 
private  sector  involvement  in  the  ISS.  Some  details  concerning  in-
volvement in the human health and biomedical sector are included 
in my written testimony. 

In  closing,  it’s  recognized  that  difficult  decisions  must  be  made 
to  enable  a  bold,  sustainable  and  affordable  space  program.  ISS 
presents an unprecedented opportunity to bring to light innovative 
discoveries that advance our Nation and civilization. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Sutton follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JEFFREY P. SUTTON, M.D., PH.D., DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL SPACE BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH INSTITUTE (NSBRI) 

Madam  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Sub-

committee: 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  testimony  on  the  benefits  of  human 
spaceflight as it relates to the International Space Station (ISS) and beyond. As Di-
rector  of  the  National  Space  Biomedical  Research  Institute  (NSBRI),  my  statement 
addresses  each  of  the  topics  outlined  for  this  hearing.  These  are  (1)  benefits  of 
human  spaceflight  in  the  context  of  ISS  development  and  current  ISS  operations, 
(2)  future  opportunities  using  the  ISS  for  operations,  engineering,  commercial  and 
scientific research and applications that support exploration and other national mis-
sions,  and  (3)  possible  management  transition  opportunities  that  increase  private 
sector  involvement  in  the  ISS.  The  issues  are  complex,  but  important,  as  NASA 
moves  forward  under  the  leadership  of  its  new  Administrator,  Dr.  Michael  Griffin. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Benefits  of  Human  Spaceflight  in  the  Context  of  ISS  Development  and 

Current ISS Operations 

44 

The  ISS  is  the  most  sophisticated  engineering  structure  ever  constructed  in  the 
history  of  humankind.  It  provides  a  unique,  precious  resource  for  the  U.S.  and  its 
international partners to develop innovative technologies, knowledge and infrastruc-
tures  to  support  U.S.  space  exploration  goals.  The  ISS  has  now  been  continuously 
crewed  for  more  than  four  years,  and  it  is  an  invaluable  test  bed  for  exploration. 
The  NASA  Administrator  has  outlined  the  need  for  an  exciting,  outward-focused, 
destination-oriented  space  program,  which  includes  both  human  and  robotic  explo-
ration and aeronautics. Dr. Griffin has also affirmed that the completion of the ISS, 
in  a  manner  consistent  with  commitments  of  international  partners  and  the  needs 
of  human  exploration,  is  a  priority.  This  view  is  consistent  with  the  President’s  Vi-
sion for Space Exploration, articulated on January 14, 2004. One of the three main 
activities  listed  for  the  ISS  in  low-Earth  orbit  is  to  focus  U.S.  research  and  use  of 
the ISS on supporting space exploration goals, with emphasis on understanding how 
the  space  environment  affects  astronaut  health  and  capabilities,  and  developing 
countermeasures. 1 

While  the  extent  of  scientific  research  and  development  being  performed  on  ISS 
is  limited  in  the  wake  of  events  following  the  tragic  loss  of  Columbia  and  her  val-
iant  crew,  important  progress  and  discovery  are  nevertheless  taking  place.  Experi-
ence  is  being  gained  on  the  reliability  of  critical  hardware  systems,  including  life 
support.  There  is  increased  emphasis  on  autonomy  and  performing  maintenance 
inflight rather than replacing parts from the ground. 

Innovation continues to have a strong presence, as illustrated by the recently pub-
lished,  first  scientific  report  ever  submitted  from  space,  involving  the  testing  and 
evaluation of ultrasound as an exploration medical capability. 2 The study was made 
possible  by  the  unique,  long-duration  exposure  to  microgravity  afforded  crew  mem-
bers aboard the ISS. 
Future  Opportunities  Using 

for  Operations,  Engineering, 
Commercial  and  Scientific  Research  and  Applications  That  Support 
Exploration and Other National Missions 

the  ISS 

With a shift in emphasis of the human space program from low-Earth orbit to des-
tinations beyond, new priorities and exciting mission possibilities arise. It is impera-
tive  in  developing  a  balanced,  overall  program  of  science,  exploration  and  aero-
nautics to capitalize on the unique test platform of, and Nation’s investment in, the 
ISS. 

The  strategic  planning  process  for  ISS  should  integrate  with  plans  for  other  sys-
tems, such as transportation, wherein the Shuttle retires and the Crew Exploration 
Vehicle  (CEV)  seamlessly  comes  into  service.  Strategic  goals  should  also  take  into 
account  continuity  of  scientific  and  technological  product  development 
for 
deliverables currently in the pipeline and which are, or can be, targeted at meeting 
specific exploration requirements. Some of these products, such as countermeasures 
which mitigate biomedical risks, have long lead times toward maturation and oper-
ational  integration  to  satisfy  medical  standards  and  requirements. 3 ISS  also  pro-
vides  a  critical  resource  to  define  requirements  for  exploration  needs  and  for  on- 
orbit check-out of select technologies for the CEV and requisite interfacing with the 
human system. 

Human flight testing may be required for many months, or even years, given cur-
rent  design  reference  missions  to  Mars  which  potentially  expose  humans  to  micro-
gravity  for  periods  well  in  excess  of  current  ISS  mission  durations.  Thus,  to  ade-
quately test systems and reduce risk of failures, there may well be a need to main-

1 The  other  two  activities  listed  for  the  ISS  in  low-Earth  orbit  are:  (1)  complete  assembly  of 
the ISS, including the U.S. components that support U.S. space exploration goals and those pro-
vided  by  foreign  partners,  planned  for  the  end  of  this  decade  and  (2)  conduct  ISS  activities  in 
a  manner  consistent  with  U.S.  obligations  contained  in  the  agreements  between  the  U.S.  and 
other partners in the ISS. 

2 Radiology  2005;  234(2):319–322.  The  study  involved  a  collaboration  between  the  ISS  incre-
ment 9 crew, academia (MI) and industry (TX). The results have implications for assessing phys-
iological  adaptation  to  long-duration  microgravity  exposure  and  for  remote  medical  imaging  by 
non-medical personnel in harsh environments, including space and war zones. 

3 A  NSBRI  bedrest  study  in  spinal  cord  injury  patients  has  demonstrated  the  effectiveness  of 
a single infusion of a bisphosphonate medication to inhibit bone loss for a one-year period (MD). 
The countermeasure requires further evaluation but is promising to counteract bone loss on ex-
ploration missions, as well as having potential benefit for the bone loss and fracture risk of per-
sons immobilized by spinal cord or brain injury, stroke, or neuromuscular or developmental dis-
orders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

tain the ISS, perhaps with commercial and increased partner support, beyond those 
times currently being proposed. 

Not  all  highly  meritorious  scientific  research  and  development,  engineering  and 
operational systems for human exploration require ISS resources. 4 It will be a chal-
lenging yet necessary task to prioritize the advanced space technologies, capabilities 
and  knowledge  requiring  the  ISS  as  a  test  bed  for  exploration.  What  do  we  need 
to  do  that  can  only  be  done  on  the  ISS?  What  is  feasible,  given  cost,  schedule  and 
task?  What  is  the  cost  of  not  pursuing  certain  ISS  scientific  inquiries  given  the  op-
portunity?  What  are  the  benefits  to  life  on  Earth  from  enabling  technologies  devel-
oped for exploration and validated aboard ISS? 

The ISS is a training and educational platform for crew to familiarize themselves 
with  the  space  environment  and  operational  demands  for  extended  periods  of  time. 
The  path  toward  exploration  class  human  space  missions  is  invigorating  and  cap-
tures the imagination. It adds to the marvelous recent successes of NASA’s robotics 
program, and if properly executed with integration of the unique capabilities of the 
ISS,  can  further  inspire  the  next  generation  of  space  scientists,  engineers  and  ex-
plorers. Fostering a broad interest in science and engineering is essential to our na-
tional mission and well-being, and a strong future workforce in technology helps fuel 
our economy. 5 
Possible  Management  Transition  Opportunities  That  Increase  Private 

Sector Involvement in the ISS 

There are several management models which may increase private sector involve-
ment  in  the  ISS,  such  as  the  proposed  ISS  Research  Institute  considered  by  NASA 
approximately  two  years  ago.  With  increased  emphasis  for  exploration  on  focused, 
prioritized requirements, corporate participation, development of new capabilities in 
stages, and management rigor, it is timely that a discussion of management transi-
tion  opportunities  occur  now.  Given  the  integrated  nature  of  ISS  and  exploration, 
any  business  model  for  private  sector  involvement  for  BS  should  link  to  plans  for 
exploration.  Key  sectors  include,  but  are  not  limited  to,  aerospace  transport,  ad-
vanced  propulsion,  power  generation  and  energy  storage,  automation  and  robotics, 
and materials. 

The following comments pertain to a management opportunity for ISS biomedical 
research  and  countermeasures  for  human  exploration.  In  1997,  NASA  awarded  a 
competitive cooperative agreement to the National Space Biomedical Research Insti-
tute  to  ‘‘lead  a  national  effort  for  accomplishing  the  integrated,  critical  path,  bio-
medical research necessary to support long-term human presence, development, and 
exploration  of  space  and  to  enhance  life  on  Earth  by  applying  the  resultant  ad-
vances in human knowledge and technology acquired through living and working in 
space.’’ 6 The NSBRI is a private, non-profit organization that engages scientists and 
engineers  from  approximately  70  universities  across  the  country  to  work  on  teams 
to  develop  countermeasures  to  health-related  problems  and  physical  and  psycho-
logical challenges men and women face on long-duration space flights. The product- 
oriented  approach  to  research  and  development,  which  is  primarily  ground-based, 
is  leading  to  a  number  of  operationally  relevant  countermeasures  now  ready  for 
testing and evaluation aboard the ISS. A number of projects have industry partners. 
The  Institute  works  with  an  Industry  Forum  and  User  Panel,  and  there  is  strong 
program oversight and management rigor, to maximize the likelihood of success and 
return on investment. 

NSBRI engages NASA and other stakeholders throughout the countermeasure de-
velopment  process.  This  ensures  requirements  are  in  place  and  met,  and  that  the 
highest  priorities  of  risk  are  addressed  and  reduced.  Projects  are  openly  solicited 
and competitively awarded. There is synergy among science and technology projects, 
as  well  as  integration  with  an  educational  program  that  spans  from  kindergarten 
to  undergraduate  and  graduate  levels,  to  post-doctoral  training.  The  NSBRI  is  pro-
ductive,  cost-effective,  scalable  and  provides  NASA  with  an  opportunity  to  partner 

4 For  example,  a  rugged,  portable,  lightweight  radiation  detection  instrument  is  under  devel-
opment by NSBRI/NASA and the United States Naval Academy (MD) to enable real-time meas-
urement  of  radiation  risk  in  space  and  estimate  risk  of  damage  to  body  tissue.  A  preliminary 
version  is  scheduled  to  launch  September  2006  on  a  MidSTAR–I  spacecraft.  The  instrument  is 
applicable  on  Earth  for  homeland  security,  jobs  with  high  potential  for  radiation  exposure  and 
monitoring radiation as part of cancer radiotherapy. A post-doctoral student at Memorial Sloan- 
Kettering Cancer Center (NY) is working on the cancer application. 

5 Between  1998  and  2002,  the  number  of  science  and  engineering  doctoral  degrees  awarded 
to  U.S.  citizens  at  U.S.  institutions  fell  11.9  percent  to  14,313,  according  to  the  Commission  on 
Professionals in Science and Technology, a nonprofit research group. 

6 NASA Cooperative Agreement Notice 9–CAN–96–01. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

with  non-government  entities  to  utilize  ISS  for  exploration  goals  and  provide  max-
imum return on valuable resources invested. 

In closing, it is recognized that difficult decisions must be made to enable a bold, 
sustained and affordable space program. ISS presents an unprecedented opportunity 
to test and validate critical technologies for human exploration and to bring to light 
the innovative discoveries that advance our Nation and civilization. 

NATIONAL SPACE BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH INSTITUTE SELECT PROGRAM 

ACCOMPLISHMENTS/EARTH IMPLICATIONS 

Background 

The  National  Space  Biomedical  Research  Institute  (NSBRI),  funded  by  NASA, 
leads  a  research  program  to  develop  countermeasures,  or  solutions,  to  the  health- 
related problems and physical and psychological challenges men and women face on 
long-duration spaceflights. The research results and medical technologies developed 
have impact for similar conditions experienced on Earth, such as osteoporosis, mus-
cle  wasting,  shift-related  sleep  disturbances,  balance  disorders,  and  cardiovascular 
and immune system problems. 
Select Program Highlights 
Needle-Free  Blood  and  Tissue  Measurement  Sensor  Progresses  to  NASA  Evaluation 
This  patented  NSBRI  device  allows  accurate,  noninvasive  blood  and  tissue  meas-
urements  not  impacted  by  body  fat  or  skin  color.  An  extension  of  this  work,  in  col-
laboration  with  NASA  Johnson  Space  Center,  will  adapt  the  sensor  for  monitoring 
in-flight functional changes during exercise and assessing injury. This type of light-
weight,  portable  device  will  be  of  use  in  ambulances,  .intensive  care  units  and  on 
the  battlefield.  Another  Earth  benefit  is  its  ability  to  detect,  without  a  needle,  re-
duced blood flow in diabetics. (Massachusetts and Texas) 
Blue Light: Potential Use for Sleep and Circadian Rhythm Disruptions 

NSBRI  researchers  have  discovered  that  certain  wavelengths  in  the  blue  portion 
of the visible spectrum alter melatonin production, thereby affecting the human cir-
cadian  pacemaker.  ‘‘Blue  light’’  lamps  are  predicted  to  be  more  effective  for  regu-
lating  circadian  rhythm  than  those  currently  used  pre-launch  and  represent  a  po-
tential  in-flight  countermeasure  for  adaptation  to  shifts  in  sleep  cycle  required  by 
astronauts during spaceflight. NSBRI is working with an industry partner to study 
further  the  use  of  blue  light.  On  Earth,  lighting  countermeasures  developed  for 
spaceflight can be modified for therapeutic or architectural applications and to facili-
tate adaptation to shift work. (Pennsylvania and Massachusetts) 
Ultrasound Training for Non-Physicians 

Diagnosing  and  managing  acute  health  problems  is  challenging  in  space  and  on 
Earth. An NSBRI project in collaboration with NASA Johnson Space Center is eval-
uating  the  use  of  ultrasound  for  medical  applications  during  spaceflight.  The  work 
has produced successful training sessions and interactive DVD refresher modules so 
that  non-physician  astronauts  can  successfully  use  ultrasound  in  remote  medical 
needs  for  diagnosis  of  problems.  On  Earth,  this  training  system  could  be  used  for 
remote-guided  medical  evaluation  under  isolated  conditions.  (Michigan  and  Texas) 
Drug Advances in Evaluation as Countermeasure 

NSBRI  investigators  demonstrated  in  ground-based  simulation  studies  that  the 
drug  midodrine  appears  to  be  a  promising  agent  for  post-flight  orthostatic  hypo-
tension (a drop in blood pressure causing light-headedness and fainting upon stand-
ing).  A  significant  number  of  astronauts  experience  this  condition  upon  return  to 
gravity.  This  study  is  now  approved  for  flight  investigation.  (Massachusetts  and 
Texas) 
Zoledronate: Possible Solution for Bone Loss in Space 

In studies of spinal cord injury patients, NSBRI researchers demonstrated the ef-
fectiveness of a single, 15-minute IV dose of zoledronate in decreasing bone loss over 
a  one-year  period.  These  researchers  are  collaborating  with  NASA  scientists  and 
flight  surgeons  to  further  evaluate  and  validate  the  drug  as  a  countermeasure  for 
bone loss on long-duration missions, as well as in individuals subjected to long peri-
ods of bed rest. (Maryland and Texas) 
Ultrasound Surgery—No Scalpels or Stitches 

This  NSBRI  project  on  high-intensity,  focused  ultrasound,  known  as  HIFU,  dem-
onstrates the usefulness of this technique to control bleeding, destroy unwanted tis-
sue  or  tumors,  and  dissolve  kidney  stones  with  pinpoint  accuracy.  Treatment  does 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

not  affect  surrounding  tissue  and  could  one  day  allow  bloodless  surgery  in  space, 
emergency rooms and on the battlefield. (Washington) 
Protein Linked to Muscle Loss 

The  way  in  which  muscles  atrophy  during  weightlessness  in  space  has  similarity 
with muscle wasting in diseases such as cancer, AIDS and diabetes. NSBRI-funded 
investigators  identified  atrogin-1,  a  muscle-specific  protein  whose  levels  go  up  dur-
ing muscle atrophy. Recently, studies by this group have narrowed in on the molec-
ular  regulator  of  atrogin–1,  a  family  of  proteins  called  FOXO,  thereby  making  this 
protein  family  a  potential  target  for  therapeutic  approaches  to  combat  muscle  loss. 
(Massachusetts) 

EVALUATION OF SHOULDER INTEGRITY IN SPACE: FIRST REPORT OF 
MUSCULOSKELETAL US ON THE INTERNATIONAL SPACE STATION 1 

By  E.  Michael  Fincke,  M.S.,  Gennady  Padalka,  M.S.,  Doohi  Lee,  M.D.,  Marnix  van  Holsbeeck,  M.D.,  Ashot  E. 
Sargsyan,  M.D.,  Douglas  R.  Hamilton,  M.D.,  Ph.D,  David  Martin,  RDMS,  Shannon  L.  Melton,  BS,  Kellie 
McFarlin, M.D. and Scott A. Dulchavsky, MD, Ph.D 
Investigative  procedures  were  approved  by  Henry  Ford  Human  Investigation 
Committee  and  NASA  Johnson  Space  Center  Committee  for  Protection  of  Human 
Subjects. Informed consent was obtained. Authors evaluated ability of nonphysician 
crewmember  to  obtain  diagnostic-quality  musculoskeletal  ultrasonographic  (US) 
data  of  the  shoulder  by  following  a  just-in-time  training  algorithm  and  using  real- 
time remote guidance aboard the International Space Station (ISS). ISS Expedition– 
9  crewmembers  attended  a  2.5-hour  didactic  and  hands-on  US  training  session  4 
months before launch. Aboard the ISS, they completed a 1-hour computer-based On-
board  Proficiency  Enhancement  program  7  days  before  examination.  Crewmembers 
did  not  receive  specific  training  in  shoulder  anatomy  or  shoulder  US  techniques. 
Evaluation  of  astronaut  shoulder  integrity  was  done  by  using  a  Human  Research 
Facility  US  system.  Crew  used  special  positioning  techniques  for  subject  and  oper-
ator  to  facilitate  US  in  microgravity  environment.  Common  anatomic  reference 
points  aided  initial  probe  placement.  Real-time  US  video  of  shoulder  was  trans-
mitted  to  remote  experienced  sonologists  in  Telescience  Center  at  Johnson  Space 
Center.  Probe  manipulation  and  equipment  adjustments  were  guided  with  verbal 
commands  from  remote  sonologists  to  astronaut  operators  to  complete  rotator  cuff 
evaluation.  Comprehensive  US  of  crewmember’s  shoulder  included  transverse  and 
longitudinal images of biceps and supraspinatus tendons and articular cartilage sur-
face.  Total  examination  time  required  to  guide  astronaut  operator  to  acquire  nec-
essary  images  was  approximately  15  minutes.  Multiple  arm  and  probe  positions 
were  used  to  acquire  dynamic  video  images  that  were  of  excellent  quality  to  allow 
evaluation  of  shoulder  integrity.  Postsession  download  and  analysis  of  high-fidelity 
US images collected onboard demonstrated additional anatomic detail that could be 
used  to  exclude  subtle  injury.  Musculoskeletal  US  can  be  performed  in  space  by 
minimally  trained  operators  by  using  remote  guidance.  This  technique  can  be  used 
to  evaluate  shoulder  integrity  in  symptomatic  crewmembers  after  strenuous 
extravehicular  activities  or  to  monitor  microgravity-associated  changes  in  musculo-
skeletal  anatomy.  Just-in-time  training,  combined  with  remote  experienced  physi-
cian  guidance,  may  provide  a  useful  approach  to  complex  medical  tasks  performed 
by  nonexperienced  personnel  in  a  variety  of  remote  settings,  including  current  and 
future space programs. 

Supplemental  material:  radiology.rsnajnls.org/cgi/content/full/2342041680/ 
DC1 

Medical  care  capabilities  for  the  International  Space  Station  (ISS)  and  future  ex-
ploration  space  missions  are  currently  being  defined  (1,2).  Although  rigorous  astro-
naut selection procedures reduce the chance of chronic health problems, acute condi-
tions can occur during spaceflight (3,4). The probability of a crewmember developing 
a  medical  condition  that  may  affect  their  performance  or  require  care  may  be  in-
creased during long-duration or exploration missions. 

Some  alterations  in  musculoskeletal  integrity  take  place  during  prolonged  expo-
sure  to  microgravity,  despite  the  generally  successful  exercise  countermeasures  (5). 

1 From  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,  Johnson  Space  Center,  Houston, 
Tex  (E.M.F.,  G.P.);  Texas  Diagnostic  Imaging,  Dallas,  Tex  (D.L.);  Departments  of  Radiology 
(M.v.H.)  and  Surgery  (K.M.,  S.A.D.),  Henry  Ford  Hospital,  2799  W  Grand  Blvd,  Detroit,  MI 
48202; and Wyle Laboratories, Houston, Tex (A.E.S., D.R.H., D.M., S.L.M.). Received September 
30, 2004; revision requested October 12; revision received October 14; accepted October 15. Sup-
ported by NASA Flight Grant NNJ04HB07A and the National Space Biomedical Research Insti-
tute Grant SMS00301. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Insidious reduction in bone, muscle, and tendon mass that has been observed during 
spaceflight  may  heighten  the  risk  of  musculoskeletal  injury.  In  addition,  strenuous 
physical  work  during  spacewalks,  combined  with  upper  body  and  arm  motion  con-
strained  by  the  current  spacesuits,  further  raises  the  likelihood  of  shoulder  injury. 
The assessment of musculoskeletal integrity is difficult in space because of limited 
medical training of the crew and a lack of radiographic and magnetic resonance im-
aging capabilities on either the transport vehicles or the ISS (6,7). However, a mul-
tipurpose  diagnostic  ultrasonographic  (US)  system  is  available  within  the  Human 
Research  Facility  (HRF)  of  the  ISS.  We  evaluated  the  ability  of  a  nonphysician  as-
tronaut operator to perform shoulder US by using remote guidance techniques. This 
report documents the first shoulder US examination ever performed in microgravity 
of spaceflight. 
Astronaut Training 

The ability of two nonphysician astronaut crewmembers to perform shoulder mus-
culoskeletal US was evaluated in the HRF of the ISS during ISS Expedition 9. The 
investigative  procedures  were  approved  by  the  Henry  Ford  Human  Investigation 
Committee  and  the  NASA  Johnson  Space  Center  Committee  for  the  Protection  of 
Human  Subjects.  Both  crewmembers  received  briefings  and  acknowledged  their  in-
formed consent before the mission, as did other human participants. 

Astronaut  crewmembers  attended  a  2.5-hour  US  familiarization  session  approxi-
mately  4  months  before  this  evaluation  to  include  a  brief  didactic  presentation  on 
the basics of US examination and the experiment-specific principles of remote guid-
ance.  The  crewmembers  also  participated  in  a  hands-on  US  session  in  the  Payload 
Development  Laboratory  at  the  Johnson  Space  Center,  Houston,  Tex,  where  they 
performed abdominal and musculoskeletal US on a human subject via remote guid-
ance from an experienced sonologist (A.S. and D.L., with 15 and 10 years of experi-
ence  in  musculoskeletal  US,  respectively).  The  hands-on  sessions  were  designed  to 
closely simulate in-orbit experiments. Real-time US images were transmitted to the 
remote  sonologist,  who  guided  the  astronauts  through  the  necessary  positioning, 
probe  placement  and  manipulation,  and  equipment  adjustments  to  obtain  optimal 
images.  Identical  remote-guidance  ‘‘cue  cards’’  were  available  to  the  guiding  experi-
enced  sonologist  on  the  ground  and  the  operator  onboard.  The  cards  included  key-
board  prompts,  anatomic  reference  points,  and  other  essential  information  to  in-
crease remote guidance efficiency. 
Imaging, Evaluation, and Communication 

The ground and in-flight US examinations were both performed with flight-modi-
fied HDI–5000 US systems (ATL; Philips Medical Systems, Bothell, Wash) by using 
high-frequency  (5–12  MHz)  linear  probes.  Images  were  viewed  by  the  operator  on 
a  flat-panel  monitor  and  were  transmitted  simultaneously  to  remote  US-guidance 
sonologists  (A.S.,  D.L.)  via  local  circuits  (ground  familiarization  session)  or  through 
satellite  broadband  transmission  (flight  session).  Flight  communications  include  a 
1.6-second  transmission  delay  due  to  distance,  data  relaying,  and  conversions.  Still 
and  video  cameras  in  the  U.S.  Laboratory  module  automatically  recorded  the  US 
session,  but  recorded  images  and  video  were  downloaded  to  the  experiment  team 
only after completion of the experiment. 

The astronauts were asked to develop specific restraining techniques for both the 
subject  and  the  operator,  which  would  allow  access  to  the  upper  arm  and  shoulder 
area,  provide  stability  for  the  examination,  allow  unrestricted  use  of  the  keyboard, 
and help avoid operator hand fatigue. 

The  astronaut  US  operator  completed  a  1-hour  computer-based  US  ‘‘refresher’’ 
course  by  using  the  Onboard  Proficiency  Enhancement  (OPE)  compact  disk  devel-
oped  by  the  evaluation  team  1  week  before  the  US  session.  Information  regarding 
OPE navigation, time on task, and query responses was stored on the ISS computer 
and was downlinked to the evaluation team before the US session to allow the team 
to  refine  the  procedure  or  highlight  certain  procedural  components  to  facilitate  the 
upcoming US evaluations. 

The  US  session  was  completed  during  scheduled  Ku-band  (video)  and  S-band 
(voice) communications. Dynamic US video was routed through the ISS communica-
tions  system  to  the  Telescience  Center  at  the  Johnson  Space  Center,  where  the 
ground-based  experienced  sonologist  viewed  the  video  output  from  the  US  machine 
with  near  real-time  (1.6-second  delay)  conditions.  Two-way  audio  communication 
with  the  US  operator  was  used  to  guide  US  probe  placement  and  adjust  US  device 
settings. 

A  full  unilateral  shoulder  musculoskeletal  examination  was  conducted,  which  in-
cluded  transverse  and  longitudinal  views  of  the  biceps  and  supraspinatus  tendons 
and  the  articular  cartilage  surface.  The  examination  was  initiated  with  the  probe 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

positioned at the distal end of the clavicle in a longitudinal attitude. The probe was 
‘‘steered’’ with remote experienced sonologist voice commands to achieve the desired 
images. After acquisition of the four views of the shoulder area, the subject and op-
erator aboard the ISS switched roles, and the examination was repeated. 

Examination  completeness  was  evaluated  initially  by  the  ground-based  experi-
enced  musculoskeletal  sonologist  by  viewing  the  real-time  downlinked  US  video 
stream.  Full-resolution  US  frames  were  saved  during  the  examination  and  were 
downlinked  to  the  Telescience  Center  at  a  later  time.  These  images  were  subse-
quently reviewed by an outside musculoskeletal US specialist (M.v.H.) to verify the 
diagnostic quality of the examination and the ability to exclude injury on the result-
ant images. 
Findings 

The  astronaut  crewmembers  used  foot  restraints  and  hand  pressure  to  maintain 
positioning and freedom of movement in the microgravity environment (Fig 1). This 
positioning  technique  allowed  the  subject  to  help  with  keyboard  adjustments  and 
provided  rapid  switching  of  the  subject  and  operator  when  the  examination  was 
complete  (Movie  1,  radiology.rsnajnls.org/cgi/content/full/2342041680/DC1).  No 
hand  fatigue  was  reported,  which  had  been  noted  by  previous  crewmembers  who 
performed  abdominal,  cardiac,  and  thoracic  US  on  the  ISS,  most  likely  as  a  result 
of the additional effort required when restraint is not optimal. 

Figure 1. Cabin view obtained with a still camera of the HRF on the ISS. Com-
mander  Gennady  Palalka  performs  a  musculoskeletal  US  examination  on  Mike 
Fincke by using an HRF US unit (blue flat-screen monitor and keyboard). 

Remotely  guided  shoulder  musculoskeletal  US  examinations  were  completed  by 
the  two  nonphysician  astronaut  operators  in  less  than  15  minutes  each  (Movie  2, 
radiology.rsnajnls.org/cgi/content/full/2342041680/DC1 ).  The  downlinked  real- 
time US video stream provided good-quality images of all of the areas of the shoul-
der  that  could  be  used  to  exclude  substantial  rotator  cuff  abnormalities  (Movie  3, 
radiology.rsnajnls.org/cgi/content/full/2342041680/DC1 ). 
Full-resolution  US 
frames,  which  were  reviewed  after  the  US  session  by  the  team,  provided  excellent- 
quality  detail  of  all  of  the  shoulder  views  (Figs  2–5).  The  still  US  images  could  be 
used to exclude subtle shoulder injury. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
1
t
t

.

u
s

50 

Figure  2.  Full-resolution  US  images  of  the  shoulder  were  downlinked  from  the 
ISS  to  mission  control  after  the  US  examination.  This  image  demonstrates  a 
longitudinal  view  of  the  biceps  tendon.  The  proximal  intracapsular  end  of  the 
long biceps tendon (T) is displayed on the observer’s left. Within the normal ten-
don, a distinct fibrillar pattern is noted (arrow). D = deltoid muscle. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
2
t
t

.

u
s

51 

Figure  3.  On  this  transverse  view  of  the  extracapsular  biceps,  the  echogenic 
round  shape  of  the  tendon  (arrow)  is  recognized  between  the  lesser  tuberosity 
(e) and the greater tuberosity (G). D = deltoid muscle. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
3
t
t

.

u
s

52 

Figure  4.  With  the  transducer  placed  over  the  long  axis  of  the  deltoid  muscle 
(D), note the longitudinal striations (upper arrows) of the fibrofatty septa in be-
tween the muscle bundles. Supraspinatus tendon (S) is displayed in its long axis 
deep  to  the  deltoid.  The  tendon  rests  on  the  bright  echogenic  surface  of  the 
proximal  humerus.  The  humeral  head  shows  on  the  medial  aspect  (observer’s 
right)  and  the  greater  tuberosity  more  laterally.  The  anatomic  neck  is  recog-
nized on the groove (lower arrow) between these bone surfaces. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
4
t
t

.

u
s

53 

Figure  5.  With  the  transducer  turned  perpendicular  to  the  position  in  Figure 
4, the examination of the supraspinatus (S) is completed with transverse views 
of the cuff. The deltoid muscle (D) is separated from the supraspinatus by alter-
nating  hypo-  and  hyperechoic  lines,  representing  bursa  and  peribursal  fat.  The 
echogenic  supraspinatus  rests  on  hypoechoic  hyaline  cartilage  over  the 
echogenic humeral head surface (c). 

Discussion 

The  ability  to  provide  medical  care  aboard  a  spacecraft  is  challenging  because  of 
limitations  in  crew  medical  training,  medical  equipment,  and  environmental  con-
straints in microgravity (1–5). The crews of the ISS receive training in a wide vari-
ety of tasks, ranging from maintaining spacecraft systems to conducting research to 
performing  emergency  medical  procedures.  A  crew  medical  officer,  who  is  generally 
not  a  physician,  receives  approximately  40  hours  of  additional  training  in  medical 
diagnosis  and  therapeutics.  Therefore,  accurate  communication  during  an  illness  or 
trauma is critical, particularly if real-time imaging is to be employed. 

US  is  currently  used  in  many  trauma  centers  to  diagnose  abdominal  injury  (8,9). 
The  technique  has  been  shown  to  be  accurate  and  sensitive  in  the  identification  of 
intraabdominal  hemorrhage,  even  when  performed  by  nonradiologists  or  nonphysi-
cians (10). NASA investigators have similarly demonstrated that US can be used by 
nonphysicians  to  diagnose  thoracic  injury  or  bone  fracture.  The  performance  of  US 
examinations  and  interpretation  of  images  for  the  detection  of  abdominal  bleeding 
or long-bone fracture do not require extensive training. Conversely, musculoskeletal 
US  is  substantially  more  complex  and  requires  specialized  expertise  during  both 
data acquisition and image interpretation. 

Basic ultrasonic imaging has been completed on both U.S. and Russian spacecraft 
(5,11,12). NASA investigators have demonstrated a wide array of diagnostic US ap-
plications  in  microgravity  experiments  on  animal  models  and  human  volunteers 
during  parabolic  flight  on  KC–135  aircraft.  Results  of  these  investigations  suggest 
that  the  sensitivity  and  specificity  of  these  US  applications  are  not  degraded  in 
microgravity and may even be enhanced in certain circumstances. More comprehen-
sive US examinations (e.g., abdominal, musculoskeletal, and cardiac) require consid-
erably  more  operator  experience  to  perform  and  interpret  autonomously.  Since  ex-
tensive  US  training  with  frequent  refresher  practice  is  not  feasible  in  many  situa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
5
t
t

.

u
s

54 

tions, including remote medicine or the space program, alternative paradigms of US 
examination are required for this application. 

Remote  US  guidance  by  experienced  sonologists  virtually  couples  a  modestly 
trained  US  operator  with  a  remote  sonologist.  The  US  operator  is  trained  in  basic 
US  operation  and  gross  requirements  of  the  US  examination.  The  operator  places 
the US probe in a predetermined and familiar starting point (aided by topologic ref-
erence cue cards), and the video stream from the US device is split between the on- 
site monitor and a remote location, where it is viewed by the experienced sonologist. 
Optimal  probe  position  and  device  settings  are  guided  with  voice  commands  from 
the remote sonologist to obtain the necessary US images. 

The  remote  guidance  paradigm  substantially  reduces  initial  and  refresher  oper-
ator  training  requirements  and  allows  experienced  sonologist  input  during  the  con-
duct  of  the  examination.  We  combined  remote  guidance  with  a  focused  review  of 
complex  US  to  complete  the  shoulder  musculoskeletal  examinations.  The  unique 
software  used  for  OPE  evaluation  in  this  project  streamlined  equipment  setup  and 
subject  and  operator  positioning  and  facilitated  the  successful  completion  of  the 
complex  US  tasks  by  means  of  remote  guidance.  This  ‘‘just-in-time’’  training  ap-
proach allowed preflight and in-flight training time to be reduced substantially. The 
OPE  program  was  constructed  in  modules  that  allow  future  HRF  refinements  or 
equipment  alterations  to  be  modified  electronically  as  required.  The  program  also 
can  be  used  as  a  framework  for  other  complex  tasks  that  require  focused  skills  or 
complex  instructions.  The  self-reporting  feature  of  the  program  allowed  the  experi-
enced  sonologists  on  the  ground  to  assess  operator  familiarity  with  the  procedures 
to better prepare for and conduct the session. 

The  evaluation  of  shoulder  integrity  with  the  use  of  US  is  the  standard  of  care 
at many institutions and is used by professional athletic teams to evaluate injuries 
to  athletes.  Astronaut  crewmembers  may  be  at  risk  of  shoulder  injury  during  long- 
duration  spaceflight  because  of  decreases  in  muscle  and  tendon  mass  and  exertion 
during space walks. The extravehicular activity suits that are worn constrain upper 
body  and  arm  movement.  Construction  requirements  on  the  ISS  and  future  explor-
atory  missions  involving  extravehicular  activities  can  increase  strain  on  the  shoul-
der joint. A reliable method for evaluation of shoulder integrity during long-duration 
space  missions  would  increase  medical  care  capabilities  for  this  operationally  rel-
evant concern. 

Shoulder musculoskeletal US was performed rapidly and accurately by the two as-
tronaut crewmembers aboard the ISS. The average time to perform the examination 
was  less  than  15  minutes.  The  conduct  of  the  examination  was  not  appreciably  dif-
ferent than similar examinations in a terrestrial environment and was aided by in-
novative  restraint  techniques  developed  by  the  crewmembers  (Movie  4,  radi-
ology.rsnajnls.org/cgi/content/full/2342041680/DC1 ). The quality of the near real- 
time  US  video  transmitted  to  the  Telescience  Center  was  very  good  and  could  be 
used  to  exclude  substantial  shoulder  musculoskeletal  injury.  Still  US  images  were 
obtained during the examination and were downlinked to the team afterward. These 
high-fidelity  images  were  of  excellent  diagnostic  quality  and  could  be  used  to  ex-
clude subtle changes in shoulder integrity. 

The ability of the ISS crew to perform complex US tasks aboard the ISS supports 
the  hypothesis  that  a  nonphysician  crewmember  with  modest  training  in  US  can 
perform  high-fidelity  diagnostic-quality  examinations  when  directed  by  a  ground- 
based  experienced  sonologist.  The  images  acquired  by  the  astronaut  in  this  study 
were  of  excellent  content  and  quality,  and  in  a  ‘‘real’’  medical  scenario,  they  would 
have  provided  essential  information  to  guide  clinical  decision  making.  There  were 
no  discernible  differences  between  the  US  examinations  performed  in  orbit  and 
those performed in standard terrestrial conditions when the images were evaluated 
by the experienced sonologists involved in this trial. 

The optimal training of crewmembers for the ISS and later exploration-class mis-
sions is still being defined. This initial US experience suggests that limited training, 
combined with onboard proficiency enhancement and directed remote guidance, may 
be  an  effective  technique  for  performing  complex  tasks.  The  examination  was  con-
ducted  within  a  strictly  limited  time  frame,  which  would  probably  be  the  case  in 
most terrestrial situations, such as in some remote and most military settings. 

The  unique  constraints  imposed  by  the  space  environment  require  the  develop-
ment  of  detailed  training,  diagnostic,  and  therapeutic  strategies.  Although  some  of 
the  aerospace  procedures  currently  investigated  by  NASA  are  appropriate  only  for 
the space environment, many other spaceflight-derived techniques are readily trans-
ferable to the Earth, including rural, military, and emergency medical care. The re-
motely guided US concept, with crew medical officers or comparably trained first re-
sponders as operators, is an important and clinically relevant advancement in space 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

medicine,  with  profound  ramifications  for  emergency  or  clinical  medicine  (Audio  1, 
radiology.rsnajnls.org/cgi/content/full/2342041680/DC1). 
References 

1. Davis JR. Medical issues for a mission to Mars. Aviat Space Environ Med 1999; 

70:162–168.[Medline] 

2.  Grigoriev  AI,  Egorov  AD.  The  theory  and  practice  of  medical  support  of  long- 

term space missions. Aviakosm Ekolog Med 1997; 31:14–25. [Russian].[Medline] 

3.  NASA.  Medical  intervention  and  care  ISS  Medical  Operations  Requirements 

Document SSP 50260, clause 4.1. Rev B ed. Houston, Tex: NASA, 2003. 

4. Grigoriev AI, Bugrov SA, Bogomolov VV, et al. Medical results of the Mir year- 

long mission. Physiologist 1991; 34(suppl 1):S44–S48.[Medline] 

5.  Gazenko  OG,  Shul’zhenko  EB,  Grigor’ev  AI,  At’kov  OI.  Medical  studies  during 
an 8-month flight on the orbital complex ‘‘Saliut-7’’—‘‘Soiuz-T.’’ Kosm Biol Aviakosm 
Med 1990; 24:9–14. [Russian]. 

6. Harris BA, Jr, Billica RD, Bishop SL, et al. Physical examination during space 

flight. Mayo Clin Proc 1997; 72:301–308.[Medline] 

7.  Sargsyan  A.  Medical  imaging  In:  Barratt  MR,  Pool  SL,  eds.  Principles  of  clin-

ical medicine for space flight. New York, NY: Springer Verlag, 2003. 

8. Patel JC, Tepas JJ, 3rd. The efficacy of focused abdominal sonography for trau-
ma (FAST) as a screening tool in the assessment of injured children. J Pediatr Surg 
1999; 34:44–47; discussion, 52–54.[Medline] 

9. Scalea TM, Rodriguez A, Chiu WC, et al. Focused assessment with sonography 
for  trauma  (FAST):  results  from  an  international  consensus  conference.  J  Trauma 
1999; 46:466–472.[Medline] 

10.  Boulanger  BR,  Kearney  PA,  Brenneman  FD,  Tsuei  B,  Ochoa  J.  Utilization  of 
FAST (Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma) in 1999: results of a sur-
vey of North American trauma centers. Am Surg 2000; 66:1049–1055.[Medline] 

11. Atkov OY. Ultrasound techniques in space medicine. Aviat Space Environ Med 

1987; 58(9 pt 2):A69-A73.[Medline] 

12.  Jadvar  H.  Medical  imaging  in  microgravity.  Aviat  Space  Environ  Med  2000; 

71:640–646.[Medline] 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Just  for  the  record,  I 
would  like—you  gave  a  very  good  piece  in  your  written  testimony 
on some of the accomplishments of NSBRI that I think are very in-
teresting, particularly I thought that Colonel Fincke already talked 
about one of them, your ultrasound training for non-physicians. He 
was a good case in point. 

The  possible  solution  for  bone  loss  in  space  and  particularly  the 
potential  for  ultrasound  surgery  are  very  interesting.  Could  you 
elaborate  on  those  two  as  evidence  of  some  of  the  research  that 
does have tangible results on Earth? 

Dr. SUTTON. Right. Well, thank you very much. 
First of all, I just want to clarify and emphasize that the wonder-
ful  research  and  development  that’s  taking  place  is  a  partnership 
that  doesn’t  belong  to  NSBRI  and  I  note  in  a  sense  that  it’s  a  col-
laboration between government and academia, as well as industry. 
And  it—what’s  so  wonderful  is  that  it  actively  engages  the  cus-
tomers all the way along in the process; specifically the astronauts 
and the flight surgeons. 

With respect to bone loss in space, while it is true that there are 
excellent  countermeasures  currently  in  place,  it’s  nevertheless  a 
concern  that  some  bone  loss  does  occur.  That  it  seems  to  be 
monotonic  in  time.  And  we  don’t  know  what  the  effects  of  gravita-
tional—fractional  gravitational  forces,  such  as  one-sixth  G  or  one- 
third G are going to be. 

What the NSBRI has been engaged in is using spinal cord injury 
patients  as  a  model  for  astronauts  in  the  zero-g  environment,  be-
cause spinal cord injury individuals tend to lose bone in places that 
emulate the loss, such as in pelvic regions and in lower extremities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

And  so  there  was  a  bed  rest  study  that  was  funded  through 
NSBRI/NASA  that  looked  at  a  single  intravenous  infusion  of  a 
bisphosphonate  compound  and  then  looked  at  the  extent  of  bone 
loss  a  year  later.  And  indeed  while  there  was  some  bone  loss  in 
those  individuals  that  received  the  drug  it  was  significantly  less 
compared  to  those  individuals  that  did  not.  This  is  an  example  of 
research and development that’s done in a wonderful ground-based 
analog setting that is now primed and ready for testing and evalua-
tion  in  the  ISS.  That  testing  and  evaluation  process  can  only  be 
done in the micro-gravity environment at this point. 

The ultrasound story is a very interesting one. And it feeds from 
some  of  the  work  that  Colonel  Fincke  talked  about.  We  are  very 
fortunate to have a naval acoustic physicist, one of the outstanding 
investigators,  Dr.  Larry  Crum  as  part  of  NSBRI.  He’s  at  the  Uni-
versity  of  Washington  in  Seattle.  He  was  one  of  the  key  physicists 
who  developed  the  technology  behind  a  device  that  actually  Dr. 
Becker and myself when we were flying up for this hearing saw an 
ad for the device, it’s called ‘‘SonoSite.’’ It’s in the commercial mar-
ket.  There  was  a  big  ad  in  the  Wall  Street  Journal  for  this  device. 
What Dr. Crum and his colleagues are doing is moving the sens-
ing  part  to  the  next  level  by  using  the  exact  technology  and  the 
same  platform  as  the  effector  in  being  able  to  use  ultrasound  at 
higher  energies  to  be  able  to  do  completely  non-invasive  bloodless 
surgery that is guided by the ultrasound images. 

So,  here’s  a  situation  where  a  person  is  thinking  about  how  to 
deliver  autonomous  care  in  very  remote  harsh  environments. 
Whether  it  be  in  space  where  there  are  clear  applications  or  in 
harsh  settings  such  as  war  zones.  And  what  the  individual  has 
done  is  to  look  at  the  evolution  of  surgery  from  large  open  oper-
ations to small key hole procedures and take the next bold step, the 
type  of  step  that  changes  text  books  of  how  procedures  are  done 
and to say, ‘‘We’re going to go completely non-invasive and that the 
user  does  not  have  to  be  a  surgeon  or  necessarily  medically 
trained.’’ 

It’s a wonderful story. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  It  is.  It  is  incredible.  I  want  to  pursue  the  na-
tional lab issue with you as I did with the last panel. And ask you, 
Dr. Sutton, what would your thoughts be about preserving a broad-
er  range  of  research  capabilities  aboard  the  ISS  and  operating  it 
as a national laboratory? 

Dr.  SUTTON.  My  personal  views  are  that  I  think  it’s  a  wonderful 
idea. NSBRI was engaged for its opinions while some of the initial 
work  was  being  done,  and  although  we  clearly  are  not  on  the  in-
side,  I  think  that  the  NSBRI  presents  a  wonderful  model  created 
and established by NASA. We’ve had some growing pains, but have 
worked them out and have established a very strong effective part-
nership  between  academia  and  industry  and  NASA.  I  think  that 
the idea of consortium, institutions, organized in a way that allows 
investigators  who  have  wonderful  ideas  to  come  forward  and  use 
this precious resource in an organized fashion that’s managed well, 
that’s  going  to  give  absolutely  outstanding  results  to  help  us 
achieve  the  missions  for  exploration  as  well  as  advanced  scientific 
knowledge, is a great one and I applaud it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  you  have  links  right  now  between  some  of 
your  component  institutions  and  a  direct  link  into  the  Space  Sta-
tion  where  you  are  talking  back  and  forth  or  discussing  experi-
ments or something that has happened on an experiment, or is that 
something that we would look to for the future? 

Dr.  SUTTON.  The  answer  is,  yes,  we  do  have  direct  links  and 

we’re extremely thankful to our NASA collaborators. 

The  example  of  the  ISS  ultrasound  experiment  is  a  good  one.  In 
this  case  the  principal  investigator,  Dr.  Scott  Dulchavsky  is  an 
NSBRI  investigator  who  worked  with  the  astronauts.  We  have  in-
troduced  specific  positions  that  are  liaisons  between  the  academic 
and  industrial  communities  and  folks  in  the  operational  environ-
ment  including  the  Station.  This  has  been  a  wonderful  break-
through. 

We’re  very  fortunate  that,  for  example,  in  the  case  that  I  just 
cited  that  Dr.  Jonathan  Clark,  Flight  Surgeon  at  NASA,  functions 
as a NASA/NSBRI space medicine liaison. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Dr.  Weber,  you  have  had  some  experience  with 
UT Southwestern and Sandia labs; do you have any thoughts about 
how  you  would  structure  a  national  lab  so  that  you  could  get  the 
most benefit and also to connect it to a consortium like the NSBRI? 
Dr. WEBER. I think the biggest challenge with the national lab— 
I’ve  been  involved  not  just  flying  in  space,  but  in  the  experiment 
side  at  NASA  and  the  infrastructure  there.  The  biggest  challenge 
whether  it’s  a  national  lab  or  otherwise  is  selecting  which  experi-
ments get to fly and those that don’t. And I think certainly we have 
models  for  how  we  could  bureaucratically  structure  a  lab,  but  I 
think the most important element going forward would be to decide 
what you wanted to accomplish with the lab. 

Do  you  want  to  have  it  be  a  conduit  for  commercialization?  A 
conduit  for  getting  private  sector  investment,  or  do  you  want  it  to 
be like a more traditional national lab in which we are working on 
problems  and  issues  in  the  interest  of  our  national  security?  And 
so my biggest concern in structuring that would be exactly what is 
the mission of that national lab? 

The CHAIRMAN. Do you think the medical experimentation would 
necessarily  be  for  private  investment?  I  mean  it  would  not  be  just 
security issues that you would want to look at. Obviously, the med-
ical science is an important part of the International Space Station. 
So,  would  you  say  that  all  of  that  would  go  toward  trying  to  get 
private  investment  or  can  you  also  see  that  as  a  government  func-
tion for future exploration, for example? 

Dr. WEBER. There are two types of medical experiment—medical 
experiments that take place up in space. You’ve heard mostly about 
the  types  that  are  involving  how  do  we  keep  astronauts  flying? 
How do we address the issues of astronauts being weightless? And 
to me that’s almost a national—if not a national security a national 
interest question. The technologies—that’s almost—the results that 
we  use  on  the  ground  are  almost  in  the  spin-off  category.  We’re 
doing  experiments  to  answer  questions  in  space  for  a  government 
need  and  then  from  that  learning  bringing  it  back  down  to  the 
ground. 

The  two  areas  that  I  brought  up  are  really  not  spin-off  tech-
nologies.  Those  are  really  biomedical  research  where  you’re  trying 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

to  look  at  things  not  in  the  interest  of  the  astronauts’  health,  but 
in  the  interest  of  what  we  can  glean  from  it.  And  those  would 
have—those would be more ripe for commercialization. 

The CHAIRMAN. OK. Thank you very much. Senator Nelson. 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Madam Chairman. 
Dr.  Sutton,  I  am  curious,  you  said,  ‘‘

. take  it  from  the 
Earthly  lab  to  the  Space  Station.’’  Are  you  talking  about  taking  a 
paraplegic into space and injecting this material? Is that what you 
were referring to? 

Dr.  SUTTON.  No,  sir.  The—what  I’m  referring  to  is  the  fact  that 
there  are  some  excellent  ground-based  analogues  for  research  and 
development  that  allow  good  scientific  ideas  to  go  forward,  to  ob-
tain results, to assess those results. And, if they look promising, to 
then move them to the next step where that next step engages the 
unique  resources  of  the  International  Space  Station;  namely  long 
duration exposure to micro-gravity for humans. 

So,  the  idea  is  to  fundamentally  be  more  selective  in  the  types 

.

.

of experiments that are flown to—— 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  give  me  an  example  of  one  of  those  ex-

periments. 

what? 

Dr.  SUTTON.  Well,  if  we  take,  for  example,  that  we’re  talking 
about  a  particular  drug,  and  it  is  a  promising  drug  that  could  de-
crease  even  further  the  extent  of  bone  loss  that  occurs.  And  that 
it would be given in conjunction with other countermeasures; exer-
cise countermeasures and so forth. 

So, rather than go right to the step of administering the drug in 
the  space  environment,  what  one  can  do  is  to  do  an  analogue—a 
study on Earth that is far less expensive. To look at the usefulness 
and  the  effectiveness  of  this  particular  agent.  If  the  agent  doesn’t 
work  in  an  analogue  population  then  maybe  it’s  something  that 
should not be tested in the space environment. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  did  I  misunderstand  you  that  the  use  of 
this  drug  you  said  on  paraplegics  on  Earth  shows  some  improve-
ment of lessening bone loss? 

Dr. SUTTON. Absolutely. Yes, it’s truly dramatic. 
Senator  NELSON.  So  your  proposal  is  to  take  it  to  space  and  do 

Dr. SUTTON. And test it in the space environment. 
Senator NELSON. By testing it on—— 
Dr. SUTTON. The astronauts. 
Senator NELSON.—what? 
Dr. SUTTON. On the astronauts, sir. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Dr. Weber, protein crystal growth. Charlie 
Walker  who  is  seated  behind  you  did  the  first  experiment  on  pro-
tein  crystal  growth  and  I  had  the  privilege  of  participating  in  that 
later  on.  And  I  was  given  to  believe  that  although  he  and  I,  and 
I  assume  others,  had  some  dramatic  examples  of  growing  larger 
and more pure crystals in the zero-gravity of orbit, that its applica-
tion,  given  the  expense  of  doing  that  in  space  versus  what  you 
could do on Earth, that there really wasn’t much of an application. 
But you are indicating something otherwise. Tell us about that. 

Dr.  WEBER.  Only  a  fraction  of  all  the  proteins  of  interest  that 
might be good drug targets can be crystallized here on the ground. 
And  I  mentioned  that  protein  crystal  growth  was  prolific  around 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

the  country,  at  drug  companies  and  such.  This  is  an  activity  that 
is  indeed  going  on  on  the  ground.  But  there  are  some  percentage 
of  proteins  that  we  can’t  get  that  information  on  the  ground.  And 
this  is  actually,  in  my  opinion,  the  best  way  that  you  want  to  do 
space  experimentation.  Since  we  can’t  fly  all  the  experiments,  you 
want  to  find  those  things  which  you  have  a  large  base  of  informa-
tion  about  how  it  works  on  the  ground  and  you  only  take  up  the 
one experiment that you can’t do the ground that can yield tremen-
dous value. 

The  reason  why  I  point  to  protein  crystal  growth  as  being  a  low 
hanging  fruit  is  this:  I  talked  about  this  revenue  stream  that  you 
have to identify if you’re going to be successful with commercializa-
tion.  Well,  it’s  tough  to  manufacture  in  space,  it  costs  a  lot  of 
money per pound to go into space; ten thousand or more dollars per 
pound. 

So,  manufacturing  is  a  dicey  proposition.  However,  with  protein 
crystal  growth,  if  you  get  that  tiny  little  protein,  if  you  can  bring 
back  to  the  ground  even  one  tiny  crystal  you  can  get  the  answer 
you need that can result in a drug that has literally a hundred bil-
lion dollar impact on our economy—— 

Senator NELSON. Right. 
Dr. WEBER.—in a given year. So it’s the perfect way. 
Senator  NELSON.  Get  the  answer  you  need  through  an  electron 

microscope or x-ray diffusion, something like that? 

Dr.  WEBER.  Exactly.  The  way  it  works  is  if  you  have—and  I’m 
sure  you  know  this.  But  the  way  it  works,  like  if  you  had  a  glass 
prism,  if  you  shine  light  on  it  from  the  pattern  on  the  wall  you 
could calculate what the shape of that prism is. If you shine x-rays 
on  a  protein  crystal  you  can  figure  out  where  these  hundreds  and 
hundreds  of  molecules  are  sitting  and  you  can  get  that  structure. 
And this is—if you think about it, HIV drugs they are now so ef-
fective  that  people  can’t  detect  the  HIV  in  their  blood  stream  any 
more  and  they  can  lead  relatively  symptom-free  lives  for  a  very 
long  time.  This  is  how  effective  drugs  can  be  through  structure- 
based drug design. And there are many examples of this. 

We  used  to,  for  a  long  time,  drug  companies  threw  darts  at  a 
dart  board  in  order  to  come  up  with  a  possible  drug.  Now  we  can 
logically,  intelligently  come  up  with  where  that  active  site  is  and 
come  up  with  a  chemical  that  fits  into  that  active  site  and  stops 
whatever bad is happening from happening. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  we  have  candidates  in  these  proteins  that 
we cannot get their structure on one-gravity that we think that we 
can get their structure by taking them to zero-gravity? 

Dr. WEBER. Absolutely. Larry DeLucas at University of Alabama 
at Birmingham, he runs one of our most successful commercial cen-
ters  for  space.  And  he  has  drug  companies  coming  to  him  all  the 
time  with  drug  targets.  And  he  has  a  certain  smorgasbord  of  tech-
niques  that  he  can  use  to  try  to  do  them  on  the  ground.  And  I’m 
told  that  there  are  a  number  of  candidates  and  there  are  proteins 
that indeed he can’t crystalize, nobody can crystalize and those are 
the ones typically that we send up on experiments in space. 

Senator NELSON. Why are we not doing that right now? 
Dr.  WEBER.  With  the  way  the  Station  is  right  now  it’s  only  half 
complete, you heard that testimony. The RACKS for doing this, are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

at  Kennedy  Space  Center.  And  we  need  more  crew  time  and  we 
need more cargo capability to really make this a viable option. 

There are very sound reasons, despite all the great work that two 
crew  members  can  do  and  have  done  on  the  Space  Station,  there 
is  so  much  more.  Even  if  we  can  get  that  Shuttle  flying  again  and 
finish the Space Station and even get three crew members it would 
open up the flood gates in a sense. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  in  fact  know  and  it  is  too  bad  that  Mr. 
Readdy  is  not  still  here,  we  would  ask  him,  that  in  fact  this  is 
going  to  be  on  the  manifest  once  we  start  flying  again  with  three 
crew members? 

Dr.  WEBER.  I  don’t  know.  I  left  NASA  2  years  ago  and—so  I’m 
not—I  am  not  up  to  date  on  the  latest  manifest  and  plans  and 
such. 

Senator NELSON. Well, we will ask that question. Madam Chair-
man,  it  would  sure  make  your  and  my  job  a  lot  easier  in  getting 
money  for  NASA  if  we  suddenly  had  a  breakthrough  on  unlocking 
the architectural secrets of these proteins that we can’t get here on 
Earth.  If  we  did  that  up  there  on  the  Station,  boy  that  would  be 
a page-one story. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I  agree.  And  also  you  just  look  at  this  list 
of  things  that  have  been  accomplished  and  they  are  huge  break-
throughs.  They  are  huge.  I  think  this  is  exactly  what  we  need  to 
focus on, build on, and make more available. 

Senator  NELSON.  Let  me  just  ask  a  couple  more  questions.  For 
any  of  you,  what  Space  Station  research  are  you  concerned  about 
that may be cut? 

Dr.  SUTTON.  I’ll  take  a  crack  at  that.  In  my  testimony  I  talked 
about  the  pipeline  and  I’m  going  to  limit  my  remarks  in  the  bio-
medical area. 

There  is  a  wonderful  body  of  ground-based  research  that  it’s 
working  it’s  way  through  a  developing  pipeline  that  is  just  about 
to  hit  a  stage  that  is  ready  for  ISS.  There’s  a  capital  investment 
that’s  been  made,  there’s  an  intellectual  investment  that’s  been 
made.  There  is  clear  proof  of  principles,  demonstrables,  and 
deliverables that hit at high priority items on what is the bio-astro-
nautics road map, which lays out various risks. 

My concern is that budget reductions in that pipeline will signifi-
cantly impede progress. In a business model, one actually begins to 
invest  more  capital  as  one  moves  very  promising  products  toward 
operations or toward actual delivery to the customer. And the con-
cern  is  that  with  budget  reduction  some  of  the  most  promising 
products  that  hit  at  the  highest  risk  areas  being  bone  behavioral 
health, advanced medical capabilities, nutrition, and cardiac issues 
will be cut. 

And  what  might  happen  is  that  if  cuts  take  place  now  there’s 
loss  of  the  teams  that  are  moving  these  products  forward.  And 
what  ends  up  sometimes  happening  is  that  when  production  slows 
down the teams disperse and one ends up spending more money in 
the long run trying to engage people back because there are issues 
of confidence and a lack of stability that has been lost. 

Senator  NELSON.  Let  me  ask  any  of  you,  in  the  sequence  in 
which  the  Station  will  continue  to  be  assembled,  does  it  assemble 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

the elements to your satisfaction in the order in which you can get 
the research done that you think that needs to be done? 

Dr. SUTTON. In a word, yes. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Thank you. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  We  appreciate  all  of  our 
panelists.  It  has  been  a  very  informative  session  and  one  that  will 
help us with our re-authorization priorities. Thank you. 

Dr. SUTTON. Thank you very much. 
[Whereupon, at 12 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Today’s hearing will examine what it takes to make the International Space Sta-
tion  a  productive  orbiting  laboratory  and  what  we  expect  to  learn  once  this  facility 
becomes  fully  operational.  Whether  we  are  learning  about  bone  loss  or  combustion, 
this research will lead to unexpected benefits on Earth. 

As you know, I am a longtime supporter of the Space Station and space research. 
However,  there  are  several  barriers  that  could  keep  the  Station  from  becoming  the 
world  class  laboratory  it  should  be.  Meeting  future  transportation  needs  is  at  the 
top  of  the  list.  After  all,  U.S.  astronauts  cannot  conduct  research  on  the  Station  if 
they and their equipment can not get there. 

Likewise,  a  prolonged  gap  between  the  retirement  of  the  Shuttle  and  the  launch 
of  a  new  crew  exploration  vehicle  is  unacceptable.  We  must  have  access  to  the  lab-
oratory we built. 

After  all,  the  Space  Station  offers  tremendous  opportunities.  Space  Station  re-
searchers  are  devising  new  imaging  techniques  that  use  ultrasound  rather  than  X- 
ray  or  MRI  to  diagnose  patients.  Long-duration  microgravity  research  can  lead  to 
fundamental  advances  in  physics,  materials,  the  life  sciences,  and  the  health  and 
safety of our astronauts. 

We  have  just  confirmed  an  Administrator  who  I  believe  is  more  than  ready  to 
meet  those  challenges.  Like  the  Members  of  the  Committee,  Administrator  Griffin 
is looking to keep the Nation’s space program strong and vital. 

NASA is currently developing plans to utilize the Station. I look forward to receiv-
ing  those  plans  and  working  with  Dr.  Griffin  to  make  the  most  of  our  investment 
in the International Space Station. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

WILLIAM F. READDY 

Question  1.  The  charter  of  the  ISS  Strategic  Roadmap  Committee  describes  the 

purpose of the Committee as being: 

‘‘ . . . to  provide  advice  and  recommendations  to  NASA  on  completing  assem-
bly  of  the  International  Space  Station  and  focusing  research  on  supporting 
space  exploration  goals,  with  emphasis  on  understanding  how  the  space  envi-
ronment  affects  human  health  and  capabilities,  and  developing  counter-
measures.’’ 

This  appears  to  be  a  very  narrow  definition  of  the  mission  of  the  Space  Station. 
Is  it  NASA’s  view  that  the  space  station  is  only  to  support  research  that  enables 
humans to go to the Moon, Mars and beyond? 

Answer.  NASA’s  utilization  of  U.S.  crew  time  and  research  capability  aboard  the 
International  Space  Station  is  focused  on  supporting  future  human  space  explo-
ration goals. Based on the recently completed Zero Base Review of the Human Sys-
tem  Research  and  Technology  portfolio,  the  highest  priorities  for  research  on  the 
Space  Station  include  space  radiation  health  and  shielding;  advanced  environment 
control and monitoring; advanced Extra Vehicular Activities suits and tools; human 
health  countermeasures  to  the  effects  of  long-duration  space  travel;  advanced  life 
support  systems;  exploration  medical  care;  and,  space  human  factors.  The  Space 
Station  acts  as  a  test  bed  for  engineering  and  operations  concepts,  and  will  dem-
onstrate  technologies  necessary  for  future  space  systems  such  as  thermal  control. 
power  generation,  and  management  of  cryogenic  fuels  in  space.  Altogether,  NASA 
has  identified  22  areas  of  research  and  technology  that  can  take  advantage  of  the 
Space  Station  as  a  test  bed  to  reduce  the  risk  associated  with  future  human  explo-
ration  missions.  Currently,  the  Shuttle/Station  Configuration  Options  Team  is  con-
ducting  a  study,  which  is  considering  previous  work  done  in  the  Zero  Base  Review 
and,  examining  configuration  options  for  the  ISS.  As  part  of  the  study,  this  team 

(63) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

is  looking  at  ISS  assembly,  operations,  and  use  and  considering  such  factors  as 
International  Partner  commitments,  research  utilization,  cost,  and  ISS  sustain-
ability. This study will be completed later this summer. 

Question  2.  How  has  the  fundamental  mission  of  ISS  changed  since  January  14, 

2004, with the announcement of the Vision for Exploration? 

Answer. In one sense, the fundamental mission of the International Space Station 
has not changed. The Space Station is still a continuously crewed, on-orbit research 
platform designed to house scientific experiments and new technology development, 
as  well  as  facilitate  international  cooperation.  What  changed  with  the  announce-
ment of the Vision for Space Exploration is the focus for the science and technology 
work  done  by  US  astronauts.  The  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  directed  NASA  to 
focus  U.S.  research  and  use  of  the  International  Space  Station  on  supporting  space 
exploration  goals,  with  emphasis  on  understanding  how  the  space  environment  af-
fects astronaut health and capabilities. 

Question  3.  Apart  from  the  laboratory  facilities  aboard  the  space  station,  a  key 
to  space  station  research  is  the  crew  time  available  for  conducting  that  research. 
Please  provide  the  current  projections  for  the  number  of  crew  members  planned  to 
be  aboard  the  space  station  and  the  amount  of  crew  time  that  will  be  available  for 
research, for the U.S. and its international partners. Indicate the optimum number 
of  crew  for  conducting  the  maximum  level  of  ISS  research  using  available  and 
planned  on-orbit  research  facilities.  Provide  this  information  for  each  remaining 
stage of ISS assembly and utilization. 

Answer.  As  we  make  progress  on  construction  of  the  Station,  we  will  also  work 
towards increasing the number of crew onboard to three space members as soon as 
possible  and  working  towards  a  six-person  crew  capability.  How  soon  we  increase 
crew  size  is  dependent  on  additional  life  support  capability  and  on  the  availability 
of a rescue capability. 

The amount of crew time available to the European Space Agency (ESA), the Jap-
anese Aerospace Exploration Agency (JAXA), and the Canadian Space Agency (CSA) 
is  based  on  the  provisions  of  the  ISS  Memoranda  of  Understanding.  In  accordance 
with these provisions, ESA will receive 8.3 percent of the non-Russian crew assign-
ments  after  the  launch  of  its  Columbus  module;  JAXA  will  receive  12.8  percent  of 
non-Russian crew assignments after the launch of its Japanese Experiment Module 
elements; and CSA began accruing 2.3 percent of the non-Russian crew assignments 
after its Space Station Remote Manipulator System was launched in April 2001. 

Under the ISS Agreements, Space Station crew rights are shared equally between 
Russia and the U.S. during the assembly period. Following completion of assembly, 
Russia  will  have  a  right  to  a  crew  of  three  and  may  make  separate  arrangements 
with  any  of  the  other  ISS  Partners  for  these  crew  flight  opportunities.  Russia  will 
use  its  Soyuz  vehicle  to  provide  crew  transportation  and  rescue.  NASA  is  respon-
sible  for  crew  transportation  and  rescue  for  the  remainder  of  the  ISS  crew  after 
completion of assembly. The ISS Partnership has agreed that the Russian Soyuz ve-
hicle can continue to be used for crew transportation and serve as the Space Station 
Crew  Return  Vehicle  (CRV)  for  the  U.S.  segment  of  the  ISS;  assuming  that  an 
agreement  can  be  reached  between  NASA  and  the  Russian  Federal  Space  Agency 
on  this  issue,  and  that  this  can  be  accomplished  without  violating  the  provisions  of 
the Iran Nonproliferation Act. 

Since  the  Soyuz  carries  a  maximum  of  three  people,  one  factor  in  crew  size  will 
be  based  on  the  number  of  Soyuz  docked  to  the  Station  to  provide  a  crew  rescue 
capability.  Additional  life  support  capability  is  another  factor  in  increasing  crew 
size.  The  U.S.  Regenerative  Environmental  Control  and  Life  Support  System 
(ECLSS) will need to be installed and tested on orbit before the Station crew grows 
to more than three people. 

Question  4.  Provide  a  summary  of  the  current  plans  for  delivering  ISS  crews  to 
orbit,  providing  for  their  safe  return  in  the  event  of  an  emergency  and  supporting 
research  with  payload  delivery  and  retrieval  capabilities  from  this  point  forward, 
over the planned life of the ISS. 

Answer.  The  Russian  Soyuz  vehicle  is  currently  being  used  for  crew  transport, 
and  will  continue  to  serve  as  the  Space  Station  Crew  Return  Vehicle  (CRV).  NASA 
continues  to  assess  its  future  requirements  for  crew  and  cargo  transportation  in 
support  of  the  Space  Station.  The  CEV  is  being  developed  to  be  capable  of  ferrying 
astronauts to the Space Station. 

The  first  CEV  missions  to  Earth  orbit  will  include  docking  with  the  ISS.  NASA’s 
Exploration  Systems  Mission  Directorate  will  be  responsible  for  developing  and  ac-
quiring  both  crew  and  cargo  services  to  support  the  Space  Station.  A  key  element 
in  the  future  of  the  ISS  program  is  the  purchase  of  alternate  cargo  transportation 
services  to  supplement  the  Space  Shuttle,  and  the  development  of  new  crew  trans-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

portation capabilities to replace Shuttle when it retires. Because the ESMD has the 
mission  to  develop  and  acquire  such  crew  and  cargo  capabilities  for  the  Space  Sta-
tion and beyond, NASA has transferred management responsibility for the activities 
and budget of ISS Cargo/Crew Services to Exploration Systems Mission Directorate 
from the Space Operations Mission Directorate. 

NASA is currently examining alternative configurations for the Space Station that 
meet  the  goals  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  and  the  needs  of  our  inter-
national  partners,  while  maintaining  safety  as  our  highest  priority.  In  May  2005, 
we initiated the Shuttle/Station Configuration Options Team (SSCOT). This team is 
conducting a 60-day study of the configuration options for the ISS and assessing the 
related number of flights needed by the Space Shuttle before it retires no later than 
the  year  2010.  The  scope  of  the  Shuttle/Station  Configuration  Options  Team  study 
spans ISS assembly, operations, and use and considers such factors as international 
partner  commitments,  research  utilization,  cost,  and  ISS  sustainability.  This  team 
is expected to complete its work in June, with those results integrated into the ongo-
ing Exploration Systems Architecture Study (ESAS). 

ESAS  will  focus  on  four  primary  areas,  including  a  complete  assessment  of  the 
top-level CEV requirements and plans to enable the CEV to provide crew transport 
to  the  ISS  and  to  accelerate  the  development  of  the  CEV  and  crew  launch  system 
to  reduce  the  gap  between  Shuttle  retirement  and  CEV  initial  operating  configura-
tion. 

NASA is also working across the ISS partnership to identify opportunities to aug-
ment  the  flight  rate  of  the  International  Partner  transportation  vehicles,  including 
the Russian Progress vehicle, the European Automated Transfer Vehicle (ATV), and 
the  Japanese  H-IIA  Transfer  Vehicle  (HTV).  The  ATV  is  scheduled  to  be  launched 
on  Europe’s  Ariane  V  rocket  for  its  demonstration  flight  to  the  ISS  in  2006.  The 
HTV  is  planned  to  be  launched  on  Japan’s  H-IIA  rocket  for  a  demonstration  flight 
to  the  ISS  in  the  2008–2009  timeframe.  In  return  for  performance  of  common  sys-
tems  operations  on  the  ISS,  NASA  anticipates  that  it  will  have  upmass  allocations 
on some ATV and HTV missions. (ATV, HTV, and Progress are not designed for re-
turning cargo to the Earth). 

Question  5.  Describe  the  impact  to  scientific  research  aboard  ISS  if  the  Space 
Shuttle  is  retired  in  2010  without  the  immediate  availability  of  U.S.-developed  re-
placement capabilities for the transfer of crews and cargo to and from the ISS. Indi-
cate  the  degree  to  which  crew  size  and  allocable  research  time  are  affected  in  any 
interim period between Shuttle retirement and an operational follow-on replacement 
capability. Also, indicate whether size and/or weight limitations of interim cargo de-
livery and return capabilities impact ISS research options. Assuming that efforts to 
narrow  the  gap  between  Shuttle  retirement  and  a  follow-on  capability  will  be  suc-
cessful  provide  a  series  of  the  requested  impact  assessments  in  any  remaining  gap 
in one-year increments, from 2010 to 2015. 

Answer. During the assembly period, crew rights are shared equally between Rus-
sia  and  the  U.S.  as  stipulated  in  the  ISS  Agreements.  As  far  as  size  of  crew,  since 
the  Soyuz  carries  a  maximum  of  three  people,  one  of  the  factors  in  increasing  crew 
size  will  be  determined  based  on  the  number  of  Soyuz  docked  to  the  Space  Station 
to provide a crew rescue capability (the other factor being is to increased life support 
capability). The ISS Partnership has agreed that the Russian Soyuz vehicle can con-
tinue to be used for crew transportation and serve as the Station Crew Return Vehi-
cle  (CRV)  for  the  U.S.  segment  of  the  ISS;  assuming  that  an  agreement  can  be 
reached  between  NASA  and  the  Russian  Federal  Space  Agency  on  this  issue  and 
that  this  can  be  accomplished  without  violating  the  provisions  of  the  Iran  Non-
proliferation Act. 

Following completion of assembly, Russia will have a right to a crew of three and 
will  use  its  Soyuz  vehicle  to  provide  crew  transportation  and  rescue.  NASA  is  re-
sponsible for crew transportation and rescue for the remainder of the ISS crew after 
completion of assembly. To answer questions such as research impacts post-Shuttle 
and ISS crew/cargo services, NASA is conducting two studies. In May 2005, we initi-
ated the Shuttle/Station Configuration Options Team (SSCOT). SSCOT is currently 
examining  alternative  configurations  for  the  Space  Station  that  meet  the  goals  of 
the Vision for Space Exploration and the needs of our international partners, while 
maintaining  safety  as  our  highest  priority.  This  team  is  conducting  a  60-day  study 
of the configuration options for the ISS and assessing the related number of flights 
needed by the Space Shuttle before it retires no later than the year 2010. The scope 
of the Shuttle/Station Configuration Options Team study spans ISS assembly, oper-
ations,  and  use  and  considers  such  factors  as  international  partner  commitments, 
research utilization, cost, and ISS sustainability. This team is expected to complete 
its work in June, with those results integrated into a second study. the Exploration 
Systems Architecture Study (ESAS). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

ESAS  will  focus  on  four  primary  areas,  including  a  complete  assessment  of  the 
top-level CEV requirements and plans to enable the CEV to provide crew transport 
to  the  ISS  and  to  accelerate  the  development  of  the  CEV  and  crew  launch  system 
to  reduce  the  gap  between  Shuttle  retirement  and  CEV  initial  operating  configura-
tion. 

Question  6.  The  President  has  stated  that  an  important  requisite  to  the  Vision 
for  Exploration  is  ensuring  that  the  United  States  honors  its  international  commit-
ments in the development of ISS. How does a refocusing of the Space Station to sup-
port  the  U.S.  Vision  for  Exploration  affect  the  research  plans  and  commitments  of 
our international partners in the space station program? 

Answer.  Refocusing  Space  Station  science  goals  to  support  human  space  explo-
ration  does  not  necessarily  have  an  immediate  impact  on  the  research  plans  of  our 
international partners. Any use of U.S. resources is detailed in separate agreements 
with  our  partners.  These  agreements  outline  things  such  as  crew  time  and  facility 
and  power  use;  they  do  not  restrict  the  content  or  focus  of  the  research  performed 
(within  the  normal  safety  guidelines).  However,  NASA  anticipates  that  our  ISS 
Partners  may  also  adjust  the  focus  of  some  of  their  research  in  the  longer  term  in 
order  to  advance  their  exploration  plans  and  enhance  their  participation  in  future 
NASA programs. 

Question  7.  Describe  the  status  of  studies  conducted  by  NASA,  or  at  NASA’s  re-
quest, to identify alternative operations and research management schemes for ISS. 
Specifically,  describe  the  status  of  non-governmental  organization  (NGO)  alter-
natives, as well as any other alternatives similar in form to a Federally-Funded Re-
search and Development Center (FFRDC) or an ISS Research Institute. 

Answer.  On  January  10,  2003,  NASA  submitted  to  Congress  a  study  of  Inter-
national  Space  Station  (ISS)  utilization  management  in  compliance  with  FY  2001 
and  FY  2003  VA-HUD-Independent  Agencies  Appropriations  Acts  (Pub.  L.  106–377 
and Pub. L. 107–73, respectively). The study was a seven-month, inter-Center team 
assessment  of  options  for  ISS  utilization  management.  The  study  set  the  following 
objectives  for  ISS  utilization  management:  (1)  to  facilitate  the  pursuit  of  flight  re-
search; (2) to optimize research opportunities within current capabilities of ISS and 
with future enhancements for greater capabilities, and (3) to increase the long-range 
productivity  of  science,  technology,  and  commercial  research  and  development 
aboard the ISS. Enclosure 1 is the January 2003 study. * 

As  a  key  part  of  the  NASA  study,  the  scope  of  utilization  work  was  defined  as 
twenty-one principle functions ranging from development of strategic plans to archi-
val of research samples. A few functions, such as policy development and safety cer-
tification, were determined to be inherently governmental. The other functions were 
analyzed as candidates for delegation to a non-governmental organization. 

Ten  potential  business  models  were  evaluated.  Two  business  models—a  research 
institute  and  a  Federally  Funded  Research  and  Development  Center  (FFRDC)— 
emerged  as  the  best  choices.  A  scoring  process  based  upon  an  agreed  upon  set  of 
evaluation criteria resulted in the research institute ultimately emerging as the pre-
ferred business model. 

While  NASA  initially  recommended  the  establishment  of  a  non-governmental  or-
ganization,  specifically  a  non-profit  institute,  to  perform  research  leadership  func-
tions including significant aspects of research planning, manifesting, prioritizing, re-
source allocation, advocacy, outreach, and archiving, the Agency rescinded plans for 
a non-profit institute based on a Presidential announcement. 

On January 14, 2004, the President announced the Vision for Space Exploration— 
a vision that gives NASA a new focus and clear objectives. As a part of this Vision, 
the  President  has  directed  that  U.S.  research  on  the  International  Space  Station 
(ISS) be focused on supporting space exploration goals, with an emphasis on under-
standing  how  the  space  environment  affects  astronaut  health  and  the  development 
of countermeasures and exploration capabilities. 

The  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  is  in  accord  with  the  recently  released  report 
of the National Research Council entitled, ‘‘Issues and Opportunities Regarding the 
U.S.  Space  Program.’’  Their  recommendations  align  closely  to  the  Vision,  also  spe-
cifically calling for an exploration research agenda for the ISS. 

Given a highly focused research agenda for the ISS, NASA reassessed its original 
need  and  plan  for  an  International  Space  Station  Research  Institute  (ISSRI).  The 
original  plans  discussed  above  had  called  for  establishing  an  ISSRI  with  the  pri-
mary  objective  of  providing  U.S.  research  leadership  for  a  diverse  U.S.  community 
performing  a  broad  range  of  research  on  the  ISS.  With  a  more  focused  research 
agenda for the ISS, NASA stopped activity on the procurement efforts for the ISSRI. 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

Question  8.  Concerns  have  been  expressed  by  the  Japanese  about  the  possible 
elimination  of  the  Centrifuge  Accommodation  Module  (CAM),  which  they  are  build-
ing for the United States in exchange for the launching of their core research facil-
ity,  the  Japanese  Experiment  Module  (JEM/‘‘Kibo’’).  Are  these  concerns  justified? 
What is the current status of the CAM and its scientific capabilities? 

Answer.  NASA  has  completed  a  Zero  Base  Review  (ZBR)  of  the  Human  Systems 
Research  and  Technology  Program  (HSR&T)  to  ensure  that  future  investments  are 
aligned  with  exploration  objectives  and  that  biological  and  physical  research 
planned  for  the  ISS  is  driven  by  the  unique  capabilities  of  the  ISS.  The  objective 
of  the  ZBR  was  to  prioritize  needs  for  each  phase  of  the  planned  exploration  strat-
egy,  and  to  rebalance  the  research  portfolio  accordingly.  The  ZBR  employed  a  me-
thodical, disciplined process to align research tasks to exploration requirements and 
was  informed  by  NASA  medical  policies  and  the  National  Academies-reviewed  Bio-
astronautics  Roadmap.  The  review  identified  critical  research  priorities  to  reduce 
risk for long-duration human spaceflight, and has given NASA confidence that a sig-
nificant part of ongoing BPR research directly supports the Vision. However, certain 
tasks  will  be  discontinued,  others  will  be  augmented,  and  still  new  ones  will  be 
started  in  order  to  fill  priority  areas  identified  during  the  review.  These  high-pri-
ority  areas  include  space  radiation  health  and  shielding,  advanced  environmental 
control and monitoring, advanced extra-vehicular activities, human health and coun-
termeasures, advanced life support, exploration medical care, and space human fac-
tors. The highest priorities for research on ISAS have been identified as medical re-
search  with  human  subjects  and  microgravity  validation  of  environmental  control 
and  life  support  technologies.  Lower-priority  tasks,  which  are  now  subject  to  re-
duced  funding  include  basis  research  using  model  organisms  (such  as  cells  or  ro-
dents),  and  fundamental  research  in  physics,  material  science,  or  basic  combus-
tion—with  no  direct  link  to  exploration  requirements.  Additional  refinement  to  the 
research  and  development  portfolio  may  take  place  in  the  future  as  a  result  of  a 
Shuttle/Station Configuration Options Study currently underway. 

The Shuttle/Station Configuration Options Team study is 60-day study of the con-
figuration  options  for  the  ISS  in  the  context  of  potential  future  flight  rates  for  the 
Space Shuttle Program and within the Presidential constraint to cease flight of the 
Shuttle fleet no later than the end of FY 2010. The scope of this study spans across 
ISS  assembly,  operations  and  utilization,  and  supersedes  all  prior  NASA  studies  in 
these areas. S/SCOT will then feed into ESAS. 

While  we  cannot  comment  on  any  potential  changes  to  the  ISS  configuration  (in-
cluding CAM) until the completion of these ongoing studies, we can report that the 
CAM recently completed its Critical Design Review (CDR) and the Centrifuge Rotor 
CDR is scheduled for late 2005. 

Question  9.  Provide  a  brief  summary  of  the  research  that  has  been  conducted  up 
to this point aboard the ISS, including an indication of which science disciplines are 
represented by that research. 

Answer. See Enclosure 2 for activities from Expedition 1 through 11. * 
Question  10.  Describe  the  criteria  and  process  being  used  to  re-plan  research 
aboard  the  Space  Station  within  the  Vision  for  Exploration.  What  is  the  timetable 
for  providing  a  clear  definition  of  NASA’s  future  plans  for  space  station  research? 
Answer.  Explorations  Systems  Mission  Directorate  (ESMD)  conducted  a  study  to 
develop  an  International  Space  Station  (ISS)  Research  &  Technology  development 
investment strategy with the goal of optimizing ISS utilization to support the Vision 
for  Space  Exploration.  A  Strategy-to-Task-to-Technology  (STT)  process  was  em-
ployed as the primary means for allowing stakeholders to prioritize Exploration ob-
jectives  and  distill  a  research  and  technology  portfolio  for  meeting  those  objectives. 
STT is a top-down approach to requirements definition that links weighted strategic 
objectives  to  successive  levels  of  operational  objectives,  tasks  and  technologies  to 
meet  those  tasks.  The  ISS  study  had  broad  representation  from  all  relevant  ESMD 
offices  as  well  and  Space  Operations  Mission  Directorate  (SOMD)  and  the  Office  of 
the  NASA  Chief  Health  and  Medical  Officer  (OCHMO).  The  process  succinctly  con- 
elates  the  informed  opinions  of  the  stakeholders  leading  an  assessment  of  the  ben-
efit  of  various  research  and  technology  (R&T)  activities  on  ISS  used  to  guide  ISS 
research. 

With  the  research  benefits  in  hand,  ESMD  then  identified  ISS  resources  needed 
to carry out the R&T activities. An analysis of the benefit and the resource require-
ments  allowed  ESMD  to  determine  research  priorities  based  on  the  best  research 
benefits vs. the cost of ISS resource requirements. 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

This  cost-benefit  analysis  has  been  provided  to  a  recently  formed  Shuttle/Station 
Configuration Options Study team, who has been charged to develop a series of spe-
cific  configuration  options  for  the  International  Space  Station  (ISS)  in  the  context 
of  potential  future  flight  rates  for  the  Space  Shuttle  Program.  The  study  is  oper-
ating  under  the  constraint  to  cease  Shuttle  flights  no  later  than  FY  2010  while 
maintaining safety as the Agency’s highest priority. The scope of the Shuttle/Station 
Configuration  Options  Team  study  spans  ISS  assembly,  operations,  and  use  and 
considers  such  factors  as  International  Partner  commitments,  research  utilization, 
cost, and ISS sustainability. This study will be completed later this summer in time 
to inform key Agency decisions. 

Question  11.  Identify  any  decisions  that  have  been  made  since  January  4,  2004 
regarding  what  previously  planned  research,  within  which  science  disciplines,  will 
not  be  supported  aboard  the  space  station.  Indicate  whether  that  research  can  be 
accomplished by some other means, either on Earth or in a free-flying orbital capa-
bility,  and  describe  the  impact  of  any  changes  in  such  research  on  the  investment 
of  time  and  funds  expended  by  the  principal  investigator(s)  and  supporting  institu-
tions. 

Answer.  Immediately  following  the  President’s  announcement  of  the  Vision  for 
Space  Exploration,  the  Office  of  Biological  and  Physical  Research  (OBPR)  initiated 
a reorganization of its research and technology development programs. 

The  previously  discipline-based  research  programs  with  objectives  targeting  fun-
damental  and  applied  research  for  microgravity  physics,  for  applications  to  Earth- 
based  practices,  and  for  the  basic  understanding  of  biology  in  space,  were  reorga-
nized into product line-based efforts to enable space technologies in the areas of life 
support  and  habitation  and  human  health  and  performance  during  long-duration 
missions beyond low-Earth orbit. 

An initial reduction of the OBPR research portfolio was submitted to Congress in 
the  FY04  Second  Operating  Plan  change  letter  June  25,  2004)  and  subsequent  de-
tailed  description.  Elements  of  ISS  research  that  were  deselected  included  non-ex-
ploration  related  fundamental  physics  (low-temperature  and  atomic  physics),  basic 
materials  science  in  solidification  and  phase  transformation,  and  fundamental  com-
bustion  science  and  fluid  physics.  The  principal  investigators  associated  with 
deselected  research  were  provided  enough  funding  and  time  to  transition  their  ac-
tivities  to  other  areas  by  retaining  them  in  the  program  for  a  reasonable  time  pe-
riod.  Most  of  this  research  cannot  be  accomplished  on  the  ground.  The  OBPR  re-
search  program  was  subsequently  transferred  to  the  Exploration  Systems  Mission 
Directorate and renamed Human Systems Research and Technology. 

NASA  has  recently  completed  a  Zero-Based  Review  (ZBR)  of  the  Human  System 
Research  and  Technology  (HSR&T)  portfolio  that  includes  the  bulk  of  the  planned 
ISS research activities. This rigorous programmatic assessment identified a number 
of  ground-based  and  ISS-based  existing  research  tasks  that  were  programmatically 
classified  as  non-Exploration  related  and  slated  for  phase-out.  These  areas  were  in 
fundamental  space  biology  and  cellular  biotechnology.  Some  of  this  research  can  be 
accomplished  on  the  ground  and  by  using  free  flying  space  platforms.  All  principal 
investigators  associated  with  the  phased-out  research  areas  have  been  given  time 
and funding necessary to reorient their activities. 

Question  12.  What  other  disciplines,  besides  geology  and  life  science  disciplines 

would benefit from an orbiting research laboratory? 

Answer.  There  is  no  doubt  that  several  disciplines  could  benefit  from  an  orbiting 
research  laboratory.  However,  logistics  support,  volume,  electric  power,  and  crew 
time  to  support  research  in  orbiting  laboratories  are  limited  and  extremely  costly. 
As a result, the President has directed NASA to focus U.S. research and use of the 
International  Space  Station  on  supporting  space  exploration  goals,  with  emphasis 
on understanding how the space environment affects astronaut health and capabili-
ties and developing countermeasures. In addition to the life sciences disciplines, the 
following  disciplines  will  use  the  ISS:  materials  science,  combustion  research,  and 
fluids physics. These disciplines have been retained because they directly contribute 
to  the  achievement  of  exploration  objectives,  not  because  of  their  intrinsic  scientific 
value.  Specifically,  the  following  ISS  facilities  are  currently  expected  to  be  contin-
ued:  the  Combustion  Integrated  Rack,  the  Fluid  Integrated  Rack,  and  the  Micro-
gravity  Science  Glovebox.  The  ISS  is  not  anticipated  to  have  excess  utilization  ca-
pacity  beyond  meeting  the  needs  of  the  exploration  vision  and  our  International 
Partners through the middle of the next decade. Over the next several years, as the 
ISS  research  agenda  focused  on  the  Exploration  Vision  is  achieved,  it  will  be  bene-
ficial to re-examine the next set of research priorities. Until that time, it would not 
be practical to expand the ISS research functions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Question  13.  During  the  hearing,  reference  was  made  to  a  water  processing  facil-
ity  developed  for  use  on  ISS,  which  was  the  basis  for  a  device,  or  system  used  to 
purify  water  in  Iraq  and  in  the  region  affected  by  the  December  2004  tsunami. 
Please  provide  additional  information  regarding  that  technology  and  how  that  ISS- 
generated development has been successfully employed in terrestrial applications. 

Answer. The technology component of the ISS water processor that is common to 
the disaster relief system planned for deployment in Iraq this summer is the Micro-
bial Check Valve (MCV), an iodinated resin that treats the water for microbial con-
tamination.  This  resin  was  originally  developed  for  NASA  by  the  small  business 
called  ‘‘Umpqua,’’  and  the  rights  were  subsequently  sold  to  Novation/Haas.  The 
charity,  Concern  for  Kids,  is  working  with  Novation/Haas  to  produce  and  deploy 
multiple ground-based water filtration units in Iraq this coming summer. The MCV 
technology  is  attractive  in  this  application  because  it  has  the  added  benefit  of  pro-
viding villagers with iodine that is a deficiency in their current diet, and it is a com-
pact,  reliable  method  for  controlling  microorganisms.  Concern  for  Kids  plans  to  use 
the  terrestrial  units  to  service  villages  on  a  rotation-type  schedule  where  the  unit 
will  be  transported  via  truck  from  village  to  village.  processing  existing  village 
water supplies. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON L. DORGAN TO 

WILLIAM F. READDY 

As you may know, University of North Dakota has been developing AgCam, a sen-
sor  intended  to  operate  on  the  International  Space  Station  (ISS).  AgCam  was  de-
signed to go into the Window Observational Research Facility (WORF). 

Question  1.  Is  the  WORF  scheduled  for  a  launch  on  the  Space  Shuttle?  When? 
Answer.  NASA  is  currently  assessing  its  plans  for  the  utilization  of  the  ISS,  and 
focusing its research and technology development goals towards those activities that 
most  closely  support  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  In  this  environment  of  lim-
ited  opportunities  for  the  launch  of  facility-class  payloads,  it  is  critical  that  utiliza-
tion  planning  align  as  closely  as  possible  with  the  needs  of  the  human  exploration 
planning effort. The only missions for which specific payloads have been manifested 
on  the  Space  Shuttle  are  the  first  two  Return  to  Flight  missions.  Consistent  with 
the Vision, the Space Shuttle will be retired by 2010. Prior to its retirement, it will 
be  utilized  primarily  for  the  assembly  of  the  ISS.  Our  top  priority  will  be  to  make 
each  flight  safer  than  the  last.  As  we  noted  in  our  November  3,  2004,  correspond-
ence  to  you  on  this  topic,  in  the  event  that  a  future  flight  opportunity  does  become 
available on the Space Shuttle, the WORF facility will be considered for delivery to 
the  ISS.  The  University  of  North  Dakota  has  been  apprised  of  the  situation  and  is 
aware that NASA cannot commit to the flight of WORF on the Space Shuttle. 

Question  2.  If  the  WORF  cannot  be  launched  to  the  ISS,  could  AgCam  be  accom-

modated some other way? 

Answer. The AgCam hardware has been designed and built to be operated in the 
WORF.  The  WORF  would  provide  resources  such  as  power,  thermal  control,  data 
and  mounting  positions  for  operations  of  the  AgCam.  The  hardware  as  designed 
could  not  operate  independently  of  the  WORF.  It  might  be  possible  to  redesign  the 
AgCam hardware and its operations concepts, but the University would require ad-
ditional funding, testing, and development time; even with such a redesign, it is un-
clear  whether  the  redesigned  hardware  could  achieve  the  expected  scientific  value 
without the WORF. 

Question  3.  What  are  the  plans  for  Earth  observations  from  the  International 

Space Station? 

Answer. While NASA is not pursuing new Earth sciences research on the ISS be-
cause  of  the  limited  launch  opportunities  on  the  Space  Shuttle,  we  are  continuing 
with two Earth observations programs already on-orbit. 

1.  The  Earth  Knowledge  Acquired  by  Middle  Schools  (EarthKAM)  program  al-
lows middle school students to command, via computer, a digital camera mount-
ed in a window of the ISS and integrate Earth images taken by the camera with 
inquiry-based  learning  for  5th–8th  grade  students.  Photos  are  made  available 
on  the  Web  for  viewing  and  study  by  participating  schools  around  the  world. 
Educators  use  the  pictures  in  conjunction  with  curricula  for  projects  involving 
Earth  Science,  geography,  physics,  math,  and  technology.  To  date,  over  80 
schools  with  more  than  1,600  students  from  the  United  States,  Japan,  Ger-
many, and France have participated in the EarthKAM program. 
2.  The  Crew  Earth  Observations  (CEO)  program  continues,  with  the  ISS  crew 
photographing  various  Earth  sites  on  a  daily  basis.  Hand-held  photography  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

the Earth from human spaceflight missions, spanning more than 40 years, pro-
vides insights and documents changes on the Earth. The ISS crew members are 
building on this time series of imagery, which was started in 1961. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Oct 19, 2010 Jkt 061670 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61670.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

